717
Alberta
 Website  www.alberta.caAlberta  is a province of Canada. It had an estimated population of 3.7 million in 2010() making it the most populous of Canadas three prairie provinces. Alberta and its neighbour, Saskatchewan, were established as provinces on September 1, 1905.()Alberta is located in Canada, bounded by the provinces of Columbia to the west and Saskatchewan to the east, the Territories to the north, and the state of Montana to the south. Alberta is one of three Canadian provinces and territories to border only a single U.S. state and is also one of only two provinces that are landlocked.Edmonton, the city of Alberta, is located near the geographic centre of the province and is the primary supply and service hub for Canadas oil sands and other northern resource industries. Approximately  south of the capital is Calgary, Albertas largest city and a major distribution and transportation hub. According to recent population estimates, these two metropolitan areas have now both exceeded 1 million people.() Census agglomerations in the province include Lethbridge, Red Deer, Prairie, Hat, Wood Buffalo (includes McMurray), Lloydminster, Brooks, Okotoks, Camrose, Canmore, Cold Lake, and Wetaskiwin.(  Notable tourist destinations in the province include Canmore, Sylvan Lake, Drumheller, Banff, and Jasper.Alberta is named after Princess Louise Caroline Alberta (18481939),() the fourth daughter of Victoria, the of Canada until 1901, and Prince Consort. Princess Louise was the wife of the Marquess of Lorne, General of Canada from 1878 to 1883. Lake Louise, the Village of Caroline, and Alberta were also named in honour of Princess Louise.The current Premier of the province is Redford. Geography Alberta, with an area of () is the fourth largest province after Quebec, Ontario, and British Columbia. To the south, the province borders on the parallel north, separating it from the U.S. state of Montana, while on the north the parallel north divides it from the Territories. To the east the meridian west separates it from the province of Saskatchewan, while on the west its boundary with British Columbia follows the meridian west south from the Northwest Territories at 60N until it reaches the Divide at the Mountains, and from that point follows the line of peaks marking the Continental Divide in a generally southeasterly direction until it reaches the Montana border at 49N.The province extends  north to south and  east to west at its maximum width. Its highest point is  at the summit of Mount Columbia in the Rocky Mountains along the southwest border, while its lowest point is  on the River in Buffalo National Park in the northeast.()With the exception of the semi-arid steppe of the southeastern section, the province has adequate resources. There are numerous rivers and lakes used for swimming, fishing and a range of sports. There are three large lakes, Lake Claire () in Buffalo National Park, Slave Lake (), and Athabasca () which lies in both Alberta and Saskatchewan. The longest river in the province is the River which travels  from the Icefield in the Rocky Mountains to Lake Athabasca.() The largest river is the Peace River with an average flow of 2161 m3/s. The Peace River originates in the Rocky Mountains of northern British Columbia and flows through northern Alberta and into the River, a tributary of the River.File:Moraine Lake 17092005.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Lake in National Park.Albertas capital city, Edmonton, is located approximately in the geographic centre of the province. It is the most northerly major city in Canada, and serves as a gateway and hub for resource development in northern Canada. The region, with its proximity to Canadas largest fields, has most of western Canadas oil refinery capacity. Calgary is located approximately  south of Edmonton and  north of Montana, surrounded by extensive ranching country. Almost 75% of the provinces population lives in the Corridor.Most of the northern half of the province is forest, while the Mountains along the southwestern boundary are largely forested (see Mountain forests and Columbia foothills forests). The southern quarter of the province is prairie, ranging from prairie in the southeastern corner to mixed grass prairie in an arc to the west and north of it. The central parkland region extending in a broad arc between the prairies and the forests, from Calgary, north to Edmonton, and then east to Lloydminster, contains the most fertile soil in the province and most of the population. Much of the unforested part of Alberta is given over either to grain or to farming, with farming more common in the north and centre, while ranching and agriculture predominate in the south.()The Alberta badlands are located in southeastern Alberta, where the Deer River crosses the flat prairie and farmland, and features deep canyons and striking landforms. Provincial Park, near Alberta, showcases the badlands terrain, desert flora, and remnants from Albertas past when dinosaurs roamed the then lush landscape. Climate Alberta has a dry climate with warm summers and cold winters. The province is open to cold arctic weather systems from the north, which often produce extremely cold conditions in winter. As the fronts between the air masses shift north and south across Alberta, temperature can change rapidly. Arctic air masses in the winter produce extreme minimum temperatures varying from  in northern Alberta to  in southern Alberta. In the summer, continental air masses produce maximum temperatures from  in the mountains to  in southern Alberta.()Alberta extends for over  from north to south; its climate, therefore, varies considerably. Average temperatures in January range from  in the south to  in the north, and in July from  in the south to  in the north.  The climate is also influenced by the presence of the Rocky Mountains to the southwest, which disrupt the flow of the prevailing westerly winds and cause them to drop most of their moisture on the western slopes of the mountain ranges before reaching the province, casting a shadow over much of Alberta. The northerly location and isolation from the weather systems of the Ocean cause Alberta to have a dry climate with little moderation from the ocean. Annual precipitation ranges from  in the southeast to  in the north, except in the foothills of the Rocky Mountains where rainfall can reach  annually.(In the summer, the average daytime temperatures range from around  in the Rocky Mountain valleys and far north to  in the dry prairie of the southeast. The northern and western parts of the province experience higher rainfall and lower evaporation rates caused by cooler summer temperatures. The south and east-central portions are prone to drought-like conditions sometimes persisting for several years, although even these areas can receive heavy precipitation.Alberta is a sunny province. Annual bright sunshine totals range between 1900 and 2500 hours per year. Northern Alberta receives about 18 hours of daylight in the summer.(In southwestern Alberta, the cold winters are frequently interrupted by warm, dry winds blowing from the mountains, which can propel temperatures upward from frigid conditions to well above the freezing point in a very short period. During one chinook recorded at Creek, temperatures soared from  to  in one hour.(  The region around Lethbridge has the most chinooks, averaging 30 to 35 chinook days per year, while Calgary has a Christmas only 59% of the time as a result of these winds. Northern Alberta is mostly covered by boreal forest and has a climate. The agricultural area of southern Alberta have a semi-arid steppe climate because the annual precipitation is less than the water that evaporates or is used by plants. The southeastern corner of Alberta, part of the Triangle, experiences greater summer heat and lower rainfall than the rest of the province, and as a result suffers frequent yield problems and occasional severe droughts. Western Alberta is protected by the mountains and enjoys the mild temperatures brought by winter winds. Central and parts of northwestern Alberta in the Peace River region are largely aspen parkland, a biome transitional between prairie to the south and boreal forest to the north.After Ontario, Alberta is the most likely region in Canada to experience tornadoes. Thunderstorms, some of them severe, are frequent in the summer, especially in central and southern Alberta. The region surrounding the Corridor is notable for having the highest frequency of hail in Canada, which is caused by lifting from the nearby Rocky Mountains, enhancing the updraft/downdraft cycle necessary for the formation of hail.Image:Banff Trail 2.jpg|Winter climate at Banff Trail station in Calgary.Image:DinosaurProvincialParkHoodoo.jpg|Hoodoos in Provincial Park.Image:May 2011 Wildfires in Alberta, Canada.jpg|Satellite image of wildfires in Alberta. Ecology  Flora In central and northern Alberta the arrival of spring brings the prairie crocus anemone, the three flowered avens, bean, wild rose and other early flowers. The advancing summer introduces many flowers of the sunflower family, until in August the plains are one blaze of yellow and purple. The southern and east central parts of Alberta are covered by a short, nutritious grass, which dries up as summer lengthens, to be replaced by hardy perennials such as the prairie coneflower, fleabane, and sage. Both yellow and white clover fill the ditches with their beauty and aromatic scents.The trees in the parkland region of the province grow in clumps and belts on the hillsides. These are largely deciduous, typically aspen, poplar, and willow. Many species of willow and other shrubs grow in virtually any terrain. On the north side of the North Saskatchewan River evergreen forests prevail for hundreds of thousands of square kilometres. Aspen poplar, poplar (or cottonwood), and birch are the primary large deciduous species. Conifers include pine, Rocky Mountain pine, pine, both white and black spruce, and the deciduous conifer tamarack. Fauna Image:Ovis canadensis 2.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The sheep is Albertas provincial animalThe four climatic regions (alpine, forest, parkland, and prairie) of Alberta are home to many different species of animals. The south and central prairie was the land of the bison, commonly known as buffalo, its grasses providing pasture and breeding ground for millions of buffalo. The buffalo population was decimated during early settlement, but since then buffalo have made a comeback, living on farms and in parks all over Alberta.Alberta is home to many large carnivores. Among them are the grizzly and black bears, which are found in the mountains and wooded regions. Smaller carnivores of the canine and feline families include coyotes, wolves, fox, lynx, bobcat and lion (cougar).Herbivorous animals are found throughout the province. Moose, deer, and deer are found in the wooded regions, and pronghorn can be found in the prairies of southern Alberta. sheep and goats live in the Mountains. Rabbits, porcupines, skunks, squirrels and many species of rodents and reptiles live in every corner of the province. Alberta is home to only one variety of snake, the prairie rattlesnake.thumb|left|200px|Water birds in EdmontonCentral and northern Alberta and the region farther north is the nesting ground of many migratory birds. Vast numbers of ducks, geese, swans and pelicans arrive in Alberta every spring and nest on or near one of the hundreds of small lakes that dot northern Alberta. Eagles, hawks, owls and crows are plentiful, and a huge variety of smaller seed and insect-eating birds can be found. Alberta, like other temperate regions, is home to mosquitoes, flies, wasps, and bees. Rivers and lakes are populated with pike, walleye, whitefish, rainbow, speckled, and brown trout, and even sturgeon. Turtles are found in some water bodies in the southern part of the province. Frogs and salamanders are a few of the amphibians that make their homes in Alberta.Alberta is the only province in Canadaas well as one of the few places in the worldthat is free of Norwegian rats.() Since the early 1950s, the government of Alberta has operated a rat-control program, which has been so successful that only isolated instances of wild rat sightings are reported, usually of rats arriving in the province aboard trucks or by rail. In 2006, Alberta Agriculture reports zero findings of wild rats; the only rat interceptions have been domesticated rats that have been seized from their owners. It is illegal for individual Albertans to own or keep Norwegian rats of any description; the animals can be kept in the province by only zoos, universities and colleges, and recognized research institutions. In 2009, several rats werefound and captured, in small pockets in Southern Alberta,() putting Albertas rat-free status in jeopardy. History File:Alexander Rutherford.jpg|right|thumb|150px|C. Rutherford, Albertas first premierThe first people in Alberta were Paleo-Indians who arrived in Alberta at least 10,000 years ago, toward the end of the ice age. They probably migrated from Siberia to Alaska on a land bridge across the Strait, and then may have moved down the east side of the Mountains through Alberta to settle the Americas. Alternatively they may have migrated down the coast of British Columbia and then moved inland.() Over time they differentiated into various Nations peoples, including the Indian tribes of southern Alberta such as those of the Confederacy and the Cree, who generally lived by hunting buffalo (bison), and the more northerly tribes such as the Cree and  Chipewyan who hunted, trapped, and fished for a living.()After the British arrival in Canada, approximately half of the province of Alberta, south of the River drainage, became part of Land which consisted of all land drained by rivers flowing into Bay. This area was granted by II of England to the Bay Company (HBC) in 1670, and rival fur trading companies were not allowed to trade in it. After the arrival of Canadians in the west around 1731, they settled near fur trading posts, establishing communities such as Lac La Biche and Bonnyville. Fort La Jonquire was established near what is now Calgary in 1752.The Athabasca River and the rivers north of it were not in HBC territory because they drained into the Ocean instead of Hudson Bay, and they were prime habitat for fur-bearing animals. The first explorer of the Athabasca region was Pond, who learned of the Portage, which allowed travel from southern  rivers into the rivers north of Ruperts Land.  Fur traders formed the West Company (NWC) of Montreal to compete with the HBC in 1779. The NWC occupied the northern part of Alberta territory. Peter Pond built Fort Athabasca on Lac la Biche in 1778. Roderick Mackenzie built Chipewyan on Lake Athabasca ten years later in 1788. His cousin, Sir Alexander Mackenzie, followed the Saskatchewan River to its northernmost point near Edmonton, then setting northward on foot, trekked to the Athabasca River, which he followed to Lake Athabasca. It was there he discovered the mighty outflow river which bears his namethe Riverwhich he followed to its outlet in the Ocean. Returning to Lake Athabasca, he followed the Peace River upstream, eventually reaching the Ocean, and so he became the first white man to cross the North American continent north of Mexico.()The extreme southernmost portion of Alberta was part of the French (and Spanish) territory of Louisiana, sold to the United States in 1803; in 1818, the portion of Louisiana north of the Forty-Ninth Parallel was ceded to Great Britain.Fur trade expanded in the north, but bloody battles occurred between the rival HBC and NWC, and in 1821 the British government forced them to merge to stop the hostilities. The amalgamated Hudsons Bay Company dominated trade in Alberta until 1870, when the newly formed Government purchased Ruperts Land. Northern Alberta was included in the Territory until 1870, when it and Ruperts land became Canadas Territories.The district of Alberta was created as part of the North-West Territories in 1882. As settlement increased, local representatives to the North-West Legislative Assembly were added. After a long campaign for autonomy, in 1905 the district of Alberta was enlarged and given provincial status, with the election of Cameron Rutherford as the first premier. Demographics Alberta has enjoyed a relatively high rate of growth in recent years, mainly because of its burgeoning economy. Between 2003 and 2004, the province had high birthrates (on par with some larger provinces such as British Columbia), relatively high immigration, and a high rate of interprovincial migration when compared to other provinces.()Approximately 81% of the population live in urban areas and only about 19% live in rural areas. The Calgary-Edmonton Corridor is the most urbanized area in the province and is one of the most densely populated areas of Canada.() Many of Albertas cities and towns have also experienced very high rates of growth in recent history. Over the past century, Albertas population rose from 73,022 in 1901 to 2,974,807 in 2001() and 3,290,350 according to the 2006 census.()The 2006 census found that English, with 2,576,670 native speakers, was the most common mother tongue of Albertans, representing 79.99% of the provinces population. The next most common mother tongues were various languages with 97,275 native speakers (3.02%), followed by German with 84,505 native speakers (2.62%) and French with 61,225 (1.90%).()Other mother tongues (in decreasing order) include: Punjabi, with 36,320 native speakers (1.13%); Tagalog, with 29,740 (0.92%); Ukrainian, with 29,455 (0.91%); Spanish, with 29,125 (0.90%); Polish, with 21,990 (0.68%); Arabic, with 20,495 (0.64%); Dutch, with 19,980 (0.62%); and Vietnamese, with 19,350 (0.60%). The most common aboriginal language is Cree 17,215 (0.53%). Other common  mother tongues include Italian with 13,095 speakers (0.41%); Urdu with 11,275 (0.35%); and Korean with 10,845 (0.33%); then Hindi 8,985 (0.28%); Persian 7,700 (0.24%); Portuguese 7,205 (0.22%); and Hungarian 6,770 (0.21%).(Figures shown are for the number of single language responses and the percentage of total single-language responses.)(Alberta has considerable ethnic diversity. In line with the rest of Canada, many immigrants originated from England,  Scotland, Ireland and Wales, but large numbers also came from other parts of Europe, notably Germans, French, Ukrainians and Scandinavians.() According to Statistics Canada, Alberta is home to the second highest proportion (two percent) of Francophones in western Canada (after Manitoba). Despite this, relatively few Albertans claim French as their mother tongue. Many of Albertas French-speaking residents live in the central and northwestern regions of the province.As reported in the 2001 census, the Chinese represented nearly four percent of Albertas population, and East Indians represented more than two percent. Both Edmonton and Calgary have historic Chinatowns, and Calgary has Canadas third largest Chinese community. The Chinese presence began with workers employed in the building of the Canadian Pacific Railway in the 1880s. Aboriginal Albertans make up approximately three percent of the population.In the 2006 Canadian census, the most commonly reported ethnic origins among Albertans were: 885,825 English (27.2%); 679,705 German (20.9%); 667,405 Canadian (20.5%); 661,265 Scottish (20.3%); 539,160 Irish (16.6%); 388,210 French (11.9%); 332,180 Ukrainian (10.2%); 172,910 Dutch (5.3%); 170,935 Polish (5.2%); 169,355 American Indian (5.2%); 144,585 Norwegian (4.4%); and 137,600 Chinese (4.2%). (Each person could choose as many ethnicities as were applicable.)()Amongst those of British origins, the Scots have had a particularly strong influence on place-names, with the names of many cities and towns including Calgary, Airdrie, Canmore, and Banff having Scottish origins.Alberta is the third most diverse province in terms of minorities after British Columbia and Ontario with 13.9% of the population consisting of minorities.() Nearly one-fourth of the populations of Calgary and Edmonton belong to a visible minority group.()Aboriginal Identity Peoples make up 5.8% of the population, about half of whom consist of American Indians and the other half are Metis. There are also small number of Inuit people in Alberta.() The number of Aboriginal Identity Peoples have been increasing at a rate greater than the population of Alberta.(As of the 2001 Census the largest religious group was Roman Catholic, representing 25.7% of the population. Alberta had the second highest percentage of non-religious residents in Canada (after British Columbia) at 23.1% of the population. Of the remainder, 13.5% of the population identified themselves as belonging to the Church of Canada, while 5.9% were Anglican. Lutherans made up 4.8% of the population while Baptists comprised 2.5%.The remainder belonged to a wide variety of different religious affiliations, none of which constituted more than 2% of the population. The Mormons of Alberta reside primarily in the extreme south of the province and made up 1.7% of the population. Alberta has a population of Hutterites, a communal Anabaptist sect similar to the Mennonites (Hutterites represented 0.4% of the population while Mennonites were 0.8%), and has a significant population of Seventh-day Adventists at 0.3%. Alberta is home to several Rite Churches as part of the legacy of Eastern European immigration, including the Catholic Eparchy of Edmonton, and the Orthodox Church of Canadas Western Diocese which is based in Edmonton.()Muslims, Sikhs, and Hindus live in Alberta. Muslims constituted 1.7% of the population, Sikhs 0.8% and Hindus 0.5%. Many of these are recent immigrants, but others have roots that go back to the first settlers of the prairies.( Canadas oldest mosque, the Mosque is located in Edmonton,() whereas the Canadas largest mosque, the Nur mosque is located in Calgary.() Jews constituted 0.4% of Albertas population. Most of Albertas 13,000 Jews live in Calgary (7,500) and Edmonton (5,000).(AM YisraelThe Jewish Communities of Canada) Municipalities ;Largest metro areas and municipalities by population as of 2006File:Edmonton Skyline Panorama.jpg|thumb|800px|center|EdmontonFile:Calgary panorama-2.jpg|thumb|800px|center|Calgary Economy Albertas economy is one of the strongest in Canada, supported by the burgeoning petroleum industry and to a lesser extent, agriculture and technology. The per capita GDP in 2007 was by far the highest of any province in Canada at C$74,825. This was 61% higher than the national average of C$46,441 and more than twice that of some of the Atlantic provinces. In 2006 the deviation from the national average was the largest for any province in Canadian history.() According to the 2006 census,() the median annual family income after taxes was $70,986 in Alberta (compared to $60,270 in Canada as a whole).The Calgary-Edmonton Corridor is the most urbanized region in the province and one of the densest in Canada. The region covers a distance of roughly 400 kilometres north to south. In 2001, the population of the Calgary-Edmonton Corridor was 2.15 million (72% of Albertas population).() It is also one of the fastest growing regions in the country. A 2003 study by Bank Financial Group found the corridor to be the only Canadian urban centre to amass a U.S. level of wealth while maintaining a Canadian style of life, offering health care benefits. The study found that GDP per capita in the corridor was 10% above average U.S. metropolitan areas and 40% above other Canadian cities at that time.The Institute states that Alberta also has very high levels of freedom and rates Alberta as the freest economy in Canada,() and the second freest economy amongst U.S. states and Canadian provinces.() Industry File:Syncrude mildred lake plant.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Mildred Lake mine site and plant at the Oil Sands.Alberta is the largest producer of conventional crude oil, crude, gas and gas products in the country. Alberta is the worlds 2nd largest exporter of natural gas and the 4th largest producer.() Two of the largest producers of petrochemicals in America are located in central and north-central Alberta. In both Red Deer and Edmonton, world class polyethylene and vinyl manufacturers produce products shipped all over the world, and Edmontons oil refineries provide the raw materials for a large petrochemical industry to the east of Edmonton.The oil sands have estimated oil reserves approximately equal to the oil reserves of the rest of the world, estimated to be 1.6 trillion barrels (254 km3). With the development of new extraction methods such as assisted gravity drainage, which was developed in Alberta, bitumen and synthetic crude oil can be produced at costs close to those of conventional crude. Many companies employ both conventional strip mining and non-conventional situ methods to extract the bitumen from the sands. With current technology and at current prices, about 315 billion barrels (50 km3) of bitumen are recoverable. McMurray, one of Canadas fastest growing  cities, has grown enormously in recent years because of the large corporations which have taken on the task of oil production. As of late 2006 there were over $100 billion in oil sands projects under construction or in the planning stages in northeastern Alberta.()Another factor determining the viability of oil extraction from the sands is the price of oil. The price increases since 2003 have made it more than profitable to extract this oil, which in the past would give little profit or even a loss.With concerted effort and support from the provincial government, several high-tech industries have found their birth in Alberta, notably patents related to interactive crystal display systems.(Interactive display systemUS Patent U.S. Patent No. 5,448,263; U.S. Patent for Touch Sensitive TechnologySMART Technologies) With a growing economy, Alberta has several financial institutions dealing with civil and private funds. Agriculture and forestry File:Warner Elevator Row.jpg|thumb|250px|right|The elevator row, the last surviving elevator row in Alberta, currently unprotected.Agriculture has a significant position in the provinces economy. The province has over three million head of cattle,(Alberta Livestock InspectionsAugust 2006Alberta Government, Department of Agriculture) and Alberta beef has a healthy worldwide market. Nearly one half of all Canadian beef is produced in Alberta. Alberta is one of the prime producers of plains buffalo (bison) for the consumer market. Sheep for wool and mutton are also raised.Wheat and canola are primary farm crops, with Alberta leading the provinces in spring wheat production; other grains are also prominent. Much of the farming is dryland farming, often with fallow seasons interspersed with cultivation. Continuous cropping (in which there is no fallow season) is gradually becoming a more common mode of production because of increased profits and a reduction of soil erosion. Across the province, the once common elevator is slowly being lost as rail lines are decreasing; farmers typically truck the grain to central points.Alberta is the leading beekeeping province of Canada, with some beekeepers wintering hives indoors in specially designed barns in southern Alberta, then migrating north during the summer into the Peace River valley where the season is short but the working days are long for honeybees to produce honey from clover and fireweed. Hybrid canola also requires bee pollination, and some beekeepers service this need.The vast northern forest reserves of softwood allow Alberta to produce large quantities of lumber, oriented strand board (OSB) and plywood, and several plants in northern Alberta supply North America and the Rim nations with bleached pulp and newsprint. Tourism File:Stephen Avenue.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Avenue, Calgary.Alberta has been a tourist destination from the early days of the twentieth century, with attractions including outdoor locales for skiing, hiking and camping, shopping locales such as Edmonton Mall, Stampede, outdoor festivals, professional athletic events, international sporting competitions such as the Games and Games, as well as more eclectic attractions. There are also natural attractions like Island National Park, Buffalo National Park, and the Icefield.According to Alberta Economic Development, Calgary and Edmonton both host over four million visitors annually. Banff, Jasper and the Rocky Mountains are visited by about three million people per year.() Alberta tourism relies heavily on Ontario tourists, as well as tourists from other parts of Canada, the States, and many international countries.Albertas Rocky Mountains include well known tourist destinations Banff National Park and National Park. The two mountain parks are connected by the scenic Parkway. Banff is located  west of Calgary on Highway 1, and Jasper is located  west of Edmonton on Highway. Five of Canadas fourteen UNESCO heritage sites are located within the province: Rocky Mountain Parks, International Peace Park, Wood Buffalo National Park, Provincial Park and Buffalo Jump.File:Lake Louise 17092005.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Lake Louise in the Rockies.About 1.2 million people visit the of Stampede,() a celebration of Canadas own West and the cattle ranching industry. About 700,000 people enjoy Edmontons Ex (formerly Klondike Days).() Edmonton was the gateway to the only all-Canadian route to the Yukon gold fields, and the only route which did not require gold-seekers to travel the exhausting and dangerous Pass.Another tourist destination that draws more than 650,000 visitors each year is the Drumheller Valley, located northeast of Calgary. Drumheller, Dinosaur Capital of The World, offers the Royal Tyrrell Museum of Palaeontology. Drumheller also had a rich mining history being one of Western Canadas largest coal producers during the war years. The Canadian Badlands has much to offer in the way of attractions, cultural events, celebrations, accommodations and service.Located in east-central Alberta is Prairie Railway Excursions, a popular tourist attraction operated out of Stettler. It boasts one of the few operable steam trains in the world, offering trips through the rolling prairie scenery. Alberta Prairie Railway Excursions caters to tens of thousands of visitors every year.Alberta is an important destination for tourists who love to ski and hike; Alberta boasts several world-class resorts such as Village, Lake Louise, Basin, Norquay and Nakiska. Hunters and fishermen from around the world are able to take home impressive trophies and tales from their experiences in Albertas wilderness. Taxation The provinces revenue comes mainly from royalties on non-renewable natural resources (30.4%), personal income taxes (22.3%), corporate and other taxes (19.6%), and grants from the federal government primarily for infrastructure projects (9.8%).() Albertans are the lowest-taxed people in Canada, and Alberta is the only province in Canada without a provincial tax (though residents are still subject to the federal sales tax, the Goods and Services Tax of 5%.) It is also the only Canadian province to have a single rate of taxation for personal income taxes which is 10% of taxable income.()The Alberta tax system maintains a progressive character by allowing residents to earn $16,161 before becoming subject to provincial taxation in addition to a variety of tax deductions for persons with disabilities, students, and the aged.() Albertas municipalities and school jurisdictions have their own governments which (usually) work in co-operation with the provincial government.Alberta also privatized alcohol distribution.  The privatization increased outlets from 304 stores to 1,726; 1,300 jobs to 4,000 jobs; and 3,325 products to 16,495 products.() Tax revenue also increased from $400 million to $700 million. Transportation File:DavidThompsonHighway.JPG|right|thumb|220px|David Thompson Highway outside of National Park.Alberta has over  of highways and roads, of which nearly  are paved. The main north-south corridor is Highway 2, which begins south of Cardston at the Carway border crossing and is part of the Corridor. Highway 4, which effectively extends 15 into Alberta and is the busiest U.S. gateway to the province, begins at the Coutts border crossing and ends at Lethbridge. Highway 3 joins Lethbridge to Fort Macleod and links Highway 4 to Highway 2. Highway 2 travels northward through Fort Macleod, Calgary, Red Deer, and Edmonton.North of Edmonton, the highway continues to Athabasca, then northwesterly along the south shore of Slave Lake into High Prairie, north to Peace River, west to Fairview and finally south to Prairie, where it ends at an interchange with Highway 43. The section of Highway 2 between Calgary and Edmonton has been named the Elizabeth II Highway to commemorate the visit of the monarch in 2005.  Highway 2 is supplemented by two more highways that run parallel to it: Highway 22, west of Highway 2, known as Cowboy Trail, and Highway 21, east of Highway 2. Highway 43 travels northwest into Grande Prairie and the River Country; Highway 63 travels northeast to McMurray, the location of the Athabasca Oil Sands.Alberta has two main east-west corridors. The southern corridor, part of the Highway system, enters the province near Medicine Hat, runs westward through Calgary, and leaves Alberta through Banff National Park. The northern corridor, also part of the Trans-Canada network and known as the Highway (Highway 16), runs west from Lloydminster in eastern Alberta, through Edmonton and National Park into Columbia. One of the most scenic drives is along the Parkway, which runs for  between Jasper and Lake Louise, with mountain ranges and glaciers on either side of its entire length.Another major corridor through central Alberta is Highway 11 (also known as the David Thompson Highway), which runs east from the Saskatchewan River Crossing in Banff National Park through Mountain House and Red Deer, connecting with Highway 12  west of Stettler. The highway connects many of the smaller towns in central Alberta with Calgary and Edmonton, as it crosses Highway 2 just west of Red Deer.Urban stretches of Albertas major highways and freeways are often called trails. For example, Highway 2, the main north-south highway in the province, is called Trail as it passes through Calgary but becomes Trail (for southbound traffic) and Boulevard (for northbound traffic) as it enters Edmonton and then turns into St. Albert Trail as it leaves Edmonton for the City of St. Albert. Calgary, in particular, has a tradition of calling its largest urban expressways trails and naming many of them after prominent Nations individuals and tribes, such as Trail, Deerfoot Trail, and Trail.Calgary, Edmonton, Red Deer, Medicine Hat, and Lethbridge have substantial transit systems. In addition to buses, Calgary and Edmonton operate rail transit (LRT) systems. LRT, which is underground in the downtown core and on the surface outside of it, was the first of the modern generation of light rail systems to be built in North America, while the Calgary C-Train has one of the highest number of daily riders of any LRT system in North America.Alberta is well-connected by air, with airports in both Calgary and Edmonton. International Airport and International Airport are the fourth and fifth busiest in Canada respectively. Calgarys airport is a hub for WestJet Airlines and a regional hub for Canada. Calgarys airport primarily serves the Canadian prairie provinces (Alberta, Saskatchewan and Manitoba) for connecting flights to British Columbia, eastern Canada, 15 major US centres, nine European airports, one Asian airport and four destinations in Mexico and the Caribbean.()  Edmontons airport acts as a hub for the Canadian north and has connections to all major Canadian airports as well as 10 major US airports, 3 European airports and 6 Mexican and Caribbean airports.()There are over  of operating mainline railway, and many tourists see Alberta aboard Rail or Mountaineer. The Pacific Railway and National Railway companies operate railway freight across the province. Health care File:Alberta Childrens Hospital 3+4.jpg|thumb|220px|right|Childrens HospitalAs with all Canadian provinces, Alberta provides for all citizens and residents through a funded health care system. Alberta became Canadas second province (after Saskatchewan) to adopt a Douglas-style program in 1950, a precursor to the modern medicare system.Albertas health care budget is currently $13.2 billion during the 20082009 fiscal year (approximately 36% of all government spending), making it the best funded health care system per-capita in Canada. Every hour more than $1.5 million is spent on health care in the province.()File:University Hospital Complex University Of Alberta Edmonton Alberta Canada 02A.jpg|thumb|220px|left|of Alberta Hospital complex.A highly educated population and burgeoning economy have made Alberta a national leader in health education, research, and resources. Many notable facilities include the Medical Centre, the Lougheed Centre, General Hospital, Childrens Hospital, Grace Womens Health Centre, The University of Calgary Medical Centre (UCMC), Baker Cancer Centre and Cardiovascular Institute of Alberta, in Calgary; In Edmonton, the of Alberta Hospital,  the Royal Alexandra Hospital, the Alberta Heart Institute, the Lois Hole Hospital for Women, the Childrens Hospital, the Alberta Diabetes Institute, the Cancer Institute, and the Rexall Centre for Pharmacy and Health Research in Edmonton. Currently under construction in Edmonton is the new $909 million Clinic, which will provide a similar research, education, and care environment as the Clinic in the States.()Care in Alberta is administered by the unified Alberta Health Services Board. Prior to July 1, 2008, Alberta was divided into nine health regions: Regional Health Authority: Health Region, Health (Edmonton), Health, Thompson Regional Health Authority, Central Health, Lights Health Region, Health Region and Country Health Region.The Trauma Air Rescue Society, a nonprofit organization, provides an ambulance service to all but the most remote areas of Alberta, and some adjoining areas of British Columbia.() Government File:Edmonton leg.jpg|thumb|240px|right|Albertas Legislative Building in Edmonton.The government of Alberta is organized as a parliamentary democracy with a unicameral legislature.  Its unicameral legislaturethe Legislative Assemblyconsists of eighty-three members.Locally municipal governments and school boards are elected and operate separately. Their boundaries do not necessarily coincide.  Municipalities where the same body act as both local government and school board are formally referred to as counties in Alberta.As Canadas of state, Elizabeth II is the head of state for the Government of Alberta. Her duties in Alberta are carried out by Lieutenant Governor Ethell.  Although the lieutenant governor is technically the most powerful person in Alberta, he is in reality a figurehead whose actions are restricted by custom and constitutional convention.  The government is therefore headed by the premier. The current premier is Redford who was elected as leader of the governing Progressive Conservatives on October 1, 2011.  Redford was sworn in as the 14th of Alberta on October 7, 2011.The Premier is a Member of the Legislative Assembly, and he draws all the members of his Cabinet from among the members of the Legislative Assembly.The City of Edmonton is the seat of the provincial governmentthe capital of Alberta.Albertas elections tend to yield results which are much more conservative than those of other Canadian provinces. Alberta has traditionally had three political parties, the Progressive Conservatives (Conservatives or Tories), the Liberals, and the social democratic New Democrats. A fourth party, the strongly conservative Social Credit Party, was a power in Alberta for many decades, but fell from the political map after the Progressive Conservatives came to power in 1971. Since that time, no other political party has governed Alberta. In fact, only four parties have governed Alberta: the Liberals, from 1905 to 1921; the Farmers of Alberta, from 1921 to 1935; the Social Credit Party, from 1935 to 1971, and the currently governing Progressive Conservative Party, from 1971 to the present.Alberta has had occasional surges in separatist sentiment. Even during the 1980s, when these feelings were at their strongest, there has never been enough interest in secession to initiate any major movements or referendums. There are several groups wishing to promote the independence of Alberta in some form currently active in the province.In the 2008 provincial election, held on March 3, 2008, the Progressive Conservative Party was re-elected as a majority government with 72 of 83 seats, the Liberal Party was elected as the Official Opposition with nine members, and two New Democratic Party members were elected.() Education File:SAIT Heart Building 2.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Heritage Hall at Polytechnic.As with any Canadian province, the Alberta Legislature has (almost) exclusive authority to make laws respecting education. Since 1905 the Legislature has used this capacity to continue the model of locally elected public and separate school boards which originated prior to 1905, as well as to create and/or regulate universities, colleges, technical institutions and other educational forms and institutions (public charter schools, private schools, home schooling). Elementary schools There are forty-two public school jurisdictions in Alberta, and seventeen operating separate school jurisdictions. Sixteen of the operating separate school jurisdictions have a Catholic electorate, and one (St. Albert) has a Protestant electorate. In addition, one Protestant separate school district, Glen Avon, survives as a ward of the St. Paul Education Region. The City of Lloydminster straddles the Alberta/Saskatchewan border, and both the public and separate school systems in that city are counted in the above numbers: both of them operate according to Saskatchewan law.For many years the provincial government has funded the greater part of the cost of providing K12 education. Prior to 1994 public and separate school boards in Alberta had the legislative authority to levy a local tax on property, as supplementary support for local education. In 1994 the government of the province eliminated this right for public school boards, but not for separate school boards. Since 1994 there has continued to be a tax on property in support of K12 education; the difference is that the mill rate is now set by the provincial government, the money is collected by the local municipal authority and remitted to the provincial government. The relevant legislation requires that all the money raised by this property tax must go to the support of K12 education provided by school boards. The provincial government pools the property tax funds from across the province and distributes them, according to a formula, to public and separate school jurisdictions and Francophone authorities.Public and separate school boards, schools, and schools all follow the Program of Studies and the curriculum approved by the provincial department of education (Alberta Education). Home schoolers may choose to follow the Program of Studies or develop their own Program of Studies.  Public and separate schools, charter schools, and approved private schools all employ teachers who are certificated by Alberta Education, they administer Provincial Achievement Tests and Diploma Examinations set by Alberta Education, and they may grant high school graduation certificates endorsed by Alberta Education. Universities File:Saint Josephs College University Of Alberta Edmonton Alberta Canada 02A.jpg|thumb|230px|right|St. Josephs College at the of Alberta.The of Alberta, established in Edmonton in 1908, is Albertas oldest and largest university. The of Calgary, once affiliated with the University of Alberta, gained its autonomy in 1966 and is now the second largest university in Alberta. There is also University, which focuses on distance learning, and the of Lethbridge, both of which are located in their title cities.In early September 2009, Royal University became Calgarys second public university, and in late September 2009, a similar move made MacEwan University Edmontons second public university. There are 15 colleges that receive direct public funding, along with two technical institutes, Alberta Institute of Technology and Alberta Institute of Technology.()There is also a large and active private sector of post-secondary institutions, mostly Christian Universities, bringing the total number of universities to twelve, plus a University in Calgary, the only location in Canada. Students may also receive government loans and grants while attending selected private institutions. There has been some controversy in recent years over the rising cost of post-secondary education for students (as opposed to taxpayers). In 2005, Premier Klein made a promise that he would freeze tuition and look into ways of reducing schooling costs.() So far, no plan has been released by the government of Alberta. Culture File:StampedeRodeo2002.JPG|200px|right|thumb|The Stampede.Summer brings many festivals to the province of Alberta, especially in Edmonton. The Fringe Festival is the worlds  second largest after Edinburghs. Both Calgary and Edmonton host a number of annual festivals and events including folk music festivals. With a large number of summer and winter events, Edmonton prides itself as being the Festival City. The citys heritage days festival sees the participation of over 70 ethnic groups. Edmontons Churchill Square is home to a large number of the festivals, including the large Taste of Edmonton & Works Art & Design Festival throughout the summer months.The City of Calgary is also famous for its Stampede, dubbed The Greatest Outdoor Show on Earth. The Stampede is Canadas biggest rodeo festival and features various races and competitions, such as roping and riding. In line with the western tradition of rodeo are the cultural artisans that reside and create unique Alberta western heritage crafts.The Centre hosts a range of festivals and other events including the international Mountain Film Festival. These cultural events in Alberta highlight the provinces cultural diversity. Most of the major cities have several performing theatre companies who entertain in venues as diverse as Edmontons Arts Barns and the Winspear Centre for Music. Both Calgary and Edmonton are home to Football League and Hockey League teams. Soccer, union and lacrosse are also played professionally in Alberta.PaleontologyFile:Pachyrhinosaurus skull.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Pachyrhinosaurus skull. Large quantities of this genus are preserved in the Formation.Alberta has one of the greatest diversities and abundances of Cretaceous dinosaur fossils in the world.( Taxa are represented by complete fossil skeletons, isolated material, microvertebrate remains, and even mass graves.( At least 38 dinosaur specimens are known from the province.( The Formation, Formation and Park Formations collectively comprise the Judith River Group and are the most thoroughly studied dinosaur bearing strata in Alberta.( The stratigraphy of the River Group has a confusing history due partly to the use of the Montana-Alberta border as an artificial division between equivalent strata.( The modern Judith River Group stratigraphy was not finalized until 1993 when Eberth and Hamblin divided the Oldman Formation in two to create the new Dinosaur Park Formation.( The resulting paleontological confusion was resolved by Currie who relocated old quarries dinosaurs had been found in and determined their distribution within the modern stratigraphic framework.(Dinosaur-bearing strata are distributed widely through-out Alberta.( The Provincial Park area contains outcrops of the Dinosaur Park Formation and Oldman Formation.( In the central and southern regions of Alberta are intermittent Formation outcrops.( In the Valley and Edmonton regions there are exposed Horseshoe Canyon facies. Other formations have been recorded as well, like the Milk River and Foremost Formations.( However, these latter two have a lower diversity of documented dinosaurs, primarily due to their lower total fossil quantity and neglect from collectors who are hindered by the isolation and scarcity of exposed outcrops.( Their dinosaur fossils are primarily teeth recovered from microvertebrate fossil sites.( Additional geologic formations that have produced only few fossils are the River Group and Mary River Formations of the southwest and the northwestern Formation.( The Wapiti Formations contains two Pachyrhinosaurus bone beds that break its general trend of low productivity, however.( The Formation represents strata deposited during a transgression.( Dinosaurs are known from this Formation, but represent specimens washed out to sea or reworked from older sediments.(Ryan, M. J., and Russell, A. P., 2001. Dinosaurs of Alberta (exclusive of  Aves): In: Mesozoic Vertebrate Life, edited by Tanke, D. H., and Carpenter,  K., Indiana University Press, pp. 279-297.) Friendship partners Alberta has relationships with several provinces, states, and other entities worldwide.(Alberta Twinning Relationships. Retrieved on 12 Aug 2011.)*  Jalisco, Mexico, Special Relationships*  Hokkaido, Japan, Special Relationships*  Gyeongsangnam-do, Korea, Special Relationships*  KhantyMansi, Russia, Special Relationships*  Yamalo-Nenets, Russia, Special Relationships*  Neuqun, Argentina, Economic MOUs*  Mpumalanga, Africa, Governance Projects*  Heilongjiang, Republic of China, Special Relationships*  Tyumen, Russia, Special Relationships*  Montana, States of America, Transboundary Partnerships*  Gangwon-do, Korea, Special RelationshipsSee also References Further reading * postscript  * postscript   * postscript  * postscript  * postscript   * postscript    External links * Government of Alberta website* * Provincial Archives of Alberta website* Travel Alberta* Alberta Encyclopedia* CBC Digital ArchivesStriking Oil in Alberta* CBC Digital ArchivesElecting Dynasties: Alberta Campaigns 1935 to 2001* CBC Digital ArchivesAlberta @ 100list af:Albertaang:Albertaar:arc:ast:Albertaaz:Albertazh-min-nan:Albertabe-x-old:bs:Albertabr:Albertabg:ca:Albertacs:Albertaco:Albertacy:Albertada:Albertade:Albertaet:Albertael:es:Albertaeo:Albertoeu:Albertafa:fr:Albertafy:Albertaga:Albertagv:Albertagd:Albertagl:Albertahy:hi:hr:Albertaio:Albertaid:Albertaos:(fylki)it:Albertahe:jv:Albertakl:Albertakn:pam:Albertaka:kw:Albertasw:Albertala:Albertalv:Albertalt:Albertalij:Alberta(tartomny)mk:mr:mn:nah:Albertanl:Albertaja:frr:Albertano:Albertann:Albertaoc:Albrtapnb:pms:Albertapl:Albertapt:Albertaro:Albertaru:sah:sq:Albertasimple:Albertask:Alberta(provinca)sr:sh:Albertafi:Albertasv:Albertatl:Albertata:th:tr:Albertauk:ur:ug:Albrtavi:Albertavo:Albertafiu-vro:Albertawar:Albertayi:bat-smg:Albertazh:
737
Afghanistan
footnote1Afghanistan  (Persian/Pashto: , Afnistn), officially the Republic of Afghanistan, is a landlocked country in South and Asia.(( With a population of about 28 million, it has an area of 647,500 km, making it the 42nd most populous and 41st largest nation in the world. It is bordered by Pakistan in the southeast, Iran in the west, Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan and Tajikistan in the north, and the Republic of China in the far northeast. The territory that now forms Afghanistan has been an ancient focal point of the Road and migration. Archaeologists have found evidence of human habitation from as far back as 50,000 BC.() Urban civilization may have begun in the area as early as 3,000 to 2,000 BC.()The country sits at an important geostrategic location that connects the East with Central Asia and the subcontinent,() which has been home to various peoples through the ages.() The land has witnessed many military conquests since antiquity, notably by the Great, Maurya, and Khan.(( It has also served as a source from which local dynasties such as the Greco-Bactrians, Kushans, Saffarids, Ghaznavids, Ghorids, Timurids, Mughals and many others have established empires of their own.()The history of modern Afghanistan begins in 1709 with the rise of the Pashtuns, when the dynasty was established in Kandahar followed by Shah Durranis rise to power in 1747.()()() The capital of Afghanistan was shifted in 1776 from Kandahar to Kabul and part of the Afghan Empire was ceded to neighboring empires by 1893. In the late 19th century, Afghanistan became a state in the Great Game between the British and Russian empires.() On August 19, 1919, following the third Anglo-Afghan war and the signing of the of Rawalpindi, the nation regained control over its policy from the British.After the 1978 Marxist revolution, the Union began a 10 year war in which hundreds of thousands of Afghan civilians were killed. This was followed by the civil war (1992-1996), the rise and fall of the extremist Taliban government and the 2001-present war. In December 2001, the Nations Security Council authorized the creation of the Security Assistance Force (ISAF) to help maintain security in Afghanistan and assist the Karzai administration.() While NATO and other countries are rebuilding war-torn Afghanistan, terrorist groups such as the Talibans Shura and the network with alleged support and guidance from Pakistans powerful Intelligence (ISI) spy network are actively involved in a nationwide insurgency(, which includes countless assassinations and attacks. According to the Nations, the insurgents were responsible for 75% of civilian casualties in 2010 and 80% in 2011.((EtymologyThe name Afghnistn (, )(Cowan, William and Jaromira Rakuan. Source Book for Linguistics. 3rd ed. Amsterdam and Philadelphia: John Benjamins, 1998.) means Land of the Afghans(), which originates from the ethnonym Afghan. The first part of the name Afghan designates the people since ancient times, the founders and the largest ethnic group of Afghanistan.() This name is mentioned in the form of Abgan in the 3rd century CE() and as Avagana or Afghana in the 6th century CE.( A people called the Afghans are mentioned several times in a 10th century geography book, al-alam, particularly where a reference is made to a village.Saul, a pleasant village on a mountain. In it live Afghans.() Al-Biruni referred to them in the 11th century as various tribes living on the western frontier mountains of the River, which would be the Mountains.() Battuta, a famous Moroccan scholar visiting the region in 1333, writes: We travelled on to Kabul, formerly a vast town, the site of which is now occupied by a village inhabited by a tribe of Persians called Afghans. They hold mountains and defiles and possess considerable strength, and are mostly highwaymen. Their principle mountain is called Kuh Sulayman.(File:Afghan royal soldiers of the Durrani Empire.jpg|140px|left|thumb|Afghan soldiers of the Empire. The name Afghaunistan is written on this 1847 Lithograph by James Rattray.One prominent 16th century Persian scholar explains extensively about the Afghans. For example, he writes:It is widely accepted that the terms Pashtun and Afghan are synonyms. In the writings of the 17th-century Pashto poet Khan Khattak it is mentioned:The last part of the name, -stn is a suffix for place, prominent in many languages of the region. The name Afghanistan is described by the 16th century Mughal Emperor Babur in his memoirs as well as by the later Persian scholar Firishta and Baburs descendants, referring to the traditional ethnic Afghan (Pashtun) territories between the Kush mountains and the River.() In the early 19th century, Afghan politicians decided to adopt the name Afghanistan for the entire Afghan Empire after its English translation had already appeared in various treaties with Qajarid Persia and British India.(E. Huntington, The Anglo-Russian Agreement as to Tibet, Afghanistan, and Persia, Bulletin of the American Geographical Society, Vol. 39, No. 11 (1907).) In 1857, in his review of J.W. Kayes The Afghan War, Engels describes Afghanistan as:The Afghan kingdom was sometimes refered to as the Kingdom of Kabul, as mentioned by the British statesman and historian Elphinstone.(Elphinstone, M., Account of the Kingdom of Cabul and its Dependencies in Persia and India, London 1815; published by Longman, Hurst, Rees, Orme & Brown.) Afghanistan was officially recognized as a state by the international community after the signing of the 1919 of Rawalpindi.(M. Ali, Afghanistan: The War of Independence, 1919, Kabul s.n., 1960.)(Afghanistans Constitution of 1923 under King Amanullah Khan (English translation).)GeographyA landlocked mountainous country with plains in the north and southwest, Afghanistan is described as being located within Asia()()(BBC: Afghanistan country profile; Britannica: Afghanistan; Center for South Asia Outreach; World Bank; U.S. maps; Syracuse University.) or Asia.() It is part of the Middle East world, which lies between latitudes 29 and 39 N, and longitudes 60 and 75 E. The countrys highest point is Nowshak, at 7,485 m (24,557 ft) above sea level. It has a continental climate with very harsh winters in the central highlands, the glaciated northeast (around Nuristan) and the Corridor, where the average temperature in January is below , and hot summers in the low-lying areas of the Basin of the southwest, the Jalalabad basin in the east, and the Turkistan plains along the River in the north, where temperatures average over  in July.File:Landscape in Paktia Province.jpg|thumb|left|Snow-covered mountains of AfghanistanDespite having numerous rivers and reservoirs, large parts of the country are dry. The endorheic Sistan Basin is one of the driest regions in the world.() Afghanistan does not face water shortages because it receives plenty of snow during winter, especially in the Kush and Mountains, and the melting snow in the spring time enters the rivers, lakes, and streams. However, most of the countrys water (approx. 70%) flows into neighboring countries of Iran, Pakistan, Turkmenistan, and others or end up at dry deserts. The state needs more than $2 billion to rehabilitate its irrigation systems so that the water is properly managed.()At , Afghanistan is the worlds 41st largest country (before France and after Burma). It is about the size of Texas in the United States. It borders Pakistan in the east and south, Iran in the west, Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan and Tajikistan in the north, and China in the far east. The country is sometimes subjected to earthquakes, mainly in the northeastern Hindu Kush mountain range. Some 125 villages were damaged and over 4,000 people killed by two earthquakes in 1998. The countrys natural resources include: coal, copper, ore, lithium, uranium, earth elements, chromite, gold, zinc, talc, barites, sulfur, lead, marble, precious and stones, gas, and petroleum among other things.((( It was revealed recently that the country has about $13 trillion worth of lithium and other rare earth elements.()()((Afghanistans Buried Riches. Sarah Simpson. Scientific American, October 2011, pp. 42-49.)HistoryExcavations of prehistoric sites by Louis Dupree and others suggest that humans were living in what is now Afghanistan at least 50,000 years ago, and that farming communities in the area were among the earliest in the world.((John Ford Shroder, University of Nebraska. Archived October 31, 2009.)(Nancy H. Dupree (1973): An Historical Guide To Afghanistan, Chapter 3 Sites in Perspective.) An important site of early historical activities, many say that Afghanistan compares to Egypt in terms of the historical value of its archaeological sites.() Afghanistan is at a unique nexus point where numerous civilizations have interacted and often fought. It has been home to various peoples through the ages, among them the Iranian peoples who established the dominant role of languages in the region. At multiple points, the land has been incorporated within large regional empires, among them the Empire, the Macedonian Empire, the Indian Maurya Empire, the Islamic Empire and the Sassanid Empire. Many kingdoms have also risen to power in what is now Afghanistan, such as the Greco-Bactrians, Kushans, Hephthalites, Shahis, Saffarids, Samanids, Ghaznavids, Ghurids, Kartids, Timurids, Mughals, and finally the Hotaki and Durrani dynasties that marked the political origins of the modern state of Afghanistan.Pre-Islamic periodArchaeological exploration done in the 20th century suggests that the geographical area of Afghanistan has been closely connected by the culture of and trade with neighboring regions to the east, west, and north. Artifacts typical of the Paleolithic, Mesolithic, Neolithic, Bronze, and ages have been found in Afghanistan.(Library of Congress Country Studies on Afghanistan, Pre-Islamic Period, by Craig Baxter (1997).) Urban civilization may have begun as early as 3000 BCE, and the early city of Mundigak (near Kandahar in the south of the country) may have been a colony of the nearby Valley Civilization.( After 2000 BCE, successive waves of semi-nomadic people from Central Asia moved south into the boundaries of modern Afghanistan, among them were many Indo-European-speaking Indo-Iranians.( These tribes later migrated further south to India, west to what is now Iran, and towards Europe via the area north of the Caspian.(Bryant, Edwin F. (2001) The quest for the origins of Vedic culture: the Indo-Aryan migration debate Oxford University Press, Oxford, England, ISBN 0-19-513777-9.) The region was called Ariana.((Afghanistan: ancient Ariana (1950), Information Bureau, London, p3.)(M. Witzel, The Vdvda list obviously was composed or redacted by someone who regarded Afghanistan and the lands surrounding it as the home of all Indo-Iranians (airiia), that is of all (eastern) Iranians, with Airiianem Vajah as their center. page 48, The Home Of The Aryans, Festschrift J. Narten  Mnchener Studien zur Sprachwissenschaft, Beihefte NF 19, Dettelbach: J.H. Rll 2000, 283338. Also published online, at University (LINK))File:AsokaKandahar.jpg|thumb|left|Bilingual (Greek and Aramaic) edict by Emperor Ashoka  from the century BC was discovered in the southern city of Kandahar.The ancient Zoroastrianism religion is believed by some to have originated in what is now Afghanistan between 1800 and 800 BCE, as its founder Zoroaster is thought to have lived and died in Balkh.(Library of Congress Country Studies on Afghanistan, Achaemenid Rule, ca. 550-331 B.C.)(The history of Afghanistan, Ghandara.com website.)(Afghanistan: Achaemenid dynasty rule, Ancient Classical History, about.com.) Ancient Eastern Iranian languages may have been spoken in the region around the time of the rise of Zoroastrianism. By the middle of the 6th century BCE, the Achaemenid Persian Empire overthrew the Medes and incorporated the region (known as Arachosia, Aria, and Bactria in Greek) within its boundaries. An inscription on the tombstone of King I of Persia mentions the Kabul Valley in a list of the 29 countries he had conquered.(Nancy H. Dupree, An Historical Guide to Kabul)the Great and his Macedonian army arrived in the area of Afghanistan in 330 BCE after defeating III of Persia a year earlier in the of Gaugamela.( Following Alexanders brief occupation, the successor state of the Empire controlled the area until 305 BCE when they gave much of it to the Indian Empire as part of an alliance treaty.64 BC  24 AD The Mauryans brought Buddhism from India and controlled the area south of the Hindu Kush until about 185 BCE when they were overthrown.( Their decline began 60 years after Ashokas rule ended, leading to the Hellenistic reconquest of the region by the Greco-Bactrians. Much of it soon broke away from the Greco-Bactrians and became part of the Indo-Greek Kingdom. The Indo-Greeks had been defeated and expelled by the Indo-Scythians in the late 2nd century BCE.During the 1st century BCE, the Empire subjugated the region, but lost it to their Indo-Parthian vassals. In the mid to late 1st century CE the vast Empire, centered in modern Afghanistan, became great patrons of Buddhist culture. The Kushans were defeated by the Sassanids in the 3rd century CE. Although various rulers calling themselves Kushanshas (generally known as the Indo-Sassanids) continued to rule at least parts of the region, they were probably more or less subject to the Sassanids.(Dani, A. H. and B. A. Litvinsky. The Kushano-Sasanian Kingdom. In: History of civilizations of Central Asia, Volume III. The crossroads of civilizations: A.D. 250 to 750. Litvinsky, B. A., ed., 1996. Paris: UNESCO Publishing, pp. 103118. ISBN 92-3-103211-9.) The late Kushans were followed by the Kidarite Huns(Zeimal, E. V. The Kidarite Kingdom in Central Asia. In: History of civilizations of Central Asia, Volume III. The crossroads of civilizations: A.D. 250 to 750. Litvinsky, B. A., ed., 1996, Paris: UNESCO Publishing, pp. 119133. ISBN 92-3-103211-9.) who, in turn, were replaced by the short-lived but powerful Hephthalites, as rulers in the first half of the 5th century.(Litvinsky, B. A. The Hephthalite Empire. In: History of civilizations of Central Asia, Volume III. The crossroads of civilizations: A.D. 250 to 750. Litvinsky, B. A., ed., 1996, Paris: UNESCO Publishing, pp. 135162. ISBN 92-3-103211-9.) The Hephthalites were defeated by I in CE 557, who re-established Sassanid power in Persia. However, in the 6th century CE, the successors to the Kushans and Hepthalites established a small dynasty in Kabulistan called Shahi.Islamization and Mongol invasionBetween the fourth and nineteenth centuries, much of modern Afghanistan was known by the regional name as Khorasan.()() Two of the four main capitals of Khorasan (i.e. Balkh, Merv, Nishapur and Herat) are now located in modern Afghanistan, while Kandahar, Zabulistan, Ghazni and Kabulistan formed the frontier between Khorasan and Hindustan.() The land inhabited by the Afghan tribes (i.e. ancestors of modern Pashtuns) was called Afghanistan, which loosely covered the area between the Kush and the River, with the Mountains being the center.()()File:Herat Masjidi Jami courtyard.jpg|thumb|Built during the Ghurids era, the Mosque of Herat or Masjid Jami is one of the oldest mosques in Afghanistan.Arab Muslims brought the message of Islam to the western area of what is now Afghanistan during the 7th century and began spreading eastward, some of the native inhabitants they encountered accepted it while others revolted.() Afghanistan at that time was Zoroastrian, Buddhist and Hindu, with smaller populations of Jews, Christians and others.() The Shahi rulers lost their Kabul capital in around 870 AD after it was conquered by the Saffarid Muslims of Zaranj. Later, the Samanids extended their Islamic influence into the Hindu Kush area from Bukhara in the north. It is reported that Muslims and non-Muslims lived side by side.921 ADAfghanistan became one of the main centers in the world during the Golden Age.()( By the 11th century the Ghaznavids had finally Islamized all of the remaining non-Muslim areas, with the exception of the Kafiristan region. They were replaced by the Ghurids who expanded and advanced the already powerful empire. In 1219 AD, Khan and his Mongol barbarians overran the region. His troops are said to have annihilated the Khorasanian cities of Herat and Balkh.(Central Asian world cities. Faculty.washington.edu.) The destruction caused by the Mongols depopulated major cities and forced many of the locals to revert to an agrarian rural society.(Obamas war: Deploying 17,000 raises stakes in Afghanistan. USATODAY.com. February 18, 2009.) Mongol rule continued with the Ilkhanate in the northwest while the dynasty controlled the Afghan tribal areas south of the Hindu Kush, until the invasion of Timur who established the dynasty in 1370.(Timurid Dynasty, Encyclopdia Britannica Online Edition.) During the Ghaznavid, Ghurid, and Timurid eras, Afghanistan produced many fine Islamic architectural monuments as well as numerous scientific and literary works.Babur, a descendant of both Timur and Genghis Khan, arrived from Central Asia and captured Kabul from the Arghun dynasty, and from there he began to seize control of the central and eastern territories of Afghanistan. He remained in Kabulistan until 1526 when he and his army invaded Delhi in India to replace the Afghan dynasty with the Empire. From the 16th century to the early 18th century, Afghanistan was part of three regional kingdoms: the of Bukhara in north, the Safavids in the west and the remaining larger area was ruled by the Sultanate.Afghan nation-stateHotaki dynasty and the Durrani EmpireFile:Mirwais-Hotak.jpeg|thumb|upright|Hotak revolted against the Safavid rule and declared the Kandahar region an independent Afghan kingdom in 1709, which was later expanded by his son Mahmud to include Persia.Hotak, seen as Afghanistans Washington(), successfully rebelled against the Persian Safavids in 1709. He overthrew and killed Gurgin Khan, and made the Afghan region independent from Persia. By 1713, Mirwais had decisively defeated two larger Persian armies, one was led by Khusraw Khn (nephew of Gurgin) and the other by Rustam Khn. The armies were sent by Husayn, the Shah in Isfahan (now Iran), to re-take control of the Kandahar region.() Mirwais died of a natural cause in 1715 and was succeeded by his brother Abdul Aziz followed by his son Mahmud. In 1722, Mahmud led an Afghan army to the Persian capital of Isfahan, sacked the city after the of Gulnabad and proclaimed himself King of Persia.( The Persians were disloyal to the Afghan rulers, and after the massacre of thousands of religious scholars, nobles, and members of the Safavid family, the dynasty was ousted from Persia after the 1729 of Damghan.()In 1738, Shah and his Afsharid forces captured Kandahar from Shah Hotaki, at which point the incarcerated 16 year old Shah Durrani was freed and made the commander of Nader Shahs four thousand Abdali Afghans.() From Kandahar they set out to conquer India, passing through Ghazni, Kabul, Lahore and ultimately plundering Delhi after the of Karnal. Nader Shah and his army abandoned Delhi but took with them huge treasure, which included the Koh-i-Noor and Noor diamonds.()After the death of Nader Shah in 1747, the Afghans gathered near Kandahar at a jirga (grand assembly) to select their of state from a group of generals and Ahmad Shah Durrani was chosen. Regarded as the founder of modern Afghanistan,()()() Durrani and his Afghan army conquered the entire present-day Afghanistan, Pakistan, Khorasan and Kohistan provinces of Iran, along with Delhi in India.() He defeated the Sikhs of the Empire in the region nine times, one of the biggest battles was the 1761 Battle of Panipat. In October 1772, Ahmad Shah Durrani died of a natural cause and was buried at a site now adjacent to the of the Cloak in Kandahar. He was succeeded by his son, Shah Durrani, who transferred the capital of Afghanistan from Kandahar to Kabul in 1776. After Timur Shahs death in 1793, the Durrani throne was passed down to his son Zaman Shah followed by Mahmud Shah, Shuja Shah and others. The Afghan Empire was under threat in the early 1800s by the Sikhs in the east and the Persians in the west. The western province of Herat was invaded by the Persians but was successfully fought off by Fateh Khan, brother of Mohammad Khan. The Sikhs, under Singh, invaded Afghanistans Pakhtunkhwa region in 1809.(Nalwa, V. (2009), Hari Singh Nalwa  Champion of the Khalsaji, New Delhi: Manohar, p. 18, ISBN 81-7304-785-5.) Fateh Khan was defeated by Singh Nalwa in the 1813 of Attock.() Fateh Khan had installed 21 of his brothers in positions of power throughout the Afghan Empire. After his death, they rebelled and divided up the provinces of the empire between themselves. During this turbulent period, Afghanistan had many temporary rulers until Dost Mohammad Khans take over in 1826.( The Afghan army descended in 1837 through the Pass on Sikh forces at Jamrud. The Sikhs held off the Afghan offensive for over a week  the time it took reinforcements to reach Jamrud from Lahore.(Nalwa, V. (2009), Hari Singh Nalwa  Champion of the Khalsaji, New Delhi: Manohar, p. 198, ISBN 81-7304-785-5.) By this time the British had reached the area from the east, which initiated the Anglo-Afghan War (1839-1842).Barakzai dynasty and Western influenceFile:Kandahar-1881.jpg|thumb|British and allied forces at Kandahar after the 1880 of Kandahar, during the Anglo-Afghan War. The large defensive wall around the city was removed in the early 1930s by the order of King Nadir Shah, the father of King Zahir Shah.Following the Anglo-Afghan War and the ascension of the dynasty, Afghanistan saw much of its territory and autonomy ceded to British India. Ethnic Pashtun territories were divided by the 1893 Line, an action which would lead to strained relations between Afghanistan and British India (later the new state of Pakistan). The United Kingdom exercised a great deal of influence, and it was not until the reign of King Khan in 1919 that Afghanistan re-gained independence over its foreign affairs after the signing of the of Rawalpindi.File:Bundesarchiv Bild 102-05493, Berlin, Besuch Knig von Afghanistan.jpg|thumb|left|King Khan at Berlin in February 1928. His 192728 European tour initiated an alliance between Afghanistan and Germany.King Amanullah moved to end his countrys traditional isolation in the years following the Anglo-Afghan War. He established diplomatic relations with major states and, following a 192728 tour of Europe and Turkey, introduced several reforms intended to modernize his nation. A key force behind these reforms was Tarzi, an ardent supporter of the education of women. He fought for Article 68 of Afghanistans first constitution (declared through a Jirga), which made elementary education compulsory.(Education in Afghanistan, published in Encyclopdia Iranica, volume VIII  pp. 237241...UIUC.edu.) Some of the reforms that were actually put in place, such as the abolition of the traditional burqa for women and the opening of a number of co-educational schools, quickly alienated many tribal and religious leaders. Faced with overwhelming armed opposition, Amanullah Khan was forced to abdicate in January 1929 after Kabul fell to rebel forces led by Kalakani. Prince Nadir Shah, Amanullahs cousin, in turn defeated and killed Habibullah Kalakani in November 1929, and was declared King Nadir Shah. He abandoned the reforms of Amanullah Khan in favor of a more gradual approach to modernisation. In 1933, however, he was assassinated in a revenge killing by a Kabul student. Zahir Shah, Nadir Shahs 19-year-old son, succeeded to the throne and reigned from 1933 to 1973. Until 1946 Zahir Shah ruled with the assistance of his uncle, who held the post of Prime Minister and continued the policies of Nadir Shah. Another of Zahir Shahs uncles, Mahmud Khan, became Prime Minister in 1946 and began an experiment allowing greater political freedom, but reversed the policy when it went further than he expected. He was replaced in 1953 by Daoud Khan, the kings cousin and brother-in-law. Daoud Khan sought a closer relationship with the Union and a more distant one towards Pakistan. Afghanistan remained neutral and was neither a participant in War II, nor aligned with either power bloc in the War. However, it was a beneficiary of the latter rivalry as both the Soviet Union and the United States vied for influence by building Afghanistans main highways, airports and other vital infrastructure. By the late 1960s, many Western travelers were using these as part of the trail. In 1973, while King Zahir Shah was on an official overseas visit, Daoud Khan launched a bloodless coup and became the first of Afghanistan.Marxist revolution and Soviet warFile:Day after Saur revolution in Kabul (773).jpg|thumb|Outside the Presidential Palace (Arg) in Kabul, a day after the Marxist revolution in April 1978.In 1978, a prominent member of the Democratic Party of Afghanistan (PDPA), Akbar Khyber, was allegedly killed by the Daoud government. Leaders of the PDPA feared that Daoud was planning to dismantle them because many were being arrested. Amin along with other PDPA members managed to remain at large and organised an uprising. The PDPA, led by Mohammad Taraki, Karmal and Hafizullah Amin, overthrew the regime of Mohammad Daoud, who was assassinated along with his family and relatives. Taraki was declared President, Prime Minister and General Secretary of the PDPA. He moved to carry out an ill-conceived reform, which was misunderstood by virtually all Afghans.() The PDPA imprisoned, tortured and murdered thousands of members of the traditional elite, the religious establishment, and the intelligentsia.( They also prohibited usury() and made a number of statements on womens rights, by declaring equality of the sexes( and introducing women to political life. Ratebzad was one of several female Marxist leaders and a member of the Revolutionary Council.troops (in right row) withdrawing from Afghanistan in 1988. Afghan military BTR on the left.As part of its War strategy, the United States strengthened political ties with Pakistan althought Brzezinski, National Security Advisor to U.S. President Carter, has warned that this might prompt a Soviet intervention.(French journal: Le Nouvel Observateur, 1521 January 1998. in an interview, Brzezinski claimed that these measures were in fact specifically designed to provoke a Soviet military intervention. http://contreinfo.info/article.php3?id_article1403%E2%80%B3) The Intelligence Agency (CIA) began using Pakistans Intelligence (ISI) as a proxy network to recruit, finance and arm the multi-national Mujahideen fighters inside Pakistan, which was aimed to prevent the Soviet Union from reaching the oil-rich Gulf through Balochistan. In March 1979, Hafizullah Amin took over as Prime Minister of Afghanistan, retaining the position of marshal and becoming Vice-President of the Supreme Defence Council. Taraki remained the president and in control of the army until he was killed in September 1979.To bolster the Parcham faction and as part of its Cold War strategy to ultimately reach Gwadar in Balochistan, the Soviet Union decided to invade Afghanistan in December 1979 by sending over 100,000 soldiers of the Army to its southern neighbor. In the meantime, Hafizullah Amin was killed and replaced by Babrak Karmal. In response to all these, the Reagan administration in the U.S. increased arming and funding of the Mujahideen, thanks in large part to the efforts of Charlie Wilson and CIA officer Avrakotos. Early reports estimated $620 billion() but more recent reports suggest that up to $40 billion were provided by the U.S. and Arabia to Pakistan.()() This was in the forms of cash and weapons, which included over two thousand Stinger missiles. The money and weapons were directly given to Armed Forces, which was distributed by its ISI network to various Mujahideen groups although much of it was secretly kept for Pakistans own defense and other purposes. Despite receiving only minor aid compared to leaders of other Mujahideen groups, Shah Massoud was named the Afghan who won the cold war by the Wall Street Journal.()The 10-year Soviet war resulted in the killings of between 600,000 to as high as 2 million Afghans, mostly civilians.() About 6million fled to Pakistan and Iran, and from there tens of thousands began immigrating to the Union, United States, Australia and other parts of the world.(Refugee Admissions Program for Near East and South Asia. Bureau of Population, Refugees, and Migration.) Faced with mounting international pressure and great number of casualties on both sides, the Soviets withdrew in 1989 but continued to support Afghan President Najibullah until 1992.(Afghanistan: History, Columbia Encyclopedia.)Foreign interference and civil war199296After the fall of the communist Najibullah-regime in 1992, the Afghan political parties agreed on a peace and power-sharing agreement (the Peshawar Accords). The Peshawar Accords created the State of Afghanistan and appointed an government for a transitional period, under President Rabbani. According to Rights Watch:Gulbuddin Hekmatyar received operational, financial and military support from Pakistan.() Afghanistan expert Saikal concludes in Modern Afghanistan: A History of Struggle and Survival:In addition, Arabia and Iran  as competitors for regional hegemony  supported Afghan militias hostile towards each other.() According to Human Rights Watch, Iran was assisting the Shia Hazara Wahdat forces of Ali Mazari, as Iran was attempting to maximize Wahdats military power and influence.()((GUTMAN, Roy (2008): How We Missed the Story: Osama Bin Laden, the Taliban and the Hijacking of Afghanistan, Endowment of the United States Institute of Peace, 1st ed., Washington D.C.) Saudi Arabia supported the Wahhabite Rasul Sayyaf and his Islami faction.(( Conflict between the two militias soon escalated into a full-scale war. A publication by the Washington University describes:Outside forces saw instability in Afghanistan as an opportunity to press their own security and political agendas.()Due to the sudden initiation of the war, working government departments, police units or a system of justice and accountability for the newly-created Islamic State of Afghanistan did not have time to form. Atrocities were committed by individuals of the different armed factions while Kabul descended into lawlessness and chaos as described in reports by Human Rights Watch and the Afghanistan Justice Project.(() Because of the chaos, some leaders increasingly had only nominal control over their (sub-)commanders.() For civilians there was little security from murder, rape and extortion.( An estimated 25,000 people died during the most intense period of bombardment by Hekmatyars Hezb-i Islami and the Milli forces of Rashid Dostum, who had created an alliance with Hekmatyar in 1994.( Half a million people fled Afghanistan.( Human Rights Watch writes:Southern Afghanistan was under the control of neither foreign-backed militias nor the government in Kabul, but was ruled by local leaders such as Agha Sherzai and their militias. In 1994, the Taliban (a movement originating from Ulema-e-Islam-run religious schools for Afghan refugees in Pakistan) also developed in Afghanistan as a politico-religious force, reportedly in opposition to the tyranny of the local governor.(Matinuddin, Kamal, The Taliban Phenomenon, Afghanistan 19941997, University Press, (1999), pp. 2526) Mullah Omar started his movement with fewer than 50 armed madrassah students in his hometown of Kandahar.( When the Taliban took control of the city in 1994, they forced the surrender of dozens of local Pashtun leaders who had presided over a situation of complete lawlessness and atrocities.( In 1994, the Taliban took power in several provinces in southern and central Afghanistan.In late 1994, most of the militia factions (Hezb-i Islami, Junbish-i Milli and Hezb-i Wahdat) which had been fighting in the battle for control of Kabul were defeated militarily by forces of the Islamic States of Defense Shah Massoud. Bombardment of the capital came to a halt.((Amnesty International. Document  Afghanistan: further information on fear for safety and new concern: Deliberate and arbitrary killings: Civilians in Kabul. 16 November 1995 Accessed at: Amnesty.org)() The Islamic State government took steps to restore law and order.(BBC Newsnight 1995) Courts started to work again.( Massoud tried to initiate a nationwide process with the goal of national consolidation and democratic elections, also inviting the Taliban to join the process.() The Taliban declined.(Taliban Emirate and United Front19962001File:Massoud and Qadir 2.PNG|thumb|Haji Abdul Qadir (left) shaking hands with Shah Massoud (right). They were both anti-Taliban leaders, Massoud was assassinated on 9 September 2001 by two al-Qaeda associates and is now recognized as a National Hero in Afghanistan, and Qadir was assassinated in July 2002.The Taliban started shelling Kabul in early 1995 but were defeated by forces of the Islamic State government under Shah Massoud.( see video International, referring to the Taliban offensive, wrote in a 1995 report:The Talibans early victories in 1994 were followed by a series of defeats that resulted in heavy losses.( Pakistan provided strong support to the Taliban.(() Many analysts like Saikal describe the Taliban as developing into a proxy force for Pakistans regional interests which the Taliban decline.(On September 26, 1996, as the Taliban with military support by Pakistan and financial support by Saudi Arabia prepared for another major offensive, Massoud ordered a full retreat from Kabul.(Coll, Ghost Wars (New York: Penguin, 2005), 14.) The Taliban seized Kabul on September 27, 1996, and established the Emirate of Afghanistan. They imposed on the parts of Afghanistan under their control their political and judicial interpretation of Islam issuing edicts forbidding women to work outside the home, attend school, or to leave their homes unless accompanied by a male relative.() The Physicians for Human Rights (PHR) analyze:After the fall of Kabul to the Taliban on September 27, 1996,( ) Ahmad Shah Massoud and Abdul Rashid Dostum, two former archnemesis, created the United Front (Northern Alliance) against the Taliban that were preparing offensives against the remaining areas under the control of Massoud and those under the control of Dostum. see video The United Front included beside the dominantly Tajik forces of Massoud and the Uzbek forces of Dostum, Hazara factions and Pashtun forces under the leadership of commanders such as Abdul Haq, Haji Abdul Qadir, Qari Baba or diplomat Rahim Ghafoorzai.According to Human Rights Watch, in late May 1997, some 3,000 captive Taliban soldiers were summarily executed in and around Mazar-i-Sharif by Dostums Junbish forces and members of the Shia Hazara Wahdat faction.(() The Taliban defeated Dostums Junbish forces militarily by seizing Mazar-i-Sharif in 1998. Dostum went into exile.According to a 55-page report by the UN, the Taliban, while trying to consolidate control over northern and western Afghanistan, committed systematic massacres against civilians.()() U.N. officials stated that there had been 15 massacres between 1996 and 2001.(( They also said, that these have been highly systematic and they all lead back to the Taliban Ministry of Defense or to Mullah Omar himself.(( The Taliban especially targeted people of Shia religious or Hazara ethnic background.(( Upon taking Mazar-i-Sharif in 1998, about 4,000 civilians were executed by the Taliban and many more reported tortured.()() The documents also reveal the role of Arab and Pakistani support troops in these killings.(( Bin Ladens so-called Brigade was responsible for mass-killings of Afghan civilians.() The report by the UN quotes eyewitnesses in many villages describing Arab fighters carrying long knives used for slitting throats and skinning people.((Pakistani President Musharraf  then as Chief of Army Staff  was responsible for sending thousands of Pakistanis to fight alongside the Taliban and Bin Laden against the forces of Massoud.(((() In total there were believed to be 28,000 Pakistani nationals, many either from the Corps or army, fighting inside Afghanistan.( An estimated 8,000 Pakistani militants were recruited in madrassas filling the ranks of the estimated 25,000 regular Taliban force.( A 1998 document by the State Department confirms that 2040 percent of regular Taliban soldiers are Pakistani.( The document further states that the parents of those Pakistani nationals know nothing regarding their childs military involvement with the Taliban until their bodies are brought back to Pakistan.(From 1996 to 2001 the Qaeda of Bin Laden and al-Zawahiri became a state within the Taliban state.() Bin Laden sent Arab recruits to join the fight against the United Front.(()3,000 fighters of the regular Taliban army were Arab and Central Asian militants.(  In total, of roughly 45,000 Pakistani, Taliban and Al-Qaeda soldiers fighting against the forces of Massoud only 14,000 were Afghan.((Ahmad Shah Massoud remained the only leader of the United Front in Afghanistan. In the areas under his control Massoud set up democratic institutions and signed the Rights Declaration.() Human Rights Watch cites no human rights crimes for the forces under direct control of Massoud for the period from October 1996 until the assassination of Massoud in September 2001.( As a consequence many civilians fled to the area of Shah Massoud.()() In total, estimates range up to one million people fleeing the Taliban.() Geographic concluded in its documentary Inside the Taliban::In early 2001 Massoud addressed the Parliament in Brussels asking the international community to provide humanitarian help to the people of Afghanistan.( He stated that the Taliban and Qaeda had introduced a very wrong perception of Islam and that without the support of Pakistan and Bin Laden the Taliban would not be able to sustain their military campaign for up to a year.( On this visit to Europe he also warned that his intelligence had gathered information about a large-scale attack on U.S. soil being imminent.(Defense Intelligence Agency (2001) report gwu.edu)Recent history (2001present)On 9 September 2001, Shah Massoud was assassinated by two Arab attackers inside Afghanistan and two days later about 3,000 people became victims of the 11, 2001 attacks in the United States. Then US President W. Bush accused bin Laden and Sheikh Mohammed as the faces behind the attacks. When the Taliban refused to hand over bin Laden to US authorities and to disband al-Qaeda bases in Afghanistan, the US and British air forces began bombing al-Qaeda and Taliban targets inside Afghanistan during Enduring Freedom.() American and British special forces along with the CIA Activities Division units worked with commanders of the United Front (Northern Alliance) to launch a military offensive against the Taliban.(First In: An insiders account of how the CIA spearheaded the War on Terror in Afghanistan by Gary Schroen, 2005) This led to the of Mazar-i-Sharif and Kabul in November 2001, as the Taliban and al-Qaida crossed over the porous Line border into Pakistan. In December 2001, after the Taliban government was toppled and the new Afghan government under Karzai was formed, the Security Assistance Force (ISAF) was established by the Security Council to help assist the Karzai administration and provide basic security to the Afghan people.(  (UNSCR 1386))()Choppers in Afghanistan 2008.jpg|thumb|US Army Chinook helicopters on their way to Bagram Air BaseFile:Afghan soldiers.jpg|thumb|Soldiers of the National Army, including the Commando Battalion standing in the front.File:Five suspected militants detained with 33 suicide vests in August 2011.jpg|thumb|left|Five Taliban insurgents detained with 33 suicide vests and 1,000 kg of explosives. In most cases, the insurgents are poor and uneducated people who are misled bymullahs that killing civilians and ISAF members in a suicide bombing will instantly earn them a place in paradise.()()File:Mullen-Petraeus-Mattis-Allen-Hill-Langheld in Kabul.jpg|thumb|Clockwise: Admiral and of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Mike Mullen, standing with other top NATO military officials including Petraeus, Mattis, John Allen, Marvin Hill and Langheld of the Army.While the Taliban began regrouping inside Pakistan, more coalition troops entered the escalating US-led war. Meanwhile, the rebuilding of war-torn Afghanistan kicked off in 2002.()() The Afghan nation was able to build democratic structures over the years, and some progress was made in key areas such as governance, economy, health, education, transport, and agriculture. NATO is training the Afghan armed forces as well its national police. ISAF and Afghan troops led many offensives against the Taliban but failed to fully defeat them. By 2009, a Taliban-led shadow government began to form in many parts of the country complete with their own version of mediation court.() As a result of this and other reasons, U.S. President Obama deployed another 30,000 soldiers in 2010 for a period of two years.At the 2010 International Conference on Afghanistan in London, Afghan President Hamid Karzai said he intends to reach out to the Taliban leadership (including Mullah Omar, Haqqani and Hekmatyar). Supported by NATO, Karzai called on the groups leadership to take part in a jirga meeting to initiate peace talks. These steps have resulted in an intensification of bombings, assassinations and ambushes.() Some Afghan groups (including the former intelligence chief Saleh and opposition leader Dr. Abdullah) believe that Karzai plans to appease the insurgents senior leadership at the cost of the democratic constitution, the democratic process and progess in the field of human rights especially womens rights.() Dr. Abdullah stated::I should say that Taliban are not fighting in order to be accommodated. They are fighting in order to bring the state down. So its a futile exercise, and its just misleading. ... There are groups that will fight to the death. Whether we like to talk to them or we dont like to talk to them, they will continue to fight. So, for them, I dont think that we have a way forward with talks or negotiations or contacts or anything as such. Then we have to be prepared to tackle and deal with them militarily. In terms of the Taliban on the ground, there are lots of possibilities and opportunities that with the help of the people in different parts of the country, we can attract them to the peace process; provided, we create a favorable environment on this side of the line. At the moment, the people are leaving support for the government because of corruption. So that expectation is also not realistic at this stage.()In FY 2009, the United States resettled just 328 refugees from Afghanistan.(Fiscal Year 2009 Refugee Arrivals. U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.) By contrast, the U.S. admitted more than 100,000 Vietnamese refugees for resettlement during the Vietnam War.(Global Views: Iraqs refugees, by R. Nolan, Foreign Policy Association Features, Resource Library, June 12, 2007.) On the other hand, over five million refugees were repatriated in the last decade, including many who were forcefully deported from NATO countries.()() This large return of Afghans may have helped the nations economy but the country still remains one of the poorest in the world due to the decades of war, lack of foreign investment, ongoing government corruption and the Pakistani-backed insurgency.()() The United States also accuses neighboring Iran of providing small level of support to the Taliban insurgents.()()() According to a report by the United Nations, the Taliban and other militants were responsible for 76% of civilian casualties in 2009,() 75% in 2010() and 80% in 2011.()After the May 2011 of Osama bin Laden in Pakistan, many prominent Afghan figures began being assassinated, including Daud Daud, Wali Karzai, Mohammad Khan, Haider Hamidi, Rabbani and others. Also in the same year, many large scale attacks by the Pakistani based network took place around the country. As a result, the United States warned Pakistan of a possible military action against the Haqqanis in the Administered Tribal Areas.() The U.S. blamed Pakistans government, mainly Army and its ISI spy agency, for many of the well cordinated attacks inside Afghanistan.( of the Joint Chiefs of Staff U.S. Ambassador to Pakistan, Munter, told Radio Pakistan that The attack that took place in Kabul a few days ago, that was the work of the Haqqani network. There is evidence linking the Haqqani Network to the Pakistan government. This is something that must stop.() Other top U.S. officials such as Hillary Clinton and Panetta made similar statements.()()Government and politicsFile:Inauguration of President Hamid Karzai in December 2004.jpg|thumb|Karzai standing next to Ahmad Shinwari and others after winning the 2004 presidential election. The last king of Afghanistan, Zahir Shah is sitting at the right.File:Parliament delays summer recess.jpg|thumb|Assembly of AfghanistanThe government of Afghanistan is an republic consisting of three branches, executive, legislative and judicial. The nation is currently led by the Karzai administration with Karzai as the President and leader since late 2001. The National Assembly is the legislature, a bicameral body having two chambers, the House of the People and the of Elders. The Supreme Court is led by Chief Justice Salam Azimi, a former university professor who had been a legal advisor to the president.(E-Ariana.com, New Supreme Court Could Mark Genuine Departure  August 13, 2006.) The current court is seen as more moderate and led by more technocrats than the previous one, which was dominated by fundamentalist religious figures such as Chief Justice Ahmad Shinwari who issued several controversial rulings, including seeking to place a limit on the rights of women.According to Internationals corruption perceptions index 2010 results, Afghanistan was ranked as the third most-corrupt country in the world.() A number of government ministries are believed to be rife with corruption, while President Karzai vowed to tackle the problem in late 2009 by stating that individuals who are involved in corruption will have no place in the government.() A January 2010 report published by the Nations Office on Drugs and Crime revealed that bribery consumes an amount equal to 23 percent of the GDP of the nation.() It should be noted that all institutions in the country are newly formed and starting from scratch, and that steps are taken to arrest those involved in corruption.()Elections and partiesThe 2004 Afghan presidential election was relatively peaceful, in which Hamid Karzai won in the first round with 55.4% of the votes. However, the 2009 presidential election was characterized by lack of security, low voter turnout and widespread electoral fraud.()(Karzai Gets New Term as Afghan Runoff is Scrapped) The vote, along with elections for 420 provincial council seats, took place in August 2009, but remained unresolved during a lengthy period of vote counting and fraud investigation.()Two months later, under international pressure, a second round run-off vote between Karzai and remaining challenger Abdullah was announced, but a few days later Abdullah announced that he is not participating in the November 7 run-off because his demands for changes in the electoral commission had not been met. The next day, officials of the election commission cancelled the run-off and declared Hamid Karzai as President for another 5-year term.(In the 2005 parliamentary election, among the elected officials were former mujahideen, fundamentalists, warlords, communists, reformists, and several Taliban associates.() In the same period, Afghanistan reached to the 30th nation in terms of female representation in parliament.() The last parliamentary election was held in September 2010, but due to disputes and investigation of fraud, the sworn in ceremony took place in late January 2011. After the issuance of computerized ID cards for the first time, which is a $101 million project that the Afghan government plans to start in 2012, it is expected to help prevent major fraud in future elections and improve the security situation.(Kabul residents to get computerised ID cards in 5 months. Pajhwok Afghan News. September 18, 2011.)Political divisionsAfghanistan is administratively divided into 34 provinces (wilayats), with each province having its own capital and a provincial administration. The provinces are further divided into about 398 smaller provincial districts, each of which normally covers a city or a number of villages. Each district is represented by a district governor.The provincial governors are appointed by the of Afghanistan and the district governors are selected by the provincial governors. The provincial governors are representatives of the central government in Kabul and are responsible for all administrative and formal issues within their provinces. There are also provincial councils which are elected through direct and general elections for a period of four years.(Explaining Elections, Independent Election Commission of Afghanistan) The functions of provincial councils are to take part in provincial development planning and to participate in monitoring and appraisal of other provincial governance institutions.According to article 140 of the constitution and the presidential decree on electoral law, mayors of cities should be elected through free and direct elections for a four-year term. However, due to huge election costs, mayoral and municipal elections have never been held. Instead, mayors have been appointed by the government. As for the capital city of Kabul, the mayor is appointed by the President of Afghanistan.The following is a list of all the 34 of Afghanistan in alphabetical order and on the right is a map showing where each province is located:provinces numbered.png|thumb|300px|Afghanistan is divided into 34 provinces and every province is further divided into a number of districts Badakhshan Badghis Baghlan Balkh Bamyan Daykundi Farah Faryab Ghazni Ghor Helmand Herat Jowzjan Kabul Kandahar Kapisa Khost Konar Kunduz Laghman Logar Nangarhar Nimruz Nurestan Oruzgan Paktia Paktika Panjshir Parvan Samangan Sare Pol Takhar Wardak ZabolForeign relations and militaryFile:US Embassy in Kabul on July 4th 2010.jpg|thumb|The U.S. Embassy in Kabul. Official diplomatic relations between the United States and Afghanistan began in the early 1920s. The States Department of State has established a consulate in Herat in the west, with plans to open more in Mazar-e-Sharif in the north, Kandahar in the south, and Jalalabad in the east.The Afghan Ministry of Foreign Affairs is responsible for managing the relations of Afghanistan. The nation has been a member of the UN since 1946, and has maintained good relations with the United States and other NATO member states since the signing of the of Rawalpindi in 1919. The Nations Assistance Mission in Afghanistan (UNAMA) was established in 2002 under Nations Security Council Resolution 1401 to help the nation recover from decades of war and establish a normal functioning government. Today, more than 22 NATO nations deploy about 140,000 troops in Afghanistan as part of the Security Assistance Force (ISAF). Apart from close military links, Afghanistan also enjoys strong economic relations with NATO members and their allies.File:2011 Afghan Independence Day-4.jpg|thumb|left|guard of the Afghan armed forces during the 2011 commemoration of Independence Day.Afghanistan also has diplomatic relations with neighboring Pakistan, Iran, Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan, Tajikistan, the Republic of China, including regional states such as India, Turky, Kazakhstan, Russia, Arab Emirate, Saudi Arabia, Iraq, Egypt, Japan, South Korea, and others. Afghanistans relationship with Pakistan has often fluctuated since 1947.(Hasnat, Syed Farooq, Pakistan & Afghanistan: Domestic Pressures and Regional Threats in Journal of International Affairs, Vol. 63, Fall/Winter 2009, pp. 14155, Columbia University link Since 1947, serious differences and tensions have existed between the two respective governments at various phases of Pakistan-Afghanistan relations.)(Resolving the PakistanAfghanistan Stalemate, United States Institute of Peace, Afghanistan and Pakistan have had largely antagonistic relations under all governments) They have security and economic links with each other but disputes between the two states remain. Afghanistan continues to contest the porous and poorly-marked Line as its international border with Pakistan,() and has repeatedly accused Pakistan of supporting the Taliban insurgents, network, and other anti-Afghanistan terrorist groups.()() Pakistan harbors concerns over the growing influence of its rival India in Afghanistan.() Relations between the two states were strained further after recent border skirmishes and when Afghan officials alleged that Pakistani intelligence agencies are involved in terrorist attacks inside Afghanistan.() Despite these problems, Pakistan is a participant in the reconstruction of Afghanistan, pledging $250 million in various projects across the country,() and often announces that a stable Afghanistan is in their interest.(Stable Afghanistan in the interest of region: Zardari. Wasim Yousufzai. August 2, 2011.)India and Iran have actively participated in reconstruction efforts in Afghanistan,() with India being the largest regional donor to the country.() Since 2002, India has pledged up to $2 billion in economic assistance to Afghanistan and has participated in multiple socio-economic reconstruction efforts, including power, roads, agricultural and educational projects.(() There are also military ties between Afghanistan and India, which is expected to increase after the October 2011 strategic pact that was signed by President Karzai and Prime Minister Singh.(Afghanistan signs 1st strategic pact _ with India)(Pakistan a twin brother, talks to go on: Karzai. Afghan News. Sujoy Dhar. October 5, 2011.)The of Afghanistan is under the Ministry of Defense, which includes the National Army and the National Army Air Force. It currently has about 160,000 active soldiers and is expected to reach 260,000 in the coming years.( They are trained and equipped by NATO countries, mainly by the States Department of Defense. The ANA is divided into 7 major Corps, with the 201st Selab (Flood) in Kabul being the main one. The ANA also has a commando brigade which was established in 2007. The Military Academy of Afghanistan serves as the main educational institute for the militarymen of the country. A new $200 million Defense University (ADU) is under construction near the capital.Economypomegranate processing.jpg|thumb|Workers processing pomegranates (anaar), which Afghanistan is famous for in Asia.Afghanistan is an impoverished and developed country, one of the worlds poorest. The nations nominal GDP stands at $16.63 billion and the GDP per capita is about $900.() Its unemployment rate is 35% and roughly the same percentage of its citizens live below the poverty line.()() About 42 percent of the population live on less than $1 a day, according to a 2009 report.() Despite this, the economy has been growing strong in the last decade, which is due to the infusion of multi-billion dollars in international assistance and investments as well as remittances from expats. According to the Bank, economic growth has been strong and has generated better livelihoods since late 2001.() It is also due to improvements in agricultural production, which is the backbone of the nations economy.() The country is known for producing some of the finest pomegranates, grapes, apricots, melons, and several other fresh and dry fruits, including nuts.(Exporting Afghanistan, by P.J. Tobia. Nov 17, 2009.) File:Doost Marble Factory in Herat.jpg|thumb|left|The Doost Marble Factory in Herat. Current marble exports are estimated at $15 million per year. With improved extraction, processing, infrastructure, and investment, the industry has the potential to grow into a $450 million per year business.(Embassy, Kabul, Third Afghanistan Marble Conference, May 25, 2011.)While the countrys current account deficit is largely financed with the donor money, only a small portion is provided directly to the government budget. The rest is provided to non-budgetary expenditure and donor-designated projects through the United Nations system and non-governmental organizations. The Afghan Ministry of Finance is focusing on improved revenue collection and public sector expenditure discipline. For example, government revenues increased 31% to $1.7 billion from March 2010 to March 2011. Afghanistan Bank serves as the central bank of the nation and the Afghani (AFN) is the national currency, with an exchange rate of 50 Afghanis to 1 US dollar. Since 2003, over 16 new banks have opened in the country, including International Bank, Bank, Bank, Bank, Chartered Bank, Micro Finance Bank, and others. One of the main drivers for the current economic recovery is the return of over 5 million Afghan expatriates, who brought with them fresh energy, entrepreneurship and wealth-creating skills as well as much needed funds to start up businesses. For the first time since the 1970s, Afghans have involved themselves in construction, one of the largest industries in the country, although some have been cheated by American contractors.() A number of companies and small factories began operating in different parts of the country, which not only provide revenues to the government but also create many jobs. Improvements to the business-enabling environment have resulted in more than $1.5 billion in telecom investment and created more than 100,000 jobs since 2003.() The rugs are becoming popular again and this gives many carpet dealers around the country to expand their business by hiring more workers.Afghanistan is a member of SAARC, ECO and OIC. It is aiming to develop closer economic ties with neighboring countries in the so-called New Silk Road major project of the future. Foreign Minister Rassoul told the media in 2011 that his nations goal is to achieve an Afghan economy whose growth is based on trade, private enterprise and investment.() production in Afghanistan has soared to a record in 2007 with about 3 million people reported to be involved in the business(UN horrified by surge in opium trade in Helmand.) but then declined significantly in the years following.(Afghan opium production in significant decline, UNDOC) The government started programs to help reduce cultivation of poppy, and by 2010 it was reported that 24 out of the 34 provinces were free from poppy grow.Mining and energyAfghanistans economy has a brite future due to its natural resources. According to recent U.S. Geological surveys that were funded by the Afghan Ministry of Mines and Industry, Afghanistan may be possessing up to  of natural gas,  of petroleum and up to  of gas liquids.(Afghanistans Energy Future and its Potential Implications, Eurasianet.org.) Other recent reports show that the country has huge amounts of gold, copper, coal, iron ore and other minerals.()()()() In 2010, Pentagon officials along with geologists from the United States announced the discovery of $13 trillion worth untapped mineral deposits in Afghanistan.( Afghan officials assert that this will become the backbone of the Afghan economy and a memo from the Pentagon stated that Afghanistan could become the Saudi Arabia of lithium.()()()() Another US geological survey estimate from 2011 shows that the Khanashin carbonatites in the Province of the country have an estimated 1 million metric tonnes of earth elements.(Huge rare-earth material in Helmand: USGS. By Lalit K Jha for Afghan News. September 15, 2011.) Extraction of its copper and iron reserves is expected to start in 2013, which would earn billions of dollars in royalties and taxes every year for the next 100 years. Analysts believe that if the Afghan state was to generate even $10 billion per year from its mineral deposits, its national product would double and provide long-term funding for Afghan security forces and other critical needs.(OHanlon, Michael E. Deposits Could Aid Ailing Afghanistan, The Brookings Institution, 16 June 2010.)Transport and communicationsFile:Ariana Afghan A310-300 F-GEMO.jpg|thumb|upright|Afghan AirlinesAfghanistan has about 53 airports, with the biggest ones being the International Airport, Air Base followed by International Airport in the south and Airport in the west. Afghan Airlines is the national carrier, with domestic flights between Kabul, Kandahar, Herat and Mazar-i-Sharif. International flights include to Dubai, Frankfurt, Istanbul, Delhi, Islamabad and a number of other Asian destinations.() There are limited domestic and international flight services available from the locally owned Air, Airways and Airways. Airlines from a number of regional nations such as Airlines, Air, Arabia, India, International Airlines and others also provide services to Afghanistan.The country has limited rail service with Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan in the north. As of 2011, two other railway projects are in progress with neighboring nations, one is between Herat and Iran while another is to connect with Railways. Long distant journies are made by private coaches or private cars. Newer automobiles have recently become more widely available after the rebuilding of roads and highways. They are imported from the Arab Emirates through Pakistan and Iran. Afghanistans postal and package services such as FedEx, DHL and others make deliveries to major cities and towns.Telecommunication services in the country are provided by Wireless, Etisalat, Roshan, Group and Telecom. In 2006, the Afghan Ministry of Communications signed a $64.5 million agreement with ZTE for the establishment of a countrywide fiber cable network. As of 2009, the country has 129,300 fixed telephone lines,(CIA.gov) about 12 million mobile phone subscribers(CIA.Gov) and 1 million internet users.(CIA.gov)DemographicsAs of July 2010, the population of Afghanistan is around 28,395,716() but it is unconfirmed if the 3 million refugees still living in Pakistan and Iran are included or not. A 2009 UN estimate shows that the Afghan population was 28,150,000() but a 20092010 nationwide survey conducted by the Central Statistics Office (CSO) of Afghanistan has put it at 26 million, not counting some parts of the country due to insecurity.( ) The only city with over a million residents is its capital, Kabul. The other major cities in the country are, in order of population size, Kandahar, Herat, Mazar-i-Sharif, Kunduz, Jalalabad, Gah, Taloqan, Khumri, Khost, Ghazni, Sheberghan, Sar-e Pol, and Farah. Urban areas are experiencing rapid population growth following the return of over 5 million expats from Pakistan and Iran. According to the Reference Bureau, the Afghan population is estimated to increase to 82 million by 2050.()Ethnic groupsArmy ethnolinguistic map of Afghanistan -- circa 2001-09.jpg|thumb|Ethnolinguistic groups of AfghanistanAfghanistan is a society. The population of the country is divided into a wide variety of ethnolinguistic groups. Because a systematic census has not been held in the nation in decades, exact figures about the size and composition of the various ethnic groups are unvailable.(Afghan polls ethnic battleground  October 6, 2004. BBC)An approximate distribution of the nations total ethnic groups is shown in the chart below:Pashai man with flowers in his hair.jpg|thumb|Pashai boyFile:Village girls of Guzara district in Herat province-2009.jpg|thumb|Afghan girls from the District of ProvinceFile:Boys in Ghazni.jpg|thumb|Boys from ProvinceThe percentage numbers in the chart at the bottom are from recent national opinion polls aimed at knowing how Afghan citizens feel about the 2001present US-led war, the current political situation, as well as the economic and social issues affecting their daily lives. One was conducted in 2010 by the Asia Foundation (with technical assistance by the Afghan Center for Socio-economic and Opinion Research) and the other between 2004 to 2009 by a combined effort of the broadcasting companies ABC News, the BBC, and ARD.()()The 2010 Asia Foundation survey involved 6,467 randomly selected Afghan citizens from across all of Afghanistans 34 provinces. The margin of sampling error in that survey is 4.4 percent, at a 95 percent confidence interval.()To questions about their ethnicity at the end of the questionnaires, the results of the total 8,001 Afghan citizens (6,467 respondents from The Asia Foundation survey; 1,534 respondents from the ABC, BBC, and ARD survey) came as:LanguagesThe two languages of Afghanistan are Pashto (since 1936) and (Persian) (since 1964), making bilingualism very common. Both are languages from the languages sub-family.() Persian has always been the prestige language and as the main means of inter-ethnic communication, maintaining its status of franca. Persian is the native tongue of various Afghan ethnic groups including the Tajiks, Hazaras, Aimaks and Kizilbash.() Pashto is the native tongue of the Pashtuns, although many non-Pashtuns are also fluent speakers of this language. Other languages, such as Uzbek, Arabic, Turkmen, Balochi, Pashayi and languages (Ashkunu, Kamkata-viri, Vasi-vari, Tregami and Kalasha-ala), are used as native tongue by minority groups across the country and have official status in the regions where they are widely spoken. Minor languages also include Pamiri (Shughni, Munji, Ishkashimi and Wakhi), Brahui, Hindko, Kyrgyz, etc. Many Afghans are also fluent in Urdu, Punjabi, Hindi, English, and other languages.({|classwikitable|-!|Language!|World Factbook / Library of Congress Country Studies estimate()(|- styletext-align:center;! (Persian)| 50%|- styletext-align:center;! Pashto| 35%|- styletext-align:center;! Uzbek and Turkmen| 11%|- styletext-align:center;! 30 minor languages| 4%|}ReligionsOver 99% of the Afghan population is Muslim: approximately 8085% follow the Sunni sect, 1519% are Shia, and 1% other.()()()() Until the 1890s, the region around Nuristan was known as Kafiristan (land of the kafirs) because of its inhabitants: the Nuristanis, an ethnically distinctive people who practiced animism, polytheism and shamanism.() Other than Muslims, there are tiny communities of Hindus and Sikhs found in the four major cities of the country. They number in the thousands.(Hinduism Today: Hindus Abandon Afghanistan.)(BBC South Asia: Sikhs struggle in Afghanistan.) There was also a small Jewish community in Afghanistan who emigrated to Israel and the United States by the end of the last century, and only one individual by the name of Simintov remains today.(Washingtonpost.com  Afghan Jew Becomes Countrys One and Only  N.C. Aizenman.)CultureAfghan Youth Voices Festival.jpg|thumb|300px|The 2011 Afghan Youth Voices Festival inside the Gardens of Babur in Kabul, which is the capital and a multi-ethnic city.The Afghan culture has been around for over two millennia, tracing record to at least the time of the Achaemenid Empire in 500 BCE.()(Barbara Robson, Juliene Lipson, Farid Younos, Mariam Mehdi. ) It is mostly a nomadic and society, with different regions of the country having their own tradition, reflecting the multi-cultural and multi-lingual character of the nation. In the southern and eastern region, as well as western Pakistan which was historically part of Afghanistan, the people live according to the culture by following Pashtunwali, which is an ancient way of life that is still preserved.(US Library of Congress: Afghanistan  Ethnic Groups (Pashtun)) The remaining of the country is culturally Persian and Turkic. Some non-Pashtuns who live in close proximity with Pashtuns have adopted Pashtunwali() in a process called Pashtunization (or Afghanization) while some Pashtuns have been Persianized. Millions of Afghans who have been living in Pakistan and Iran over the last 30 years have been influenced by the cultures of those neighboring nations. File:Tribal and religious leaders in southern Afghanistan.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Men wearing their traditional Afghan dress in the ultra-conservative southern city of Kandahar.Afghans display pride in their culture, nation, ancestry, and above all, their religion and independence. Like other highlanders, they are regarded with mingled apprehension and condescension, for their high regard for personal honor, for their tribe loyalty and for their readiness to use force to settle disputes.(Heathcote, Tony (1980, 2003) The Afghan Wars 18391919, Sellmount Staplehurst.) As tribal warfare and internecine feuding has been one of their chief occupations since time immemorial, this individualistic trait has made it difficult for foreigners to conquer them. Tony Heathcote considers the tribal system to be the best way of organizing large groups of people in a country that is geographically difficult, and in a society that, from a materialistic point of view, has an uncomplicated lifestyle.( There are an estimated 60 major tribes,(Pashtun (people). Encyclopdia Britannica.) and the Afghan nomads are estimated at about 23 million.(Afghanistan: Kuchi nomads seek a better deal. IRIN Asia. February 18, 2008.)The nation has a complex history that has survived either in its current cultures or in the form of various languages and monuments. However, many of its historic monuments have been damaged in recent wars.(G.V. Brandolini. Afghanistan heritage. Orizzonte terra, Bergamo. 2007. p. 64.) The two famous of Bamiyan were destroyed by the Taliban, who regarded them as idolatrous. Despite that archaeologists are still finding Buddhist relics in different parts of the country, some of them date back to the 2nd century.()()() This indicates that Buddhism was widespread in Afghanistan. Other historical places include the cities of Herat, Kandahar, Ghazni, Mazar-i-Sharif, and Zarang. The of Jam in the Hari River valley is a UNESCO World Heritage site. A cloak reputedly worn by Islams Prophet Muhammad is kept inside the of the Cloak in Kandahar, a city founded by Alexander and the first capital of Afghanistan. The citadel of Alexander in the western city of Herat has been renovated in recent years and is a popular attraction for tourists. In the north of the country is the of Hazrat Ali, believed by many to be the location where Ali was buried. The Afghan Ministry of Information and Culture is renovating 42 historic sites in Ghazni until 2013, when the province will be declared as the capital of Islamic civilization.() The Museum of Afghanistan is located in Kabul.Although literacy level is low, classic Persian and Pashto poetry play an important role in the Afghan culture. Poetry has always been one of the major educational pillars in the region, to the level that it has integrated itself into culture. Some notable poets include Rumi, Balkhi, Sanai, Jami, Khan Khattak, Baba, Khalili, and Pazhwak.(Classical Dari and Pashto Poets)MediaFile:Farhad Daryas Peace Concert in 2010-cropped.jpg|thumb|Darya performing at the Hotel in Kabul.The Afghan mass media began in the early 20th century, with the first newspaper published in 1906. By the 1920s, Kabul was broadcasting local radio services. National Television was launched in 1974 but was closed in 1996 when the media was tightly controlled by the Taliban.(Dartnell, M. Y. Insurgency Online: Web Activism and Global Conflict. University of Toronto Press, 2006. ISBN 978-0-8020-8553-5.) Since 2002, press restrictions were gradually relaxed and private media diversified. of expression and the press is promoted in the 2004 constitution and censorship is banned, though defaming individuals or producing material contrary to the principles of Islam is prohibited. In 2008, Without Borders listed the media environment as 156 out of 173, with the 1st being most free. 400 publications were registered, at least 15 local Afghan television channels and 60 radio stations.(Afghanistan Press Report 2008, Freedom House.) Foreign radio stations, such as of America, World Service, and Free Europe/Radio Liberty (RFE/RL) broadcast into the country.The city of Kabul has been home to many musicians in the past, who were masters of both traditional and modern Afghan music, especially during the Nowruz (New Year) and National Independence Day celebrations. Most Afghans are accustomed to watching Bollywood films from India and listening to its filmi hit songs. Many of the Bollywood film stars have roots in Afghanistan, including Madhubala, Khan, Khan, Khan, Khan, and others. Several Bollywood films such as Dharmatma, Gawah, from Taliban and Express have been shot inside Afghanistan.SportsThe national football team has been competing in international football since 1941 and currently has a world ranking of 179. The national team plays its home games at the Stadium in Kabul, while in Afghanistan is governed by the Football Federation. The national team has never competed or qualified for the World Cup. The country also has a national team in the sport of futsal, a game very similar to football. Some of the other popular sports in Afghanistan include cricket, basketball, volleyball, taekwondo, boxing, and bodybuilding.()Cricket, which is a newly introduced in Afghanistan fuelled by the success of the Afghan national cricket team is growing in popularity.() It has risen from the lower levels of international cricket to qualifying for the 2010 Twenty20 World Cup. More recently the under-19 team has qualified for the ICC Under-19 Cricket World Cup.() The Cricket Board (ACB) is the official governing body of the sport and is headquartered in Kabul. The Amanullah Khan International Cricket Stadium serves as the nations main cricket stadium, followed by the National Cricket Stadium. Several other stadiums are under construction.() Cricket is played between teams from different provinces, mostly by the Pashtuns on both sides of the Line.Buzkashi is a traditional sport, mainly among the northern Afghans. It is similar to polo, played by horsemen in two teams, each trying to grab and hold a goat carcass. hounds (a type of running dog) originated in Afghanistan and was originally used in the sport of hunting.Health and educationFile:Regional Medical Hospital in Paktia.jpg|thumb|upright|Inside a regional military hospital in the ProvinceBefore the Revolution in 1978, the nation had an improving care system. Ibn Sina Hospital and Ali Abad Hospital in Kabul were two of the leading health care institutions at the time. Health care was limited to urban areas only and was eventually destroyed during the civil war of the 1990s.() It is once again improving, which is due to the vaccination of children, training of medical staff and establishment of new hospitals. Many hospitals and clinics have been built over the last decade, with the most advanced treatments being available in Kabul. The Medical Institute for Children and Gandhi Childrens Hospital in Kabul are the leading hospitals in the country. Some of the other main hospitals in Kabul include the 350-bed Hospital and the Jinnah Hospital, which is still under construction. There are also a number of well-equipped military controlled hospitals in different regions of the country.According to the Development Index, Afghanistan is the 15th least developed country in the world. The average life expectancy is 43.8 years. It is the most dangerous place for a child to be born, with the highest mortality rates in the world.() About 1 in 5 children dies before the age of five, and 1 out of every 8 women dies from causes related to pregnancy and childbirth.(() While these statistics are tragic, progress is being made. It was reported in 2006 that nearly 60% of the population lives within two hours walking distance of the nearest health facility, up from nine percent in 2002. Infant mortality has decreased by 22% and child mortality has dropped by 26% since 2003.() The Afghan Ministry of Public Health plans to further cut the infant mortality rate from the current 1,600 to 400 for every 100,000 live births by the year 2020.( and Health Surveys is working with the Institute of Health Management Research to conduct a survey in Afghanistan focusing on death, among other things.() The nation also has one of the highest incidences of people with disabilities, with an estimated one million handicapped people.(Empowering Afghanistans Disabled Population. Usaid.gov. March 31, 2006.) About 80,000 citizens have lost limbs, mainly as a result of landmines.(Afghanistans refugee crisis ignored. The Guardian. February 13, 2008.)(Afghanistan: People living with disabilities call for integration. IRIN Asia.) Non-governmental charities such as Promise assist orphans in association with governmental structures.(Virginia Haussegger Mahoobas Promise ABC TV 7.30 Report. 2009. ABC.net.au. Retrieved July 15, 2009.)File:Saleha Bayat Building at AUAF in Kabul-2.jpg|thumb|left|300px|University of Afghanistan (AUAF) in Kabul.Education in the country includes K-12 and Education, which is supervised by the Ministry of Education and Ministry of Higher Education.() The nations education system was destroyed due to the decades of war, but it began reviving after the Karzai administration came to power in late 2001. About 4,000 schools were built since 2002, with more than 100,000 teachers being trained and recruited.() It was reported in 2011 that more than seven million male and female students were enrolled in schools.(As of 2011, about 62,000 students are enrolled in different universities around the country.( University reopened in 2002 to both male and female students. In 2006, the University of Afghanistan was established in Kabul, with the aim of providing a world-class, English-language, co-educational learning environment in Afghanistan. The capital of Kabul serves as the learning center of Afghanistan, with many of the best institutions being based there. Major universities outside of Kabul include University in the south, University in the northwest, University in the north, University and University in the eastern zones, as well as a number of others. The Military Academy of Afghanistan, modeled after the States Military Academy at West Point, is a four-year military development institution dedicated to graduating officers for the Afghan armed forces. The $200 million Defense University is under construction near Qargha in Kabul. The United States is building six faculties of education and five provincial teacher training colleges around the country, two large secondary schools in Kabul and one school in Jalalabad.(Literacy rate of the entire population is very low, possibly at 34% but is improving rapidly. Female literacy may be as low as only 10%. In 2010, the United States began establishing a number of Lincoln learning centers in Afghanistan. They are set up to serve as programming platforms offering English language classes, library facilities, programming venues, Internet connectivity, educational and other counseling services. A goal of the program is to reach at least 4,000 Afghan citizens per month per location.(http://photos.state.gov/libraries/afghanistan/231771/PDFs/RFP-Lincoln-Learning-Centers.pdf)(http://waronterrornews.typepad.com/home/2010/09/ghazni-gov-lincoln-learning-center.html) What Afghanistan needs is NATO supported scholarship programs to take massive number of students abroad so that when they return after finishing studies they can move their nation forward and quickly catch up with the rest of the world.Crime and law enforcementFile:ANP moving in vehicles in 2010.jpg|thumb|National PoliceThe Directorate of Security (NDS) is the nations domestic agency, which operates similar to that of the States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and has between 15,000 to 30,000 employees. The nation also has about 126,000 national police officers, with plans to recruit more so that the total number can reach 160,000. The National Police (ANP) is under the Ministry of the Interior, which is based in Kabul and headed by Khan Mohammadi. The National Civil Order Police is part of the Afghan National Police, which is divided into five Brigades, each commanded by a Brigadier General. These brigades are stationed in Kabul, Gardez, Kandahar, Herat, and Mazar-i-Sharif. Every province of the country has a provincial of Police who is appointed by the Ministry of Interior and is responsible for law enforcement in all the districts within the province.Although they are being trained by NATO countries through the Police Program, there are still problems with the force. According to a 2009 news report, large percent of Afghan police officers are illiterate and are accused of demanding bribes.(For U.S., Vast Challenge To Expand Afghan Forces : NPR.) Jack Kem, deputy to the commander of NATO Training Mission Afghanistan and Combined Security Transition Command Afghanistan, stated that the literacy rate in the ANP will rise to over 50 percent by January 2012. What began as a voluntary literacy program became mandatory for basic police training in early 2011.() Approximately 17 percent of them test positive for illegal drugs. In 2009, President Karzai created two anti-corruption units within the nations Interior Ministry.() Former Interior Minister Atmar said that security officials from the U.S. (FBI), Britain (Yard) and the European Union will train prosecutors in the unit.The south and eastern parts of Afghanistan are the most dangerous due to their distances from Kabul and their flourishing drug trade. These areas in particular are often patrolled by Taliban insurgents, and in many cases they plan attacks by using suicide bombers and planting explosive devices (IEDs) on roads. Every year many Afghan police officers are killed in the line of duty. The Border Police are responsible for protecting the nations airports and borders, especially the Line, which is a disputed border often used by criminal organizations and terrorists for their illegal activities. Reports in 2011 suggested that up to 3 million people are involved in the illegal drug business in Afghanistan, many of the attacks on government employees and institutions are carried out not only by the Taliban militants but also by powerful criminal gangs.(While US talks withdrawal, Afghan corruption soars, by Bradley Klapper, Associated Press. June 2011.) Drugs from Afghanistan are exported to Iran, Pakistan, Russia, India, the United Arab Emirate, and the European Union. The Afghan Ministry of Counter Narcotics which is supported by the international community is dealing with this problem.NotesSee also*Afghanistanism*rankings of AfghanistanReferencesBibliographyExternal links*Office of the President official government website**10 myths about Afghanistan; the Guardian****listlistlistlistace:Afghanistanaf:Afghanistanals:Afghanistanam:ang:Afghanistanar:an:Afganistnroa-rup:Afganistanfrp:Afganistanas:ast:Afganistnaz:fqanstanbn:zh-min-nan:Afghanistanbe:be-x-old:bcl:Apganistanbo:bs:Afganistanbr:Afghanistanbg:ca:Afganistancv:ceb:Afghanistancs:Afghnistncbk-zam:Afghanistanco:Afghanistancy:Afghanistanda:Afghanistanpdc:Afganischtaande:Afghanistandv:dsb:Afghanistandz:et:Afganistanel:es:Afganistneo:Afganujoext:Afganistneu:Afganistanfa:hif:Afghanistanfo:Afghanistanfr:Afghanistanfy:Afganistanfur:AfghanistanAfganastinAfghanistaangag:Afganistangd:Afganastan- gu:got:hak:-fu-hon ko:haw:Apekanikanahy:hi:hsb:Afghanistanhr:Afganistanio:Afganistanilo:Afganistanbpy:id:Afganistania:Afghanistanie:Afghanistanos:is:Afganistanit:Afghanistanhe:jv:Afganistankn:pam:Afghanistankrc:ka:csb:Afganistnkk:kw:Afghanistanrw:Afuganisitaniky:sw:Afghanistanht:Afganistanku:Afxanistanla:Afganialv:Afganistnalb:Afghanistanlt:Afganistanaslij:Afghanistanli:Afganistanln:Afganistnijbo:afyganisTANlmo:Afghanistanhu:Afganisztnmk:mg:Afganistanaml:mt:Afganistanmr:arz:ms:Afghanistanmdf:mn:my:nah:Afganistanna:Apeganitannl:Afghanistannds-nl:Afghanistanne:new:ja:ce:Ipih:Afganistaanno:Afghanistannn:Afghanistannov:Afganistanoc:Afganistanmhr:uz:Afgonistonpa:pag:Afghanistanpnb:pap:Afganistnps:km:pms:Afgnistannds:Afghanistanpl:Afganistanpt:Afeganistokbd:kaa:Afganstancrh:Afanistanksh:Afghanistanro:Afganistanrm:Afganistanqu:Afgansuyurue:ru:sah:se:Afganistnasa:sco:Afghanistanstq:Afghanistansq:Afganistaniscn:Afganistnsi:simple:Afghanistansd:ss:I-Afuganisk:Afganistansl:Afganistanszl:Afgaistanso:Afgaanistanckb:sr:sh:Afganistansu:Apganistanfi:Afganistansv:Afghanistantl:Apganistanta:roa-tara:Afghanistantt:te:tet:Afeganistaunth:tg:tr:Afganistantk:Owganystanudm:bug:Afghanistanuk:ur:ug:vec:Afganistanvi:Afghanistanvo:Lafganistnfiu-vro:Afganistanzh-classical:war:Afganistanwo:Afganistaanwuu:yi:yo:Afghanstnzh-yue:diq:Efanstanzea:Afghanistanbat-smg:Afganstanszh:
791
Asteroid
Asteroids (from Greek  star and  like, in form) are a class of Small Solar System Bodies in orbit around the Sun.  They have also been called planetoids, especially the larger ones. These terms have historically been applied to any astronomical object orbiting the Sun that did not show the disk of a planet and was not observed to have the characteristics of an active comet, but as small objects in the outer Solar System were discovered, their volatile-based surfaces were found to more closely resemble comets, and so were often distinguished from traditional asteroids.() Thus the term asteroid has come increasingly to refer specifically to the small rockyicy and metallic bodies of the inner Solar System out to the orbit of Jupiter. They are grouped with the outer bodiescentaurs, trojans, and objectsas planets, which is the term preferred in astronomical circles.(Asimov, Isaac, and Dole, Stephen H. Planets for Man (New York:  Random House, 1964), p.43) This article will restrict the use of the term asteroid to the minor planets of the inner Solar System. There are millions of asteroids, many thought to be the often shattered remnants of planetesimals, bodies within the young Suns nebula that never grew large enough to become planets.()  A large majority of known asteroids orbit in the belt between the orbits of Mars and Jupiter or co-orbital with Jupiter (the Trojans). However, other orbital families exist with significant populations, including the asteroids. Individual asteroids are classified by their characteristic spectra, with the majority falling into three main groups: C-type, S-type, and M-type. These were named after and are generally identified with carbon-rich, stony, and metallic compositions, respectively. Naming A newly discovered asteroid is given a provisional designation (such as ) consisting of the year of discovery and an alphanumeric code indicating the half-month of discovery and the sequence within that half-month. Once an asteroids orbit has been confirmed, it is given a number, and later may also be given a name (e.g. Eros). The formal naming convention uses parentheses around the number (e.g. (433) Eros), but dropping the parentheses is quite common. Informally, it is common to drop the number altogether, or to drop it after the first mention when a name is repeated in running text. Symbols The first asteroids to be discovered were assigned iconic symbols like the ones traditionally used to designate the planets. By 1855 there were two dozen asteroid symbols, which often occurred in several variants.()Franz Encke made a major change in the 1854 edition of the Berliner Astronomisches Jahrbuch (BAJ, Berlin Astronomical Yearbook). He introduced a disk (circle), a traditional symbol for a star, as the generic symbol for an asteroid. The circle was then numbered in order of discovery to indicate a specific asteroid, though he assigned  to the fifth, Astraea, the first four continuing with their existing symbols. The numbered-circle convention was quickly adopted by the astronomical community, and no iconic symbols were created after 1855.(Except for Pluto and, in the astrological community, for a few outer bodies such as Chiron:  ) That year Astraeas number was bumped up to , but Ceres through Vesta would not be listed by their numbers until the 1867 edition. The circle would become a pair of parentheses, and the parentheses sometimes omitted altogether over the next few decades, leading to the modern convention.( Discovery Image:243 ida.jpg|thumb|right|Ida and its moon Dactyl. Dactyl is the first satellite of an asteroid to be discovered.The first asteroid to be discovered, Ceres, was found in 1801 by Piazzi, and was originally considered to be a new planet.(Ceres is the largest asteroid and is now classified as a planet. All other asteroids are now classified as Small Solar System Bodies along with comets, centaurs, and the smaller trans-Neptunian objects.) This was followed by the discovery of other similar bodies, which with the equipment of the time appeared to be points of light, like stars, showing little or no planetary disc, though readily distinguishable from stars due to their apparent motions. This prompted the astronomer Sir William Herschel to propose the term asteroid, from Greek , asteroeids star-like, star-shaped, from ancient Greek , astr star, planet. In the early second half of the nineteenth century, the terms asteroid and planet (not always qualified as minor) were still used interchangeably; for example, the Annual of Scientific Discovery for 1871, page 316, reads Professor J. Watson has been awarded by the Paris Academy of Sciences, the astronomical prize, Lalande foundation, for the discovery of eight new asteroids in one year. The planet Lydia (No. 110), discovered by M. Borelly at the Marseilles Observatory ... M. Borelly had previously discovered two planets bearing the numbers 91 and 99 in the system of asteroids revolving between Mars and Jupiter. Historical methods Asteroid discovery methods have dramatically improved over the past two centuries.In the last years of the 18th century, Baron Xaver von Zach organized a group of 24 astronomers to search the sky for the missing planet predicted at about 2.8 AU from the Sun by the law, partly because of the discovery, by Sir Herschel in 1781, of the planet Uranus at the distance predicted by the law. This task required that hand-drawn sky charts be prepared for all stars in the zodiacal band down to an agreed-upon limit of faintness. On subsequent nights, the sky would be charted again and any moving object would, hopefully, be spotted. The expected motion of the missing planet was about 30 seconds of arc per hour, readily discernible by observers.The first object, Ceres, was not discovered by a member of the group, but rather by accident in 1801 by Piazzi, director of the observatory of Palermo in Sicily. He discovered a new star-like object in Taurus and followed the displacement of this object during several nights. His colleague, Friedrich Gauss, used these observations to find the exact distance from this unknown object to the Earth. Gauss calculations placed the object between the planets Mars and Jupiter. Piazzi named it after Ceres, the Roman goddess of agriculture.Three other asteroids (Pallas, Juno, and Vesta) were discovered over the next few years, with Vesta found in 1807. After eight more years of fruitless searches, most astronomers assumed that there were no more and abandoned any further searches.However, Ludwig Hencke persisted, and began searching for more asteroids in 1830. Fifteen years later, he found Astraea, the first new asteroid in 38 years. He also found Hebe less than two years later. After this, other astronomers joined in the search and at least one new asteroid was discovered every year after that (except the wartime year 1945). Notable asteroid hunters of this early era were J. R. Hind, de Gasparis, Robert Luther, H. M. S. Goldschmidt, Chacornac, James Ferguson, Robert Pogson, E. W. Tempel, J. C. Watson, C. H. F. Peters, A. Borrelly, J. Palisa, the Henry brothers and Charlois.In 1891, however, Max Wolf pioneered the use of astrophotography to detect asteroids, which appeared as short streaks on long-exposure photographic plates. This dramatically increased the rate of detection compared with earlier visual methods: Wolf alone discovered 248 asteroids, beginning with Brucia, whereas only slightly more than 300 had been discovered up to that point. It was known that there were many more, but most astronomers did not bother with them, calling them vermin of the skies, a phrase due to Weiss.() Even a century later, only a few thousand asteroids were identified, numbered and named. Manual methods of the 1900s and modern reporting Until 1998, asteroids were discovered by a four-step process. First, a region of the sky was photographed by a wide-field telescope, or Astrograph. Pairs of photographs were taken, typically one hour apart. Multiple pairs could be taken over a series of days. Second, the two films of the same region were viewed under a stereoscope. Any body in orbit around the Sun would move slightly between the pair of films. Under the stereoscope, the image of the body would seem to float slightly above the background of stars. Third, once a moving body was identified, its location would be measured precisely using a digitizing microscope. The location would be measured relative to known star locations.()These first three steps do not constitute asteroid discovery: the observer has only found an apparition, which gets a provisional designation, made up of the year of discovery, a letter representing the half-month of discovery, and finally a letter and a number indicating the discoverys sequential number (example: ).The last step of discovery is to send the locations and time of observations to the Planet Center, where computer programs determine whether an apparition ties together earlier apparitions into a single orbit. If so, the object receives a catalogue number and the observer of the first apparition with a calculated orbit is declared the discoverer, and granted the honor of naming the object subject to the approval of the Astronomical Union. Computerized methods Image:Asteroid 2004 FH.gif|framed|right|FH is the center dot being followed by the sequence; the object that flashes by during the clip is an artificial satellite.There is increasing interest in identifying asteroids whose orbits cross Earths, and that could, given enough time, collide with Earth (see asteroids). The three most important groups of asteroids are the Apollos, Amors, and Atens. Various deflection strategies have been proposed, as early as the 1960s.The near-Earth asteroid Eros had been discovered as long ago as 1898, and the 1930s brought a flurry of similar objects. In order of discovery, these were: Amor, Apollo, Adonis, and finally Hermes, which approached within 0.005 AU of the Earth in 1937. Astronomers began to realize the possibilities of Earth impact.Two events in later decades increased the alarm: the increasing acceptance of Alvarez hypothesis that an event resulted in the Cretaceous-Tertiary extinction, and the 1994 observation of Shoemaker-Levy 9 crashing into Jupiter. The U.S. military also declassified the information that its military satellites, built to detect nuclear explosions, had detected hundreds of upper-atmosphere impacts by objects ranging from one to 10 metres across.All these considerations helped spur the launch of highly efficient automated systems that consist of Charge-Coupled Device (CCD) cameras and computers directly connected to telescopes. Since 1998, a large majority of the asteroids have been discovered by such automated systems. A list of teams using such automated systems includes:()* The Near-Earth Asteroid Research (LINEAR) team* The Asteroid Tracking (NEAT) team* Spacewatch* The Lowell Observatory Near-Earth-Object Search (LONEOS) team* The Sky Survey (CSS)* The Imperatore Near-Earth Objects Survey (CINEOS) team* The Spaceguard Association* The Asteroid Survey (ADAS)The LINEAR system alone has discovered 121,346 asteroids, as of March, 2011.() Among all the automated systems, 4711 near-Earth asteroids have been discovered() including over 600 more than  in diameter. Terminology  Traditionally, small bodies orbiting the Sun were classified as asteroids, comets or meteoroids, with anything smaller than ten metres across being called a meteoroid.() The term asteroid is ill-defined. It never had a formal definition, with the broader term planet being preferred by the Astronomical Union from 1853 on. In 2006, the term Solar System Body was introduced to cover both most minor planets and comets.(The definition of Small Solar System Bodies says that they include most of the Solar System asteroids, most trans-Neptunian objects, comets, and other small bodies. The Final IAU Resolution on the definition of planet ready for voting (IAU)) Other languages prefer planetoid (Greek for planet-like), and this term is occasionally used in English for the larger asteroids. The word planetesimal has a similar meaning, but refers specifically to the small building blocks of the planets that existed when the Solar System was forming. The term planetule was coined by the  geologist Daniel Conybeare to describe minor planets,() but is not in common use. The three largest objects in the asteroid belt, Ceres, Pallas, and Vesta, grew to the stage of protoplanets. Ceres has been designated as a planet, the only one in the inner Solar System. When found, asteroids were seen as a class of objects distinct from comets, and there was no unified term for the two until Small Solar System Body was coined in 2006. The main difference between an asteroid and a comet is that a comet shows a coma due to sublimation of near surface ices by solar radiation. A few objects have ended up being dual-listed because they were first classified as minor planets but later showed evidence of cometary activity. Conversely, some (perhaps all) comets are eventually depleted of their surface volatile ices and become asteroids. A further distinction is that comets typically have more eccentric orbits than most asteroids; most asteroids with notably eccentric orbits are probably dormant or extinct comets.(Weissman, Paul R., William F. Bottke, Jr., and Harold F. Levinson. Evolution of Comets into Asteroids. Southwest Research Institute, Planetary Science Directorate. 2002. Web Retrieved 3 Aug. 2010)For almost two centuries, from the discovery of Ceres in 1801 until the discovery of the first centaur, Chiron, in 1977, all known asteroids spent most of their time at or within the orbit of Jupiter, though a few such as Hidalgo ventured far beyond Jupiter for part of their orbit. When astronomers started finding more small bodies that permanently resided further out than Jupiter, now called centaurs, they numbered them among the traditional asteroids, though there was debate over whether they should be classified as asteroids or as a new type of object. Then, when the first object, QB1, was discovered in 1992, and especially when large numbers of similar objects started turning up, new terms were invented to sidestep the issue: Kuiper-belt object, object, object, and so on. These inhabit the cold outer reaches of the Solar System where ices remain solid and comet-like bodies are not expected to exhibit much cometary activity; if centaurs or trans-Neptunian objects were to venture close to the Sun, their volatile ices would sublimate, and traditional approaches would classify them as comets and not asteroids.The innermost of these are the Kuiper-belt objects, called objects partly to avoid the need to classify them as asteroids or comets.(Are Kuiper Belt Objects asteroids?, Ask an astronomer, Cornell University) They are believed to be predominantly comet-like in composition, though some may be more akin to asteroids.(Asteroids and Comets, NASA website) Furthermore, most do not have the highly eccentric orbits associated with comets, and the ones so far discovered are larger than traditional comet nuclei. (The much more distant cloud is hypothesized to be the main reservoir of dormant comets.) Other recent observations, such as the analysis of the cometary dust collected by the Stardust probe, are increasingly blurring the distinction between comets and asteroids,(Comet Dust Seems More Asteroidy Scientific American, January 25, 2008) suggesting a continuum between asteroids and comets rather than a sharp dividing line.(Comet samples are surprisingly asteroid-like, New Scientist, 24 January 2008)The minor planets beyond Jupiters orbit are sometimes also called asteroids, especially in popular presentations.(For instance, a joint NASA-JPL public-outreach website states: (See http://ssd.jpl.nasa.gov/?asteroids))However, it is becoming increasingly common for the term asteroid to be restricted to minor planets of the inner Solar System.( Therefore, this article will restrict itself for the most part to the classical asteroids: objects of the belt, trojans, and objects.When the IAU introduced the class Small Solar System Bodies in 2006 to include most objects previously classified as minor planets and comets, they created the class of planets for the largest minor planetsthose that have enough mass to have become ellipsoidal under their own gravity. According to the IAU, the term minor planet may still be used, but generally the term Small Solar System Body will be preferred.(Questions and Answers on Planets, IAU) Currently only the largest object in the asteroid belt, Ceres, at about  across, has been placed in the dwarf planet category, although there are several large asteroids (Vesta, Pallas, and Hygiea) that may be classified as dwarf planets when their shapes are better known.(Three new planets may join solar system, New Scientist, 16 August 2006) Formation It is believed that planetesimals in the asteroid belt evolved much like the rest of the nebula until Jupiter neared its current mass, at which point excitation from resonances with Jupiter ejected over 99% of planetesimals in the belt. Simulations and a discontinuity in spin rate and spectral properties suggest that asteroids larger than approximately  in diameter accreted during that early era, whereas smaller bodies are fragments from collisions between asteroids during or after the Jovian disruption.() Ceres and Vesta grew large enough to melt and differentiate, with heavy metallic elements sinking to the core, leaving rocky minerals in the crust.()In the model, many Kuiper-belt objects are captured in the outer asteroid belt, at distances greater than 2.6 AU. Most were later ejected by Jupiter, but those that remained may be the asteroids, and possibly include Ceres.(William B. McKinnon, 2008, On The Possibility Of Large KBOs Being Injected Into The Outer Asteroid Belt. American Astronomical Society, DPS meeting #40, #38.03) Distribution within the Solar System Image:InnerSolarSystem-en.png|250px|thumb|right|The belt (white) and the asteroids (green)Various dynamical groups of asteroids have been discovered orbiting in the inner Solar System. Their orbits are perturbed by the gravity of other bodies in the Solar System and by the effect. Significant populations include: Asteroid belt The majority of known asteroids orbit within the asteroid belt between the orbits of Mars and Jupiter, generally in relatively low-eccentricity (i.e., not very elongated) orbits. This belt is now estimated to contain between 1.1 and 1.9 million asteroids larger than  in diameter,() and millions of smaller ones.(World Book at NASA) These asteroids may be remnants of the disk, and in this region the accretion of planetesimals into planets during the formative period of the Solar System was prevented by large gravitational perturbations by Jupiter. Trojans Trojan asteroids are a population that share an orbit with a larger planet or moon, but do not collide with it because they orbit in one of the two points of stability, L4 and L5, which lie 60 ahead of and behind the larger body.The most significant population of Trojan asteroids are the Trojans. Although fewer Jupiter Trojans have been discovered as of 2010, it is thought that they are as numerous as the asteroids in the asteroid belt.A couple trojans have also been found orbiting with Mars.(Neptune also has a few known trojans, and these are thought to actually be much more numerous than the Jovian trojans. However, they are often included in the trans-Neptunian population rather than counted with the asteroids.) Near-Earth asteroids Near-Earth asteroids, or NEAs, are asteroids that have orbits that pass close    to that of Earth.  Asteroids that actually cross the Earths orbital path are known as Earth-crossers. As of May 2010, 7,075 near-Earth asteroids are known and the number over one kilometre in diameter is estimated to be 5001,000. Characteristics  Size distribution Asteroids vary greatly in size, from almost 1000 kilometres for the largest down to rocks just tens of metres across.(Below 10 metres, these rocks are by convention considered to be meteoroids.) The three largest are very much like miniature planets: they are roughly spherical, have at least partly differentiated interiors,() and are thought to be surviving protoplanets. The vast majority, however, are much smaller and are irregularly shaped; they are thought to be either surviving planetesimals or fragments of larger bodies.The planet Ceres is by far the largest asteroid, with a diameter of . The next largest are Pallas and Vesta, both with diameters of just over . Vesta is the only main-belt asteroid that can, on occasion, be visible to the naked eye. On some rare occasions, a near-Earth asteroid may briefly become visible without technical aid; see Apophis.The mass of all the objects of the belt, lying between the orbits of Mars and Jupiter, is estimated to be about 2.8-3.2 kg, or about 4 percent of the mass of the Moon. Of this, Ceres comprises 0.95 kg, a third of the total.() Adding in the next three most massive objects, Vesta (9%), Pallas (7%), and Hygiea (3%), brings this figure up to 51%; while the three after that, Davida (1.2%), Interamnia (1.0%), and Europa (0.9%), only add another 3% to the total mass. The number of asteroids then increases rapidly as their individual masses decrease.The number of asteroids decreases markedly with size. Although this generally follows a law, there are bumps at 5 km and 100 km, where more asteroids than expected from a distribution are found.(Davis 2002, Asteroids III, cited by eljko Ivezi)Largest asteroidsimage:masses of asteroids vs main belt.png|thumb|300px|right|The relative masses of the twelve largest asteroids known,(Recent Asteroid Mass Determinations. Maintained by Jim Baer. Last updated 2010-12-12. Access date 2011-09-02. The values of Juno and Herculina may be off by as much as 16%, and Euphrosyne by a third. The order of the lower eight may change as better data is acquired, but the values do not overlap with any known asteroid outside these twelve.) compared to the remaining mass of the asteroid belt.()  Although their location in the asteroid belt excludes them from planet status, the four largest objects, Ceres, Vesta, Pallas, and Hygiea, are remnant protoplanets that share many characteristics common to planets, and are untypical compared to the majority of potato-shaped asteroids.Ceres is the only asteroid large enough for its gravity to force it into a spheroidal shape, and so, according to the IAUs 2006 resolution on the definition of a planet, it has been classified as a planet.() Vesta may eventually be so classified as well. Ceres has a much higher absolute magnitude than the other asteroids, of around 3.32,() and may possess a surface layer of ice.() Like the planets, Ceres is differentiated: it has a crust, a mantle and a core.( Vesta, too, has a differentiated interior, though it formed inside the Solar Systems frost line, and so is devoid of water;() its composition is mainly of basaltic rock such as olivine.( Pallas is unusual in that, like Uranus, it rotates on its side, with one pole regularly facing the Sun and the other facing away.() Its composition is similar to that of Ceres: high in carbon and silicon, and perhaps partially differentiated.() Hygiea is a carbonaceous asteroid and, unlike the other largest asteroids, lies relatively close to the of the ecliptic.()RotationMeasurements of the rotation rates of large asteroids in the main belt show that there is an upper limit. No asteroid with a diameter larger than 100 meters has a period of rotation faster than 2.2 hours. For asteroids rotating faster than approximately this rate, the inertia at the surface is greater than the gravitational force, so any loose surface material would be flung out. However, a solid object should be able to rotate much more rapidly. This suggests that most asteroids with a diameter over 100 meters are piles formed through accumulation of debris after collisions between asteroids.() Composition The physical composition of asteroids is varied and in most cases poorly understood. Ceres appears to be composed of a rocky core covered by an icy mantle, where Vesta is thought to have a nickel-iron core, olivine mantle, and basaltic crust.(http://hubblesite.org/newscenter/archive/releases/1995/20/image/) Hygiea, however, which appears to have a uniformly primitive composition of carbonaceous chondrite, is thought to be the largest undifferentiated asteroid. Most of the smaller asteroids are thought to be piles of rubble held together loosely by gravity, though the largest are probably solid. Some asteroids have moons or are co-orbiting binaries: Rubble piles, moons, binaries, and scattered families are believed to be the results of collisions that disrupted a parent asteroid.Asteroids contain traces of amino-acids and other organic compounds, and some speculate that asteroid impacts may have seeded the early Earth with the chemicals necessary to initiate life, or may have even brought life itself to Earth. (See also panspermia.)(Life is Sweet: Sugar-Packing Asteroids May Have Seeded Life on Earth, Space.com, 19 December 2001) In August 2011, a report, based on NASA studies with meteorites found on Earth, was published suggesting DNA and RNA components (adenine, guanine and related molecules) may have been formed on asteroids and comets in space.()()()Only one asteroid, 4 Vesta, which has a reflective surface, is normally visible to the naked eye, and this only in very dark skies when it is favorably positioned. Rarely, small asteroids passing close to Earth may be naked-eye visible for a short time.(Closest Flyby of Large Asteroid to be Naked-Eye Visible, Space.com, 4 February 2005)Composition is calculated from three primary sources: albedo, surface spectrum, and density. The last can only be determined accurately by observing the orbits of moons the asteroid might have. So far, every asteroid with moons has turned out to be a rubble pile, a loose conglomeration of rock and metal that may be half empty space by volume. The investigated asteroids are as large as 280 km in diameter, and include Hermione (268186183 km), and Sylvia (384262232 km). Only half a dozen asteroids are larger than 87 Sylvia, though none of them have moons; however, some smaller asteroids are thought to be more massive, suggesting they may not have been disrupted, and indeed Davida, the same size as Sylvia to within measurement error, is estimated to be two and a half times as massive, though this is highly uncertain. The fact that such large asteroids as Sylvia can be rubble piles, presumably due to disruptive impacts, has important consequences for the formation of the Solar system: Computer simulations of collisions involving solid bodies show them destroying each other as often as merging, but colliding rubble piles are more likely to merge. This means that the cores of the planets could have formed relatively quickly.(Marchis, Descamps, et al. Icarus, Feb. 2011)Surface featuresImage:(253) mathilde.jpg|thumb|right|Mathilde, a asteroid measuring about  across, covered in craters half that size. Photograph taken in 1997 by the Shoemaker probe.Most asteroids outside the big four (Ceres, Pallas, Vesta, and Hygiea) are likely to be broadly similar in appearance, if irregular in shape. 50-km Mathilde (shown at right) is a rubble pile saturated with craters with diameters the size of the asteroids radius, and Earth-based observations of 300-km Davida, one of the largest asteroids after the big four, reveal a similarly angular profile, suggesting it is also saturated with radius-size craters.(A.R. Conrad et al. 2007. Direct measurement of the size, shape, and pole of 511 Davida with Keck AO in a single night, Icarus, doi:10.1016/j.icarus.2007.05.004) Medium-sized asteroids such as Mathilde and Ida that have been observed up close also reveal a deep regolith covering the surface. Of the big four, Pallas and Hygiea are practically unknown. Vesta has compression fractures encircling a radius-size crater at its south pole but is otherwise a spheroid. Ceres seems quite different in the glimpses Hubble has provided, with surface features that are unlikely to be due to simple craters and impact basins, but details will not be known until Dawn arrives in 2015. Classification Asteroids are commonly classified according to two criteria: the characteristics of their orbits, and features of their reflectance spectrum. Orbital classification Many asteroids have been placed in groups and families based on their orbital characteristics. Apart from the broadest divisions, it is customary to name a group of asteroids after the first member of that group to be discovered. Groups are relatively loose dynamical associations, whereas families are tighter and result from the catastrophic break-up of a large parent asteroid sometime in the past.() Families have only been recognized within the belt. They were first recognised by Hirayama in 1918 and are often called families in his honor.About 30% to 35% of the bodies in the asteroid belt belong to dynamical families each thought to have a common origin in a past collision between asteroids.  A family has also been associated with the plutoid planet . Quasi-satellites and horseshoe objects Some asteroids have unusual orbits that are co-orbital with the Earth or some other planet. Examples are Cruithne and . The first instance of this type of orbital arrangement was discovered between Saturns moons Epimetheus and Janus.Sometimes these horseshoe objects temporarily become quasi-satellites for a few decades or a few hundred years, before returning to their earlier status. Both Earth and Venus are known to have quasi-satellites.Such objects, if associated with Earth or Venus or even hypothetically Mercury, are a special class of asteroids.  However, such objects could be associated with outer planets as well. Spectral classification Image:433eros.jpg|thumb|right|This picture of Eros shows the view looking from one end of the asteroid across the gouge on its underside and toward the opposite end. Features as small as  across can be seen.In 1975, an asteroid taxonomic system based on colour, albedo, and spectral shape was developed by R. Chapman, Morrison, and Zellner.() These properties are thought to correspond to the composition of the asteroids surface material. The original classification system had three categories: C-types for dark carbonaceous objects (75% of known asteroids), S-types for stony (silicaceous) objects (17% of known asteroids) and U for those that did not fit into either C or S. This classification has since been expanded to include many other asteroid types. The number of types continues to grow as more asteroids are studied.The two most widely used taxonomies now used are the Tholen classification and SMASS classification. The former was proposed in 1984 by J. Tholen, and was based on data collected from an eight-color asteroid survey performed in the 1980s. This resulted in 14 asteroid categories.() In 2002, the Small Main-Belt Asteroid Spectroscopic Survey resulted in a modified version of the Tholen taxonomy with 24 different types. Both systems have three broad categories of C, S, and X asteroids, where X consists of mostly metallic asteroids, such as the M-type. There are also several smaller classes.()Note that the proportion of known asteroids falling into the various spectral types does not necessarily reflect the proportion of all asteroids that are of that type; some types are easier to detect than others, biasing the totals. Problems Originally, spectral designations were based on inferences of an asteroids composition.() However, the correspondence between spectral class and composition is not always very good, and a variety of classifications is in use. This has led to significant confusion. While asteroids of different spectral classifications are likely to be composed of different materials, there are no assurances that asteroids within the same taxonomic class are composed of similar materials.At present, the spectral classification based on several coarse resolution spectroscopic surveys in the 1990s is still the standard. Scientists cannot agree on a better taxonomic system, largely due to the difficulty of obtaining detailed measurements consistently for a large sample of asteroids (e.g. finer resolution spectra, or non-spectral data such as densities would be very useful). Exploration Image:951 Gaspra.jpg|thumb|right|Gaspra is the first asteroid to be imaged in close-up.imaged by the Dawn spacecraftUntil the age of space travel, objects in the asteroid belt were merely pinpricks of light in even the largest telescopes and their shapes and terrain remained a mystery. The best modern ground-based telescopes and the Earth-orbiting Space Telescope can resolve a small amount of detail on the surfaces of the largest asteroids, but even these mostly remain little more than fuzzy blobs. Limited information about the shapes and compositions of asteroids can be inferred from their curves (their variation in brightness as they rotate) and their spectral properties, and asteroid sizes can be estimated by timing the lengths of star occulations (when an asteroid passes directly in front of a star). Radar imaging can yield good information about asteroid shapes and orbital and rotational parameters, especially for near-Earth asteroids. In terms of delta v and propellant requirements, NEOs are more easily accessible than the Moon.(A Piloted Orion Flight to a Near-Earth Object: A Feasibility Study)The first close-up photographs of asteroid-like objects were taken in 1971 when the 9 probe imaged Phobos and Deimos, the two small moons of Mars, which are probably captured asteroids. These images revealed the irregular, potato-like shapes of most asteroids, as did later images from the Voyager probes of the small moons of the giants.The first true asteroid to be photographed in close-up was Gaspra in 1991, followed in 1993 by Ida and its moon Dactyl, all of which were imaged by the Galileo probe en route to Jupiter.The first dedicated asteroid probe was Shoemaker, which photographed Mathilde in 1997, before entering into orbit around Eros, finally landing on its surface in 2001.Other asteroids briefly visited by spacecraft en route to other destinations include Braille (by Space 1 in 1999), and Annefrank (by Stardust in 2002).In September 2005, the Japanese Hayabusa probe started studying Itokawa in detail and was plagued with difficulties, but returned samples of its surface to earth on June 13, 2010.The European Rosetta probe (launched in 2004) flew by teins in 2008 and Lutetia, the second-largest asteroid visited to date, in 2010.In September 2007, NASA launched the Dawn Mission, which started orbiting the protoplanet Vesta in July 2011, and is to orbit Ceres in 2015. 4 Vesta is the largest asteroid visited to date.It has been suggested that asteroids might be used as a source of materials that may be rare or exhausted on earth (mining), or materials for constructing habitats (see of the asteroids). Materials that are heavy and expensive to launch from earth may someday be mined from asteroids and used for manufacturing and construction. Fiction Asteroids and the asteroid belt are a staple of science fiction stories. Asteroids play several potential roles in science fiction: as places human beings might colonize, resources for extracting minerals, hazards encountered by spaceships traveling between two other points, and as a threat to life on Earth by potential impact. See also * belt* mining* Marco Polo* probe* BOOTES (Burst Observer and Optical Transient Exploring System)* Asteroid groups and families* Asteroids* Binary asteroids* (minor planet)* planet* event* deflection strategies* of asteroids named after people* of asteroids named after places* of minor planets* of notable asteroids* of asteroid names* Mesoplanet* planet* Planet Center* object* Orion asteroid mission* Pioneer 10 space probe* of asteroid names Notes ( References  External links * Rocks from the Main Belt asteroids* Alphabetical list of minor planet names (ASCII) (Minor Planet Center)* Near Earth Asteroid Tracking (NEAT)* Asteroids Page at NASAs Solar System Exploration* Asteroid Simulator with Moon and Earth* Everything you wanted to know about comets and asteroids  Provided by Scientist.* Alphabetical and numerical lists of minor planet names (Unicode) (Institute of Applied Astronomy)* Future Asteroid Interception Research* Near Earth Objects Dynamic Site* Asteroids Dynamic Site Up-to-date osculating elements and orbital elements  University of Pisa, Italy.* JPL small bodies database Current down-loadable ASCII table of orbit data and absolute mags H for over 200000 asteroids, sorted by number. Caltech/JPL.* Asteroid naming statistics* Spaceguard UK* Large amount of information on asteroid groups collected by Grard Faure, translation Richard Miles.* 1908 Siberian asteroid* Committee on Small Body Nomenclature* List of minor planet orbital groupings and families from ProjectPluto* Cunningham, Clifford, Introduction to Asteroids: The Next Frontier, ISBN 0-943396-16-6* L. Hilton: When Did the Asteroids Become Minor Planets?* Kirkwood, Daniel; Relations between the Motions of some of the Minor Planets (1874).* Schmadel, L.D. (2003). Dictionary of Minor Planet Names. 5th ed. IAU/Springer-Verlag: Heidelberg.* Asteroid articles in Planetary Science Research Discoveries* Catalogue of the Solar System Small Bodies Orbital Evolutionaf:Asterodeals:Asteroidar:an:Asteroideast:Asteroideaz:Asteroidbn:zh-min-nan:Si-hek-chhebe:be-x-old:bar:Asteroidbs:Asteroidibr:Asteroidennbg:ca:Asteroidecv:cs:Asteroidcy:Asteroidda:Asteroidede:Asteroidet:Asteroidel:eml:Asterides:Asteroideeo:Asteroidoeu:Asteroidefa:tarafr:Astrodefy:Asterodega:Astarideachgl:Asteroideko:hi:hr:Asteroidiio:Asteroido-zonoid:Asteroidia:Asteroideos:is:Smstirniit:Asteroidehe:jv:Asteroidpam:Asteroidkrc:kk:ku:Asterodsw:Asteroidiht:Astewoyidla:Asteroideslv:Asterodslb:Asteroidlt:Asteroidasli:Planetoedhu:Kisbolygmk:ml:mt:Asterojdems:Asteroidnl:Planetodeja:no:Asteroidenn:Asteroideoc:Asterodeuz:Asteroidnds:Asteroidpl:Planetoidapt:Asteroideksh:Asteroidro:Asteroidquyllurcharue:ru:sah:stq:Planetoidensq:Asteroidetscn:Astiridisimple:Asteroidsk:Asteroidsl:Asteroidsr:sh:Asteroidsu:Astroidfi:Asteroidisv:Asteroidtl:Asteroydta:tt:Asteroidlarth:tr:Asteroyittk:Asteroiduk:ur:vec:Asteroidehnh tinhvls:Asterodewar:Asteroydyi:zh-yue:bat-smg:Asteruoidszh:
851
Alfred_Nobel
 signature  Alfred Nobel Signature.svgAlfred Bernhard Nobel () (21 October 1833  10 December 1896) was a Swedish chemist, engineer, innovator, and armaments manufacturer.  He is the inventor of dynamite.  Nobel also owned Bofors, which he had redirected from its previous role as primarily an iron and steel producer to a major manufacturer of cannon and other armaments. Nobel held 355 different patents, dynamite being the most famous. In his last will, he used his enormous fortune to institute the Prizes. The element nobelium was named after him. His name also survives in modern-day companies such as Nobel and Nobel, which are descendents of the companies Nobel himself established.Personal backgroundAlfred Nobel was the third son of Nobel (18011872) and Andriette Ahlsell Nobel (18051889). Through his father he was a descendant of the famous Swedish scientist Olof Rudbeck (1630-1702).  Born in Stockholm on 21 October 1833, he went with his family to Petersburg in 1842, where his father (who had invented modern plywood) started a torpedo works. Alfred studied chemistry with Professor Nikolaevich Zinin. When Alfred was 18, he went to the United States to study chemistry for four years and worked for a short period under Ericsson.(Carlisle, Rodney (2004). Scientific American Inventions and Discoveries, p. 256. John Wiley & Songs, Inc., New Jersey. ISBN 0-471-24410-4.) who designed the American Civil War ironclad Monitor.  In 1859, the factory was left to the care of the second son, Nobel (18311888), who greatly improved the business. Alfred, returning to Sweden with his father after the bankruptcy of their family business, devoted himself to the study of explosives, and especially to the safe manufacture and use of nitroglycerine (discovered in 1847 by Sobrero, one of his fellow students under Pelouze at the of Turin). A big explosion occurred on the 3 September 1864 at their factory in Heleneborg in Stockholm, killing five people.  Among them was Alfreds younger brother Emil.File:Nobels death mask.jpg|thumb|upright|Alfred Nobels mask, at his residence Bjrkborn in Karlskoga, Sweden.File:Alfred Nobel Death mask.jpg|thumb|upright|Alfred Nobels mask, at the Nobel museum in Stockholm, Sweden.File:Bjrkborn exterior.jpg|thumb|upright|The Bjrkborn manor house, Nobels residence on the property of the Bofors iron works at the time of his death.File:Alfred B Nobel.jpg|thumb|upright|A monument to Alfred Bernhard Nobel in Wagga, New South Wales, AustraliaThough Nobel remained unmarried, his biographers note that he had at least three loves. Nobels first love was in Russia with a girl named Alexandra, who rejected his proposal. In 1876 Austro-Bohemian Countess Bertha Kinsky became Alfred Nobels secretary. But after only a brief stay she left him to marry her previous lover, Baron Arthur Gundaccar von Suttner. Though her personal contact with Alfred Nobel had been brief, she corresponded with him until his death in 1896, and it is believed that she was a major influence in his decision to include a peace prize among those prizes provided in his will. Bertha von Suttner was awarded the 1905 Nobel Peace prize, for her sincere peace activities.Nobels third and longest-lasting love was with a flower girl named Sofie Hess from Vienna. This liaison lasted for 18 years and in many of the exchanged letters, Nobel addressed his love as Madame Sofie Nobel. After his death, according to his biographers  Evlanoff and Fluor, and Fant  Nobels letters were locked within the Nobel Institute in Stockholm and became the best-kept secret of the time. They were released only in 1955, to be included with the biographical data of Nobel.The foundations of the Nobel Prize were laid in 1895 when Alfred Nobel wrote his last will, leaving much of his wealth for its establishment. Since 1901, the prize has honored men and women for outstanding achievements in physics, chemistry, medicine, literature and for work in peace.Sri Kantha has suggested that the one personal trait of Nobel that helped him to sharpen his creativity include his talent for information access, via his multi-lingual skills. Despite the lack of formal secondary and tertiary level education, Nobel gained proficiency in six languages: Swedish, French, Russian, English, German and Italian. He also developed literary skills to write poetry in English. His Nemesis, a prose tragedy in four acts about Cenci, partly inspired by Bysshe Shelleys Cenci, was printed while he was dying. The entire stock except for three copies was destroyed immediately after his death, being regarded as scandalous and blasphemous. The first surviving edition (bilingual SwedishEsperanto) was published in Sweden in 2003. The play has been translated to Slovenian via the Esperanto version and to French.() In 2010 it was published in Russia as another bilingual (RussianEsperanto) edition. Nobel was elected a member of the Swedish Academy of Sciences in 1884, the same institution that would later select laureates for two of the Nobel prizes, and he received an doctorate from University in 1893.Alfred Nobel is buried in begravningsplatsen in Stockholm.InventionsNobel found that when nitroglycerin was incorporated in an absorbent inert substance like kieselguhr (earth) it became safer and more convenient to handle, and this mixture he patented in 1867 as dynamite. Nobel demonstrated his explosive for the first time that year, at a quarry in Redhill, Surrey, England. In order to help reestablish his name and improve the image of his business from the earlier controversies associated with the dangerous explosives, Nobel had also considered naming the highly powerful substance Nobels Safety Powder, but settled with Dynamite instead, referring to the Greek word for power.Nobel later on combined nitroglycerin with various nitrocellulose compounds, similar to collodion, but settled on a more efficient recipe combining another nitrate explosive, and obtained a transparent, jelly-like substance, which was a more powerful explosive than dynamite. Gelignite, or blasting gelatin, as it was named, was patented in 1876; and was followed by a host of similar combinations, modified by the addition of potassium nitrate and various other substances. Gelignite was more stable, transportable and conveniently formed to fit into bored holes, like those used in drilling and mining, than the previously used compounds and was adopted as the standard technology for mining in the Age of Engineering bringing Nobel a great amount of financial success, though at a significant cost to his health. An off-shoot of this research resulted in Nobels invention of ballistite, the precursor of many modern smokeless powder explosives and still used as a rocket propellant.The PrizesIn 1888 Alfreds brother Ludvig died while visiting Cannes and a French newspaper erroneously published Alfreds obituary. It condemned him for his invention of dynamite and is said to have brought about his decision to leave a better legacy after his death. The obituary stated  (The merchant of death is dead) and went on to say, Dr. Alfred Nobel, who became rich by finding ways to kill more people faster than ever before, died yesterday. Alfred was disappointed with what he read and concerned with how he would be remembered. On 27 November 1895, at the Swedish-Norwegian Club in Paris, Nobel signed his last will and testament and set aside the bulk of his estate to establish the Prizes, to be awarded annually without distinction of nationality. He died of a stroke on 10 December 1896 at Sanremo, Italy. After taxes and bequests to individuals, Nobels will gave 31,225,000 kronor (equivalent to about 1.8 billion kronor or 250 million US dollars in 2008) to fund the prizes.The first three of these prizes are awarded for eminence in physical science, in chemistry and in medical science or physiology; the fourth is for literary work in an ideal direction and the fifth prize is to be given to the person or society that renders the greatest service to the cause of international fraternity, in the suppression or reduction of standing armies, or in the establishment or furtherance of peace congresses. There is no prize awarded for mathematics,() but see Prize.The formulation for the literary prize being given for a work in an ideal direction ( in Swedish), is cryptic and has caused much confusion. For many years, the Swedish Academy interpreted ideal as idealistic () and used it as a reason not to give the prize to important but less Romantic authors, such as Ibsen and Tolstoy. This interpretation has since been revised, and the prize has been awarded to, for example, Fo and Saramago, who do not belong to the camp of literary idealism.There was room for interpretation by the bodies he had named for deciding on the physical sciences and chemistry prizes, given that he had not consulted them before making the will. In his one-page testament, he stipulated that the money go to discoveries or inventions in the physical sciences and to discoveries or improvements in chemistry. He had opened the door to technological awards, but had not left instructions on how to deal with the distinction between science and technology. Since the deciding bodies he had chosen were more concerned with the former, the prizes went to scientists and not to engineers, technicians or other inventors.In 2001, Alfred Nobels great-grandnephew, Peter Nobel (b. 1931), asked the Bank of Sweden to differentiate its award to economists given in Alfred Nobels memory from the five other awards. This has caused much controversy whether the of Sweden Prize in Economic Sciences in Memory of Alfred Nobel is actually a Nobel Prize / Peace Prize.See also* Nobel University, Dnipropetrovsk, Ukraine* OntarioNotesrefs(Britannica, Alfred Nobel)(Fant, Kenne (Ruuth, Marianne, transl.) (1991). Alfred Nobel: a biography. New York: Arcade Publishing ISBN 1-55970-328-8, p. 327)(History Channel, Marvels, episode 038 (originally aired 21 June 1999))()References* Nobel, Alfred Bernhard in the 1911 Encyclopdia Britannica* Schck, H, and Sohlman, R., (1929). The Life of Alfred Nobel. London: William Heineman Ltd.* Alfred Nobel US Patent No 78,317, dated 26 May 1868* Evlanoff, M. and Fluor, M. Alfred Nobel  The Loneliest Millionaire. Los Angeles, Ward Ritchie Press, 1969.* Sohlman, R. The Legacy of Alfred Nobel, transl. Schubert E. London: The Bodley Head, 1983 (Swedish original, Ett Testamente, published in 1950).* Jorpes, J.E. Alfred Nobel. British Medical Journal, Jan.3, 1959, 1(5113): 16.* Sri Kantha, S. Alfred Nobels unusual creativity; an analysis. Medical Hypotheses, April 1999; 53(4): 338344.* Sri Kantha, S. Could nitroglycerine poisoning be the cause of Alfred Nobels anginal pains and premature death? Medical Hypotheses, 1997; 49: 303306.External links* Alfred Nobel  Man behind the Prizes* Biography at the Norwegian Nobel Institute* Nobelprize.org* The Nobels in Baku in Azerbaijan International, Vol 10.2 (Summer 2002), 5659.* The Nobel Prize in Postage Stamps* A German branch or followup (German) PLACE OF DEATH  Sanremo, ItalyNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobel NobelNobelNobelNobelsNobelNobelBernhard NobelBernhard NobelNobelja:NobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobelNobel NobelNobelNobelNobelzh-yue:zh:
874
Ancient_Egypt
File:Egypt.Giza.Sphinx.01.jpg|thumb|280px|The Sphinx and the of Giza are among the most recognizable symbols of the civilization of ancient Egypt.Ancient Egypt was an ancient civilization of Northeastern Africa, concentrated along the lower reaches of the Nile River in what is now the modern country of Egypt. Egyptian civilization coalesced around 3150 BC (according to Egyptian chronology)() with the political unification of and Lower Egypt under the first pharaoh.(Dodson (2004) p. 46)  The of ancient Egypt occurred in a series of stable Kingdoms, separated by periods of relative instability known as Intermediate Periods. The Kingdom of the Bronze Age, the Middle Kingdom of the Bronze Age and the Kingdom of the Bronze Age. Egypt reached the pinnacle of its power during the New Kingdom, in the period, after which it entered a period of slow decline. Egypt was conquered by a succession of foreign powers in this late period. In the aftermath of the Greats death, one of his generals, Soter, established himself as the new ruler of Egypt. This Dynasty ruled Egypt until 30 BC, when it fell to the Empire and became a Roman province.(Clayton (1994) p. 217)The success of ancient Egyptian civilization came partly from its ability to adapt to the conditions of the Nile River Valley. The predictable flooding and controlled irrigation of the fertile valley produced surplus crops, which fueled development and culture. With resources to spare, the administration sponsored mineral exploitation of the valley and surrounding desert regions, the early development of an independent writing system, the organization of collective construction and agricultural projects, trade with surrounding regions, and a military intended to defeat foreign enemies and assert Egyptian dominance. Motivating and organizing these activities was a bureaucracy of elite scribes, religious leaders, and administrators under the control of a Pharaoh who ensured the cooperation and unity of the Egyptian people in the context of an elaborate system of religious beliefs.(James (2005) p. 8)(Manuelian (1998) pp. 67)The many achievements of the ancient Egyptians include the quarrying, surveying and construction techniques that facilitated the building of monumental pyramids, temples, and obelisks; a system of mathematics, a practical and effective system of medicine, irrigation systems and agricultural production techniques, the first known ships,( faience and glass technology, new forms of literature, and the earliest known peace treaty.(Clayton (1994) p. 153) Egypt left a lasting legacy. Its art and architecture were widely copied, and its antiquities carried off to far corners of the world. Its monumental ruins have inspired the imaginations of travellers and writers for centuries. A new-found respect for antiquities and excavations in the early modern period led to the scientific investigation of Egyptian civilization and a greater appreciation of its cultural legacy.(James (2005) p. 84)HistoryThe Nile has been the lifeline of its region for much of human history.(Shaw (2002) pp. 17, 6769) The fertile floodplain of the Nile gave humans the opportunity to develop a settled agricultural economy and a more sophisticated, centralized society that became a cornerstone in the history of human civilization.(Shaw (2002) p. 17)  Nomadic modern human hunter-gatherers began living in the Nile valley through the end of the Middle Pleistocene some 120 thousand years ago. By the late Paleolithic period, the arid climate of Northern Africa became increasingly hot and dry, forcing the populations of the area to concentrate along the region.Predynastic periodIn Predynastic and Early Dynastic times, the Egyptian climate was much less arid than it is today. Large regions of Egypt were covered in treed savanna and traversed by herds of grazing ungulates. Foliage and fauna were far more prolific in all environs and the Nile region supported large populations of waterfowl. Hunting would have been common for Egyptians, and this is also the period when many animals were first domesticated.( )By about 5500 BC, small tribes living in the Nile valley had developed into a series of cultures demonstrating firm control of agriculture and husbandry, and identifiable by their pottery and personal items, such as combs, bracelets, and beads. The largest of these early cultures in upper Egypt, the Badari, was known for its high quality ceramics, tools, and its use of copper.(Hayes (1964) p. 220)In Northern Egypt, the Badari was followed by Amratian and Gerzean cultures,(Childe, V. Gordon (1953), New light on the most ancient Near East (Praeger Publications)) which brought a number of technological improvements. In Gerzian times, early evidence exists of contact with Canaan and the Byblos coast.(Patai, Raphael (1998), Children of Noah: Jewish Seafaring in Ancient Times (Princeton Uni Press))In southern Egypt, the Naqada culture, similar to the Badari, began to expand along the Nile by about 4000 BC. As early as the Naqada I Period, predynastic Egyptians imported obsidian from Ethiopia, used to shape blades and other objects from flakes.(Barbara G. Aston, James A. Harrell, Ian Shaw (2000). Paul T. Nicholson and Ian Shaw editors. Stone, in Ancient Egyptian Materials and Technology, Cambridge, 577, pp. 4647. Also note: Barbara G. Aston (1994). Ancient Egyptian Stone Vessels, Studien zur Archologie und Geschichte Altgyptens 5, Heidelberg, pp. 2326. (See on-line posts: http://www.digitalegypt.ucl.ac.uk/stone/obsidian.html and http://www.digitalegypt.ucl.ac.uk/foreignrelations/obsidian.html.)) Over a period of about 1,000 years, the Naqada culture developed from a few small farming communities into a powerful civilization whose leaders were in complete control of the people and resources of the Nile valley.() Establishing a power center at Hierakonpolis, and later at Abydos, Naqada III leaders expanded their control of Egypt northwards along the Nile.(Shaw (2002) p. 61) They also traded with Nubia to the south, the oases of the western desert to the west, and the cultures of the Mediterranean to the east.(  Royal Nubian burials at Qustul produced artifacts bearing the oldest known examples of Egyptian dynastic symbols, such as the white crown of Egypt and falcon.()() The Naqada culture manufactured a diverse selection of material goods, reflective of the increasing power and wealth of the elite, as well as societal personal-use items, which included combs, small statuary, painted pottery, high quality decorative stone vases, palettes, and jewelry made of gold, lapis, and ivory. They also developed a glaze known as faience, which was used well into the Roman Period to decorate cups, amulets, and figurines.() During the last predynastic phase, the Naqada culture began using written symbols that eventually evolved into a full system of hieroglyphs for writing the ancient Egyptian language.(Allen (2000) p. 1)Early Dynastic PeriodThe 3rd century BC Egyptian priest Manetho grouped the long line of pharaohs from Menes to his own time into 30 dynasties, a system still used today.(Clayton (1994) p. 6) He chose to begin his official history with the king named Meni (or Menes in Greek) who was then believed to have united the two kingdoms of Upper and Egypt (around 3100 BC).(Shaw (2002) pp. 7880) The transition to a unified state actually happened more gradually than ancient Egyptian writers would have us believe, and there is no contemporary record of Menes. Some scholars now believe, however, that the mythical Menes may have actually been the pharaoh Narmer, who is depicted wearing royal regalia on the ceremonial Narmer Palette in a symbolic act of unification.(Clayton (1994) pp. 1213) In the Early Dynastic Period about 3150 BC, the first of the Dynastic pharaohs solidified their control over lower Egypt by establishing a capital at Memphis, from which they could control the force and agriculture of the fertile delta region as well as the lucrative and critical routes to the Levant. The increasing power and wealth of the pharaohs during the early dynastic period was reflected in their elaborate mastaba tombs and mortuary cult structures at Abydos, which were used to celebrate the deified pharaoh after his death.(Shaw (2002) p. 70) The strong institution of kingship developed by the pharaohs served to legitimize state control over the land, labor, and resources that were essential to the survival and growth of ancient Egyptian civilization.(){|File:NarmerPalette ROM-gamma.jpg|thumb|The Palette depicts the unification of the Two Lands.(Robins (1997) p. 32)Old KingdomStunning advances in architecture, art, and technology were made during the Kingdom, fueled by the increased productivity made possible by a well-developed central administration.(James (2005) p. 40)  Some of Ancient Egypts crowning achievements, the Giza pyramids and Great Sphinx, were constructed during the Old Kingdom. Under the direction of the vizier, state officials collected taxes, coordinated irrigation projects to improve yield, drafted peasants to work on construction projects, and established a justice system to maintain peace and order.(Shaw (2002) p. 102) Along with the rising importance of a central administration arose a new class of educated scribes and officials who were granted estates by the pharaoh in payment for their services. Pharaohs also made land grants to their mortuary cults and local temples to ensure that these institutions had the resources to worship the pharaoh after his death. By the end of the Old Kingdom, five centuries of these feudal practices had slowly eroded the power of the pharaoh, who could no longer afford to support a large centralized administration.(Shaw (2002) pp. 1167) As the power of the pharaoh diminished, regional governors called nomarchs began to challenge the supremacy of the pharaoh. This, coupled with severe droughts between 2200 and 2150 BC,() ultimately caused the country to enter a 140-year period of famine and strife known as the First Intermediate Period.(Clayton (1994) p. 69)First Intermediate PeriodAfter Egypts government collapsed at the end of the Old Kingdom, the administration could no longer support or stabilize the countrys economy. Regional governors could not rely on the king for help in times of crisis, and the ensuing food shortages and political disputes escalated into famines and small-scale civil wars. Yet despite difficult problems, local leaders, owing no tribute to the pharaoh, used their newfound independence to establish a thriving culture in the provinces. Once in control of their own resources, the provinces became economically richera fact demonstrated by larger and better burials among all social classes.(Shaw (2002) p. 120) In bursts of creativity, provincial artisans adopted and adapted cultural motifs formerly restricted to the royalty of the Old Kingdom, and scribes developed literary styles that expressed the optimism and originality of the period.(Shaw (2002) p. 146)Free from their loyalties to the pharaoh, local rulers began competing with each other for territorial control and power. By 2160 BC, rulers in Herakleopolis controlled Lower Egypt, while a rival clan based in Thebes, the Intef family, took control of Upper Egypt. As the Intefs grew in power and expanded their control northward, a clash between the two rival dynasties became inevitable. Around 2055 BC the Theban forces under Nebhepetre Mentuhotep II finally defeated the Herakleopolitan rulers, reuniting the Two Lands and inaugurating a period of economic and cultural renaissance known as the Middle Kingdom.(Clayton (1994) p. 29)Middle KingdomThe pharaohs of the Middle Kingdom restored the countrys prosperity and stability, thereby stimulating a resurgence of art, literature, and monumental building projects.(Shaw (2002) p. 148) Mentuhotep II and his 11th Dynasty successors ruled from Thebes, but the vizier I, upon assuming kingship at the beginning of the 12th Dynasty around 1985 BC, shifted the nations capital to the city of Itjtawy located in Faiyum.(Clayton (1994) p. 79) From Itjtawy, the pharaohs of the 12th Dynasty undertook a far-sighted reclamation and irrigation scheme to increase agricultural output in the region. Moreover, the military reconquered territory in Nubia rich in quarries and gold mines, while laborers built a defensive structure in the Eastern Delta, called the Walls-of-the-Ruler, to defend against foreign attack.(Shaw (2002) p. 158)Having secured military and political security and vast agricultural and mineral wealth, the nations population, arts, and religion flourished. In contrast to elitist Old Kingdom attitudes towards the gods, the Middle Kingdom experienced an increase in expressions of personal piety and what could be called a democratization of the afterlife, in which all people possessed a soul and could be welcomed into the company of the gods after death.(Shaw (2002) pp. 17982) Middle Kingdom literature featured sophisticated themes and characters written in a confident, eloquent style,( and the relief and portrait sculpture of the period capturedsubtle, individual details that reached new heights of technical perfection.(Robins (1997) p. 90)The last great ruler of the Middle Kingdom, III, allowed Asiatic settlers into the delta region to provide a sufficient labor force for his especially active mining and building campaigns. These ambitious building and mining activities, however, combined with inadequate Nile floods later in his reign, strained the economy and precipitated the slow decline into the Second Intermediate Period during the later 13th and 14th dynasties. During this decline, the foreign Asiatic settlers began to seize control of the delta region, eventually coming to power in Egypt as the Hyksos.(Shaw (2002) p. 188)Second Intermediate Period and the HyksosAround 1785 BC, as the power of the Middle Kingdom pharaohs weakened, Asiatic immigrants living in the Eastern Delta town of Avaris seized control of the region and forced the central government to retreat to Thebes, where the pharaoh was treated as a vassal and expected to pay tribute.(Ryholt (1997) p. 310) The Hyksos (foreign rulers) imitated Egyptian models of government and portrayed themselves as pharaohs, thus integrating Egyptian elements into their Middle Bronze Age culture.(Shaw (2002) p. 189)After their retreat, the Theban kings found themselves trapped between the Hyksos to the north and the Hyksos Nubian allies, the Kushites, to the south. After years of inaction tenuous, Thebes gathered enough strength to challenge the Hyksos in a conflict that lasted more than 30 years, until 1555 BC ( The pharaohs Tao II and Kamose were ultimately able to defeat the Nubians, but it was Kamoses successor, I, who successfully waged a series of campaigns that permanently eradicated the Hyksos presence in Egypt. In the New Kingdom that followed, the military became a central priority for the pharaohs seeking to expand Egypts borders and secure her complete dominance of the East.(Shaw (2002) p. 224)New KingdomThe New Kingdom pharaohs established a period of unprecedented prosperity by securing their borders and strengthening diplomatic ties with their neighbors. Military campaigns waged under Tuthmosis I and his grandson Tuthmosis III extended the influence of the pharaohs to the largest empire Egypt had ever seen.  When Tuthmosis III died in 1425 BC, Egypt extended from Niya in north Syria to the fourth waterfall of the Nile in Nubia, cementing loyalties and opening access to critical imports such as bronze and wood.(James (2005) p. 48)  The New Kingdom pharaohs began a large-scale building campaign to promote the god Amun, whose growing cult was based in Karnak. They also constructed monuments to glorify their own achievements, both real and imagined. The female pharaoh Hatshepsut used such propaganda to legitimize her claim to the throne.() Her successful reign was marked by trading expeditions to Punt, an elegant temple, a colossal pair of obelisks and a chapel at Karnak. Despite her achievements, Hatshepsuts nephew-stepson Tuthmosis III sought to erase her legacy near the end of his reign, possibly in retaliation for usurping his throne.(Clayton (1994) p. 108)File:SFEC EGYPT ABUSIMBEL 2006-003.JPG|thumb|upright|left|Four colossal statues of II flank the entrance of his temple Simbel.Around 1350 BC, the stability of the New Kingdom was threatened when Amenhotep IV ascended the throne and instituted a series of radical and chaotic reforms. Changing his name to Akhenaten, he touted the previously obscure sun god Aten as the supreme deity, suppressed the worship of other deities, and attacked the power of the priestly establishment.(Aldred (1988) p. 259) Moving the capital to the new city of Akhetaten (modern-day Amarna), Akhenaten turned a deaf ear to foreign affairs and absorbed himself in his new religion and artistic style. After his death, the cult of the Aten was quickly abandoned, and the subsequent pharaohs Tutankhamun, Ay, and Horemheb erased all mention of Akhenatens heresy, now known as the Period.(Cline (2001) p. 273)Around 1279 BC, II, also known as Ramesses the Great, ascended the throne, and went on to build more temples, erect more statues and obelisks, and sire more children than any other pharaoh in history.(From his two principal wives and large harem, Ramesses II sired more than 100 children. Clayton (1994) p. 146) A bold military leader, Ramesses II led his army against the Hittites in the of Kadesh and, after fighting to a stalemate, finally agreed to the first recorded peace treaty around 1258 BC.(Tyldesley (2001) pp. 767) Egypts wealth, however, made it a tempting target for invasion, particularly by the Libyans and the Peoples. Initially, the military was able to repel these invasions, but Egypt eventually lost control of Syria and Palestine. The impact of external threats was exacerbated by internal problems such as corruption, tomb robbery and civil unrest. The high priests at the temple of Amun in Thebes accumulated vast tracts of land and wealth, and their growing power splintered the country during the Third Intermediate Period.(James (2005) p. 54) Third Intermediate Period Following the death of XI in 1078 BC, Smendes assumed authority over the northern part of Egypt, ruling from the city of Tanis. The south was effectively controlled by the High Priests of Amun at Thebes, who recognized Smendes in name only.(Cerny (1975) p. 645) During this time, Libyans had been settling in the western delta, and chieftains of these settlers began increasing their autonomy. Libyan princes took control of the delta under I in 945 BC, founding the so-called Libyan or Bubastite dynasty that ruled for some 200 years. Shoshenq also gained control of southern Egypt by placing his family members in important priestly positions. Libyan control began to erode as a rival dynasty in the delta arose in Leontopolis, and Kushites threatened from the south.Drawing on millennia of interaction (trade, acculturation, occupation, assimilation, and war()) with Northern Egyptians,() the Kushite king Piye left his spiritual homeland in Napata and invaded Northern Egypt around 727 BC.  Piye easily seized control of Thebes and eventually the Delta(Shaw (2002) p. 345) and recorded the episode on his stela of victory.  Piye set the stage for subsequent 25th dynasty pharaohs,() such as Taharqa, to reunite the Two lands of Northern and Southern Egypt.  The reunited Nile valley empire was as large as it had been since the New Kingdom.  The 25th dynasty ushered in a renaissance period for Ancient Egypt.()   Religion, the arts, and architecture were restored to their glorious Old, Middle, and New Kingdom forms.  Pharaohs, such as Taharqa, built or restored temples and monuments throughout the Nile valley, including at Memphis, Karnak, Kawa, Jebel Barkal, etc.()   It was during the 25th dynasty that the Nile valley saw the first widespread construction of pyramids (many in modern Sudan) since the Middle Kingdom.()()()Egypts far-reaching prestige declined considerably towards the end of the Third Intermediate Period. Its foreign allies had fallen under the Assyrian sphere of influence, and by 700 BC war between the two states became inevitable. Between 671 and 667 BC the Assyrians began their attack on Egypt. The reigns of both Kushite kings Taharqa and his successor, Tanutamun, were filled with constant conflict with the Assyrians, against whom the Nubian rulers enjoyed several victories.(The Kushite Conquest of Egypt, Ancient~Sudan: Nubia.) Ultimately, the Assyrians pushed the Kushites back into Nubia, occupied Memphis, and sacked the temples of Thebes.(Shaw (2002) p. 358)Late PeriodWith no permanent plans for conquest, the Assyrians left control of Egypt to a series of vassals who became known as the Saite kings of the Twenty-Sixth Dynasty. By 653 BC, the Saite king I was able to oust the Assyrians with the help of Greek mercenaries, who were recruited to form Egypts first navy. Greek influence expanded greatly as the city of Naukratis became the home of Greeks in the delta. The Saite kings based in the new capital of Sais witnessed a brief but spirited resurgence in the economy and culture, but in 525 BC, the powerful Persians, led by Cambyses II, began their conquest of Egypt, eventually capturing the pharaoh III at the battle of Pelusium. Cambyses II then assumed the formal title of pharaoh, but ruled Egypt from his home of Susa, leaving Egypt under the control of a satrapy. A few successful revolts against the Persians marked the 5th century BC, but Egypt was never able to permanently overthrow the Persians.(Shaw (2002) p. 383)Following its annexation by Persia, Egypt was joined with Cyprus and Phoenicia in the sixth satrapy of the Achaemenid Persian Empire. This first period of Persian rule over Egypt, also known as the Twenty-Seventh dynasty, ended in 402 BC, and from 380343 BC the Thirtieth Dynasty ruled as the last native royal house of dynastic Egypt, which ended with the kingship of II. A brief restoration of Persian rule, sometimes known as the Thirty-First Dynasty, began in 343 BC, but shortly after, in 332 BC, the Persian ruler Mazaces handed Egypt over to the Great without a fight.(Shaw (2002) p. 385)Ptolemaic DynastyIn 332 BC, the Great conquered Egypt with little resistance from the Persians and was welcomed by the Egyptians as a deliverer. The administration established by Alexanders successors, the Ptolemies, was based on an Egyptian model and based in the new capital city of Alexandria. The city showcased the power and prestige of Greek rule, and became a seat of learning and culture, centered at the famous of Alexandria.(Shaw (2002) p. 405) The of Alexandria lit the way for the many ships that kept trade flowing through the city&mdash;as the Ptolemies made commerce and revenue-generating enterprises, such as papyrus manufacturing, their top priority.(Shaw (2002) p. 411)Greek culture did not supplant native Egyptian culture, as the Ptolemies supported time-honored traditions in an effort to secure the loyalty of the populace. They built new temples in Egyptian style, supported traditional cults, and portrayed themselves as pharaohs. Some traditions merged, as Greek and Egyptian gods were syncretized into composite deities, such as Serapis, and classical Greek forms of sculpture influenced traditional Egyptian motifs. Despite their efforts to appease the Egyptians, the Ptolemies were challenged by native rebellion, bitter family rivalries, and the powerful mob of Alexandria that formed after the death of Ptolemy IV.(Shaw (2002) p. 418) In addition, as Rome relied more heavily on imports of grain from Egypt, the Romans took great interest in the political situation in the country. Continued Egyptian revolts, ambitious politicians, and powerful Syrian opponents made this situation unstable, leading Rome to send forces to secure the country as a province of its empire.(James (2005) p. 62)Roman PeriodFile:Fayum-22.jpg|thumb|left|100px|upright|The mummy portraits epitomize the meeting of Egyptian and Roman cultures.Egypt became a province of the Empire in 30 BC, following the defeat of Marc Antony and Ptolemaic Queen VII by Octavian (later Emperor Augustus) in the of Actium. The Romans relied heavily on grain shipments from Egypt, and the Roman army, under the control of a prefect appointed by the Emperor, quelled rebellions, strictly enforced the collection of heavy taxes, and prevented attacks by bandits, which had become a notorious problem during the period.(James (2005) p. 63) Alexandria became an increasingly important center on the trade route with the orient, as exotic luxuries were in high demand in Rome.(Shaw (2002) p. 426)Although the Romans had a more hostile attitude than the Greeks towards the Egyptians, some traditions such as mummification and worship of the traditional gods continued.(Shaw (2002) p. 422) The art of mummy portraiture flourished, and some of the Roman emperors had themselves depicted as pharaohs, though not to the extent that the Ptolemies had. The former lived outside Egypt and did not perform the ceremonial functions of Egyptian kingship. Local administration became Roman in style and closed to native Egyptians.(From the mid-1st century, Christianity took root in Alexandria as it was seen as another cult that could be accepted. However, it was an uncompromising religion that sought to win converts from paganism and threatened the popular religious traditions. This led to persecution of converts to Christianity, culminating in the great purges of Diocletian starting in 303, but eventually Christianity won out.(Shaw (2003) p. 431) In 391 the Christian Emperor Theodosius introduced legislation that banned pagan rites and closed temples.(The Church in Ancient Society, Henry Chadwick, p. 373, Oxford University Press US, 2001, ISBN 0-19-924695-5) Alexandria became the scene of great anti-pagan riots with public and private religious imagery destroyed.(Christianizing the Roman Empire A.D 100400, MacMullen, p. 63, Yale University Press, 1984, ISBN 0-300-03216-1) As a consequence, Egypts pagan culture was continually in decline. While the native population continued to speak their language, the ability to read hieroglyphic writing slowly disappeared as the role of the Egyptian temple priests and priestesses diminished. The temples themselves were sometimes converted to churches or abandoned to the desert.(Shaw (2002) p. 445)Government and economyAdministration and commerceThe pharaoh was the absolute monarch of the country and, at least in theory, wielded complete control of the land and its resources. The king was the supreme military commander and head of the government, who relied on a bureaucracy of officials to manage his affairs. In charge of the administration was his second in command, the vizier, who acted as the kings representative and coordinated land surveys, the treasury, building projects, the legal system, and the archives.(Manuelian (1998) p. 358) At a regional level, the country was divided into as many as 42 administrative regions called nomes each governed by a nomarch, who was accountable to the vizier for his jurisdiction. The temples formed the backbone of the economy. Not only were they houses of worship, but were also responsible for collecting and storing the nations wealth in a system of granaries and treasuries administered by overseers, who redistributed grain and goods.(Manuelian (1998) p. 363)Much of the economy was centrally organized and strictly controlled. Although the ancient Egyptians did not use coinage until the Late period, they did use a type of money-barter system,(Meskell (2004) p. 23) with standard sacks of grain and the deben, a weight of roughly  of copper or silver, forming a common denominator.(Manuelian (1998) p. 372) Workers were paid in grain; a simple laborer might earn 5 sacks (200 kg or 400 lb) of grain per month, while a foreman might earn 7 sacks (250 kg or 550 lb). Prices were fixed across the country and recorded in lists to facilitate trading; for example a shirt cost five copper deben, while a cow cost 140 deben.( Grain could be traded for other goods, according to the fixed price list.( During the 5th century BC coined money was introduced into Egypt from abroad. At first the coins were used as standardized pieces of metal rather than true money, but in the following centuries international traders came to rely on coinage.(Walbank (1984) p. 125)Social statusEgyptian society was highly stratified, and status was expressly displayed. Farmers made up the bulk of the population, but agricultural produce was owned directly by the state, temple, or noble family that owned the land.(Manuelian (1998) p. 383) Farmers were also subject to a labor tax and were required to work on irrigation or construction projects in a corve system.(James (2005) p. 136) Artists and craftsmen were of higher status than farmers, but they were also under state control, working in the shops attached to the temples and paid directly from the state treasury. Scribes and officials formed the upper class in ancient Egypt, the so-called white kilt class in reference to the bleached linen garments that served as a mark of their rank.(Billard (1978) p. 109) The upper class prominently displayed their social status in art and literature. Below the nobility were the priests, physicians, and engineers with specialized training in their field. Slavery was known in ancient Egypt, but the extent and prevalence of its practice are unclear.()The ancient Egyptians viewed men and women, including people from all social classes except slaves, as essentially equal under the law, and even the lowliest peasant was entitled to petition the vizier and his court for redress.( Both men and women had the right to own and sell property, make contracts, marry and divorce, receive inheritance, and pursue legal disputes in court. Married couples could own property jointly and protect themselves from divorce by agreeing to marriage contracts, which stipulated the financial obligations of the husband to his wife and children should the marriage end. Compared with their counterparts in ancient Greece, Rome, and even more modern places around the world, ancient Egyptian women had a greater range of personal choices and opportunities for achievement. Women such as Hatshepsut and Cleopatra even became pharaohs, while others wielded power as Divine Wives of Amun. Despite these freedoms, ancient Egyptian women did not often take part in official roles in the administration, served only secondary roles in the temples, and were not as likely to be as educated as men.( Also see a BBC History article online for more information on equality in ancient Egypt.(A maintained BBC History article by Dr. Joann Fletcher (last updated 5Nov2009).)Legal systemThe head of the legal system was officially the pharaoh, who was responsible for enacting laws, delivering justice, and maintaining law and order, a concept the ancient Egyptians referred to as Maat.( Although no codes from ancient Egypt survive, court documents show that Egyptian law was based on a common-sense view of right and wrong that emphasized reaching agreements and resolving conflicts rather than strictly adhering to a complicated set of statutes.() Local councils of elders, known as Kenbet in the New Kingdom, were responsible for ruling in court cases involving small claims and minor disputes.( More serious cases involving murder, major land transactions, and tomb robbery were referred to the Great Kenbet, over which the vizier or pharaoh presided. Plaintiffs and defendants were expected to represent themselves and were required to swear an oath that they had told the truth. In some cases, the state took on both the role of prosecutor and judge, and it could torture the accused with beatings to obtain a confession and the names of any co-conspirators. Whether the charges were trivial or serious, court scribes documented the complaint, testimony, and verdict of the case for future reference.(Oakes (2003) p. 472)Punishment for minor crimes involved either imposition of fines, beatings, facial mutilation, or exile, depending on the severity of the offense. Serious crimes such as murder and tomb robbery were punished by execution, carried out by decapitation, drowning, or impaling the criminal on a stake. Punishment could also be extended to the criminals family.( Beginning in the New Kingdom, oracles played a major role in the legal system, dispensing justice in both civil and criminal cases. The procedure was to ask the god a yes or no question concerning the right or wrong of an issue. The god, carried by a number of priests, rendered judgment by choosing one or the other, moving forward or backward, or pointing to one of the answers written on a piece of papyrus or an ostracon.(McDowell (1999) p. 168)AgricultureA combination of favorable geographical features contributed to the success of ancient Egyptian culture, the most important of which was the rich soil resulting from annual inundations of the Nile River. The ancient Egyptians were thus able to produce an abundance of food, allowing the population to devote more time and resources to cultural, technological, and artistic pursuits. management was crucial in ancient Egypt because taxes were assessed based on the amount of land a person owned.(Manuelian (1998) p. 361)Farming in Egypt was dependent on the cycle of the Nile River. The Egyptians recognized three seasons: Akhet (flooding), Peret (planting), and Shemu (harvesting). The flooding season lasted from June to September, depositing on the rivers banks a layer of mineral-rich silt ideal for growing crops. After the floodwaters had receded, the season lasted from October to February. Farmers plowed and planted seeds in the fields, which were irrigated with ditches and canals. Egypt received little rainfall, so farmers relied on the Nile to water their crops.(Nicholson (2000) p. 514) From March to May, farmers used sickles to harvest their crops, which were then threshed with a flail to separate the straw from the grain. Winnowing removed the chaff from the grain, and the grain was then ground into flour, brewed to make beer, or stored for later use.(Nicholson (2000) p. 506)The ancient Egyptians cultivated emmer and barley, and several other cereal grains, all of which were used to make the two main food staples of bread and beer.(Nicholson (2000) p. 510) Flax plants, uprooted before they started flowering, were grown for the fibers of their stems. These fibers were split along their length and spun into thread, which was used to weave sheets of linen and to make clothing. Papyrus growing on the banks of the Nile River was used to make paper. Vegetables and fruits were grown in garden plots, close to habitations and on higher ground, and had to be watered by hand. Vegetables included leeks, garlic, melons, squashes, pulses, lettuce, and other crops, in addition to grapes that were made into wine.(Nicholson (2000) pp. 577 and 630)AnimalsThe Egyptians believed that a balanced relationship between people and animals was an essential element of the cosmic order; thus humans, animals and plants were believed to be members of a single whole.(Strouhal (1989) p. 117) Animals, both domesticated and wild, were therefore a critical source of spirituality, companionship, and sustenance to the ancient Egyptians. Cattle were the most important livestock; the administration collected taxes on livestock in regular censuses, and the size of a herd reflected the prestige and importance of the estate or temple that owned them. In addition to cattle, the ancient Egyptians kept sheep, goats, and pigs. Poultry such as ducks, geese, and pigeons were captured in nets and bred on farms, where they were force-fed with dough to fatten them.(Manuelian (1998) p. 381) The Nile provided a plentiful source of fish. Bees were also domesticated from at least the Old Kingdom, and they provided both honey and wax.(Nicholson (2000) p. 409)The ancient Egyptians used donkeys and oxen as beasts of burden, and they were responsible for plowing the fields and trampling seed into the soil. The slaughter of a fattened ox was also a central part of an offering ritual.( Horses were introduced by the Hyksos in the Second Intermediate Period, and the camel, although known from the New Kingdom, was not used as a beast of burden until the Late Period. There is also evidence to suggest that elephants were briefly utilized in the Late Period, but largely abandoned due to lack of grazing land.( Dogs, cats and monkeys were common family pets, while more exotic pets imported from the heart of Africa, such as lions, were reserved for royalty. Herodotus observed that the Egyptians were the only people to keep their animals with them in their houses.( During the Predynastic and Late periods, the worship of the gods in their animal form was extremely popular, such as the cat goddess Bastet and the ibis god Thoth, and these animals were bred in large numbers on farms for the purpose of ritual sacrifice.(Oakes (2003) p. 229)Natural resourcesEgypt is rich in building and decorative stone, copper and lead ores, gold, and semiprecious stones. These resources allowed the ancient Egyptians to build monuments, sculpt statues, make tools, and jewelry.(Greaves (1929) p. 123) Embalmers used salts from the Wadi Natrun for mummification, which also provided the gypsum needed to make plaster.(Lucas (1962) p. 413) Ore-bearing formations were found in distant, inhospitable wadis in the eastern desert and the Sinai, requiring large, state-controlled expeditions to obtain natural resources found there. There were extensive gold mines in Nubia, and one of the first maps known is of a gold mine in this region. The Hammamat was a notable source of granite, greywacke, and gold. Flint was the first mineral collected and used to make tools, and flint handaxes are the earliest pieces of evidence of habitation in the Nile valley. Nodules of the mineral were carefully flaked to make blades and arrowheads of moderate hardness and durability even after copper was adopted for this purpose.(Nicholson (2000) p. 28) Ancient Egyptians were among the first to use minerals such as sulfur as cosmetic substances.(C.Michael Hogan. 2011. Sulfur. Encyclopedia of Earth, eds. A.Jorgensen and C.J.Cleveland, National Council for Science and the environment, Washington DC)The Egyptians worked deposits of the lead ore galena at Gebel Rosas to make net sinkers, plumb bobs, and small figurines. Copper was the most important metal for toolmaking in ancient Egypt and was smelted in furnaces from malachite ore mined in the Sinai.(Scheel (1989) p. 14) Workers collected gold by washing the nuggets out of sediment in alluvial deposits, or by the more labor-intensive process of grinding and washing gold-bearing quartzite. Iron deposits found in upper Egypt were utilized in the Late Period.(Nicholson (2000) p. 166) High-quality building stones were abundant in Egypt; the ancient Egyptians quarried limestone all along the Nile valley, granite from Aswan, and basalt and sandstone from the wadis of the eastern desert. Deposits of decorative stones such as porphyry, greywacke, alabaster, and carnelian dotted the eastern desert and were collected even before the First Dynasty. In the Ptolemaic and Roman Periods, miners worked deposits of emeralds in Wadi Sikait and amethyst in Wadi el-Hudi.(Nicholson (2000) p. 51)TradeThe ancient Egyptians engaged in trade with their foreign neighbors to obtain rare, exotic goods not found in Egypt. In the Predynastic Period, they established trade with Nubia to obtain gold and incense. They also established trade with Palestine, as evidenced by Palestinian-style oil jugs found in the burials of the First Dynasty pharaohs.(Shaw (2002) p. 72) An Egyptian colony stationed in southern Canaan dates to slightly before the First Dynasty.(Naomi Porat and Edwin van den Brink (editor), An Egyptian Colony in Southern Palestine During the Late Predynastic to Early Dynastic, in The Nile Delta in Transition: 4th to 3rd Millennium BC (1992), pp. 433440.) Narmer had Egyptian pottery produced in Canaan and exported back to Egypt.(Naomi Porat, Local Industry of Egyptian Pottery in Southern Palestine During the Early Bronze I Period, in Bulletin of the Egyptological, Seminar 8 (1986/1987), pp. 109129. See also University College London web post, 2000.)By the Second Dynasty at latest, ancient Egyptian trade with Byblos yielded a critical source of quality timber not found in Egypt. By the Fifth Dynasty, trade with Punt provided gold, aromatic resins, ebony, ivory, and wild animals such as monkeys and baboons.(Shaw (2002) p. 322) Egypt relied on trade with Anatolia for essential quantities of tin as well as supplementary supplies of copper, both metals being necessary for the manufacture of bronze. The ancient Egyptians prized the blue stone lazuli, which had to be imported from far-away Afghanistan. Egypts Mediterranean trade partners also included Greece and Crete, which provided, among other goods, supplies of oil.(Manuelian (1998) p. 145) In exchange for its luxury imports and raw materials, Egypt mainly exported grain, gold, linen, and papyrus, in addition to other finished goods including glass and stone objects.(Harris (1990) p. 13)LanguageHistorical developmentThe language is a northern Afro-Asiatic language closely related to the Berber and languages.(Loprieno (1995b) p. 2137) It has the second longest history of any language (after Sumerian), having been written from c. 3200 BC to the Middle Ages and remaining as a spoken language for longer. The phases of Ancient Egyptian are Egyptian, Egyptian (Classical Egyptian), Egyptian, Demotic and Coptic.(Loprieno (2004) p. 161) Egyptian writings do not show dialect differences before Coptic, but it was probably spoken in regional dialects around Memphis and later Thebes.(Loprieno (2004) p. 162)Ancient Egyptian was a language, but it became more analytic later on. Late Egyptian develops prefixal definite and indefinite articles, which replace the older inflectional suffixes. There is a change from the older verbsubjectobject order to subjectverbobject.(Loprieno (1995b) p. 2137-38) The Egyptian hieroglyphic, hieratic, and demotic scripts were eventually replaced by the more phonetic alphabet. Coptic is still used in the liturgy of the Egyptian Orthodox Church, and traces of it are found in modern Arabic.(Vittman (1991) pp. 197227)Sounds and grammarAncient Egyptian has 25 consonants similar to those of other Afro-Asiatic languages. These include pharyngeal and emphatic consonants, voiced and voiceless stops, voiceless fricatives and voiced and voiceless affricates. It has three long and three short vowels, which expanded in Later Egyptian to about nine.(Loprieno (1995a) p. 46) The basic word in Egyptian, similar to Semitic and Berber, is a triliteral or biliteral root of consonants and semiconsonants. Suffixes are added to form words. The verb conjugation corresponds to the person. For example, the triconsonantal skeleton  is the semantic core of the word hear; its basic conjugation is  he hears. If the subject is a noun, suffixes are not added to the verb:(Loprieno (1995a) p. 74)  the woman hears.Adjectives are derived from nouns through a process that Egyptologists call nisbation because of its similarity with Arabic.(Loprieno (2004) p. 175) The word order is  in verbal and adjectival sentences, and  in nominal and adverbial sentences.(Allen (2000) pp. 67, 70, 109) The subject can be moved to the beginning of sentences if it is long and is followed by a resumptive pronoun.(Loprieno (2005) p. 2147) Verbs and nouns are negated by the particle n, but nn is used for adverbial and adjectival sentences. Stress falls on the ultimate or penultimate syllable, which can be open (CV) or closed (CVC).(Loprieno (2004) p. 173)WritingStone BW.jpeg|thumb|upright|The Rosetta stone (ca 196 BC) enabled linguists to begin the process of hieroglyph decipherment.(Allen (2000) p. 13)Hieroglyphic writing dates to c. 3200 BC, and is composed of some 500 symbols. A hieroglyph can represent a word, a sound, or a silent determinative; and the same symbol can serve different purposes in different contexts. Hieroglyphs were a formal script, used on stone monuments and in tombs, that could be as detailed as individual works of art. In day-to-day writing, scribes used a cursive form of writing, called hieratic, which was quicker and easier. While formal hieroglyphs may be read in rows or columns in either direction (though typically written from right to left), hieratic was always written from right to left, usually in horizontal rows. A new form of writing, Demotic, became the prevalent writing style, and it is this form of writingalong with formal hieroglyphsthat accompany the Greek text on the Rosetta Stone.Around the 1st century AD, the Coptic alphabet started to be used alongside the Demotic script. Coptic is a modified alphabet with the addition of some Demotic signs.(Allen (2000) p. 7) Although formal hieroglyphs were used in a ceremonial role until the 4th century, towards the end only a small handful of priests could still read them. As the traditional religious establishments were disbanded, knowledge of hieroglyphic writing was mostly lost. Attempts to decipher them date to the Byzantine(Loprieno (2004) p. 166) and Islamic periods in Egypt,(El-Daly (2005) p. 164) but only in 1822, after the discovery of the Rosetta stone and years of research by Thomas Young and Champollion, were hieroglyphs almost fully deciphered.(Allen (2000) p. 8)LiteratureSmith Papyrus v2.jpg|thumb|upright|right|The Edwin Smith surgical papyrus (ca 16th century BC) describes anatomy and medical treatments and is written in hieratic.Writing first appeared in association with kingship on labels and tags for items found in royal tombs. It was primarily an occupation of the scribes, who worked out of the Per Ankh institution or the House of Life. The latter comprised offices, libraries (called House of Books), laboratories and observatories.(Strouhal (1989) p. 235) Some of the best-known pieces of ancient Egyptian literature, such as the Pyramid and Texts, were written in Classical Egyptian, which continued to be the language of writing until about 1300 BC. Later Egyptian was spoken from the New Kingdom onward and is represented in Ramesside administrative documents, love poetry and tales, as well as in Demotic and Coptic texts. During this period, the tradition of writing had evolved into the tomb autobiography, such as those of Harkhuf and Weni. The genre known as Sebayt (Instructions) was developed to communicate teachings and guidance from famous nobles; the Ipuwer papyrus, a poem of lamentations describing disasters and social upheaval, is a famous example.The of Sinuhe, written in Egyptian, might be the classic of Egyptian literature.(Lichtheim (1975) p. 11) Also written at this time was the Papyrus, a set of stories told to Khufu by his sons relating the marvels performed by priests.(Lichtheim (1975) p. 215) The of Amenemope is considered a masterpiece of near-eastern literature.(Wisdom in Ancient Israel, John Day,/John Adney Emerton,/Robert P. Gordon/ Hugh Godfrey/Maturin Williamson, p23, Cambridge University Press, 1997, ISBN 0-521-62489-4) Towards the end of the New Kingdom, the vernacular language was more often employed to write popular pieces like the of Wenamun and the of Any. The former tells the story of a noble who is robbed on his way to buy cedar from Lebanon and of his struggle to return to Egypt. From about 700 BC, narrative stories and instructions, such as the popular Instructions of Onchsheshonqy, as well as personal and business documents were written in the demotic script and phase of Egyptian. Many stories written in demotic during the Graeco-Roman period were set in previous historical eras, when Egypt was an independent nation ruled by great pharaohs such as II.(Lichtheim (1980) p. 159)Culture Daily life Most ancient Egyptians were farmers tied to the land. Their dwellings were restricted to immediate family members, and were constructed of mud-brick designed to remain cool in the heat of the day. Each home had a kitchen with an open roof, which contained a grindstone for milling flour and a small oven for baking bread.(Manuelian (1998) p. 401) Walls were painted white and could be covered with dyed linen wall hangings. Floors were covered with reed mats, while wooden stools, beds raised from the floor and individual tables comprised the furniture.(Manuelian (1998) p. 403)The ancient Egyptians placed a great value on hygiene and appearance. Most bathed in the Nile and used a pasty soap made from fat and chalk. Men shaved their entire bodies for cleanliness, and aromatic perfumes and ointments covered bad odors and soothed skin.(Manuelian (1998) p. 405) Clothing was made from simple linen sheets that were bleached white, and both men and women of the upper classes wore wigs, jewelry, and cosmetics. Children went without clothing until maturity, at about age 12, and at this age males were circumcised and had their heads shaved. Mothers were responsible for taking care of the children, while the father provided the familys income.(Manuelian (1998) pp. 4067)Music and dance were popular entertainments for those who could afford them. Early instruments included flutes and harps, while instruments similar to trumpets, oboes, and pipes developed later and became popular. In the New Kingdom, the Egyptians played on bells, cymbals, tambourines, and drums and imported lutes and lyres from Asia.() The sistrum was a rattle-like instrument that was especially important in religious ceremonies.The ancient Egyptians enjoyed a variety of leisure activities, including games and music. Senet, a board game where pieces moved according to random chance, was particularly popular from the earliest times; another similar game was mehen, which had a circular gaming board. Juggling and games were popular with children, and wrestling is also documented in a tomb at Hasan.(Manuelian (1998) p. 126) The wealthy members of ancient Egyptian society enjoyed hunting and boating as well.The excavation of the workers village of el-Madinah has resulted in one of the most thoroughly documented accounts of community life in the ancient world that spans almost four hundred years. There is no comparable site in which the organisation, social interactions, working and living conditions of a community can be studied in such detail.(The Cambridge Ancient History: II Part I , The Middle East and the Aegean Region, c.1800-13380 B.C, Edited I.E.S EdwardsC.JGaddN.G.L Hammond-E.Sollberger, Cambridge at the University Press, p. 380, 1973, ISBN 0-521-08230-7)CuisineEgyptian cuisine remained remarkably stable over time; indeed, the cuisine of modern Egypt retains some striking similarities to the cuisine of the ancients. The staple diet consisted of bread and beer, supplemented with vegetables such as onions and garlic, and fruit such as dates and figs. Wine and meat were enjoyed by all on feast days while the upper classes indulged on a more regular basis. Fish, meat, and fowl could be salted or dried, and could be cooked in stews or roasted on a grill.(Manuelian (1998) pp. 399400)ArchitectureF-E-CAMERON EGYPT 2006 FEB 00289.JPG|thumb|The well preserved Temple of Horus at Edfu is an exemplar of Egyptian architecture.The architecture of ancient Egypt includes some of the most famous structures in the world: the Great Pyramids of Giza and the temples at Thebes. Building projects were organized and funded by the state for religious and commemorative purposes, but also to reinforce the power of the pharaoh. The ancient Egyptians were skilled builders; using simple but effective tools and sighting instruments, architects could build large structures with accuracy and precision.(Clarke (1990) pp. 947)The domestic dwellings of elite and ordinary Egyptians alike were constructed from perishable materials such as mud bricks and wood, and have not survived. Peasants lived in simple homes, while the palaces of the elite were more elaborate structures. A few surviving New Kingdom palaces, such as those in Malkata and Amarna, show richly decorated walls and floors with scenes of people, birds, water pools, deities and geometric designs.(Badawy (1968) p. 50) Important structures such as temples and tombs that were intended to last forever were constructed of stone instead of bricks. The architectural elements used in the worlds first large-scale stone building, Djosers mortuary complex, include and lintel supports in the papyrus and lotus motif.The earliest preserved ancient temples, such as those at Giza, consist of single, enclosed halls with roof slabs supported by columns. In the New Kingdom, architects added the pylon, the open courtyard, and the enclosed hypostyle hall to the front of the temples sanctuary, a style that was standard until the Graeco-Roman period.() The earliest and most popular tomb architecture in the Old Kingdom was the mastaba, a flat-roofed rectangular structure of mudbrick or stone built over an underground burial chamber. The pyramid of Djoser is a series of stone mastabas stacked on top of each other. Pyramids were built during the Old and Middle Kingdoms, but most later rulers abandoned them in favor of less conspicuous rock-cut tombs.(Dodson (1991) p. 23)  The 25th dynasty was a notable exception, as all 25th dynasty pharaohs constructed pyramids.()()()Art30-01-2006.jpg|thumb|upright|The Bust of Nefertiti, by the sculptor Thutmose, is one of the most famous masterpieces of ancient Egyptian art.The ancient Egyptians produced art to serve functional purposes. For over 3500 years, artists adhered to artistic forms and iconography that were developed during the Old Kingdom, following a strict set of principles that resisted foreign influence and internal change.(Robins (1997) p. 29) These artistic standardssimple lines, shapes, and flat areas of color combined with the characteristic flat projection of figures with no indication of spatial depthcreated a sense of order and balance within a composition. Images and text were intimately interwoven on tomb and temple walls, coffins, stelae, and even statues. The Palette, for example, displays figures that can also be read as hieroglyphs.(Robins (1997) p. 21) Because of the rigid rules that governed its highly stylized and symbolic appearance, ancient Egyptian art served its political and religious purposes with precision and clarity.(Robins (2001) p. 12)Ancient Egyptian artisans used stone to carve statues and fine reliefs, but used wood as a cheap and easily carved substitute. Paints were obtained from minerals such as iron ores (red and yellow ochres), copper ores (blue and green), soot or charcoal (black), and limestone (white). Paints could be mixed with arabic as a binder and pressed into cakes, which could be moistened with water when needed.(Nicholson (2000) p. 105) Pharaohs used reliefs to record victories in battle, royal decrees, and religious scenes. Common citizens had access to pieces of art, such as shabti statues and books of the dead, which they believed would protect them in the afterlife.(James (2005) p. 122) During the Middle Kingdom, wooden or clay models depicting scenes from everyday life became popular additions to the tomb. In an attempt to duplicate the activities of the living in the afterlife, these models show laborers, houses, boats, and even military formations that are scale representations of the ideal ancient Egyptian afterlife.(Robins (1998) p. 74)Despite the homogeneity of ancient Egyptian art, the styles of particular times and places sometimes reflected changing cultural or political attitudes. After the invasion of the Hyksos in the Second Intermediate Period, Minoan-style frescoes were found in Avaris.(Shaw (2002) p. 216) The most striking example of a politically driven change in artistic forms comes from the Amarna period, where figures were radically altered to conform to Akhenatens revolutionary religious ideas.(Robins (1998) p. 149) This style, known as art, was quickly and thoroughly erased after Akhenatens death and replaced by the traditional forms.(Robins (1998) p. 158)Religious beliefsFile:BD Hunefer.jpg|thumb|300px|The of the Dead was a guide to the deceaseds journey in the afterlife.Beliefs in the divine and in the afterlife were ingrained in ancient Egyptian civilization from its inception; pharaonic rule was based on the divine right of kings. The Egyptian pantheon was populated by gods who had supernatural powers and were called on for help or protection. However, the gods were not always viewed as benevolent, and Egyptians believed they had to be appeased with offerings and prayers. The structure of this pantheon changed continually as new deities were promoted in the hierarchy, but priests made no effort to organize the diverse and sometimes conflicting creation myths and stories into a coherent system.(James (2005) p. 102) These various conceptions of divinity were not considered contradictory but rather layers in the multiple facets of reality.(The Oxford Guide: Essential Guide to Egyptian Mythology, edited by B. Redford, p. 106, Berkley, 2003, ISBN 0-425-19096-X)File:Ka Statue of horawibra.jpg|thumb|upright|left|The statue provided a physical place for the Ka to manifest.Gods were worshiped in cult temples administered by priests acting on the kings behalf. At the center of the temple was the cult statue in a shrine. Temples were not places of public worship or congregation, and only on select feast days and celebrations was a shrine carrying the statue of the god brought out for public worship. Normally, the gods domain was sealed off from the outside world and was only accessible to temple officials. Common citizens could worship private statues in their homes, and amulets offered protection against the forces of chaos.(James (2005) p. 117) After the New Kingdom, the pharaohs role as a spiritual intermediary was de-emphasized as religious customs shifted to direct worship of the gods. As a result, priests developed a system of oracles to communicate the will of the gods directly to the people.(Shaw (2002) p. 313)The Egyptians believed that every human being was composed of physical and spiritual parts or aspects. In addition to the body, each person had a wt (shadow), a ba (personality or soul), a ka (life-force), and a name.(Allen (2000) pp. 79, 945) The heart, rather than the brain, was considered the seat of thoughts and emotions. After death, the spiritual aspects were released from the body and could move at will, but they required the physical remains (or a substitute, such as a statue) as a permanent home. The ultimate goal of the deceased was to rejoin his ka and ba and become one of the blessed dead, living on as an akh, or effective one. For this to happen, the deceased had to be judged worthy in a trial, in which the heart was weighed against a feather of truth. If deemed worthy, the deceased could continue their existence on earth in spiritual form.(Wasserman, et al. (1994) pp. 1503)File:tutmask.jpg|thumb|upright|Pharaohs tombs were provided with vast quantities of wealth, such as this golden mask from the mummy of Tutankhamun.Burial customsThe ancient Egyptians maintained an elaborate set of burial customs that they believed were necessary to ensure immortality after death. These customs involved preserving the body by mummification, performing burial ceremonies, and interring with the body goods the deceased would use in the afterlife.( Before the Old Kingdom, bodies buried in desert pits were naturally preserved by desiccation. The arid, desert conditions were a boon throughout the history of ancient Egypt for burials of the poor, who could not afford the elaborate burial preparations available to the elite. Wealthier Egyptians began to bury their dead in stone tombs and use artificial mummification, which involved removing the internal organs, wrapping the body in linen, and burying it in a rectangular stone sarcophagus or wooden coffin. Beginning in the Fourth Dynasty, some parts were preserved separately in jars.()By the New Kingdom, the ancient Egyptians had perfected the art of mummification; the best technique took 70 days and involved removing the internal organs, removing the brain through the nose, and desiccating the body in a mixture of salts called natron. The body was then wrapped in linen with protective amulets inserted between layers and placed in a decorated anthropoid coffin. Mummies of the Late Period were also placed in painted cartonnage mummy cases. Actual preservation practices declined during the Ptolemaic and Roman eras, while greater emphasis was placed on the outer appearance of the mummy, which was decorated.()Wealthy Egyptians were buried with larger quantities of luxury items, but all burials, regardless of social status, included goods for the deceased. Beginning in the New Kingdom, books of the dead were included in the grave, along with shabti statues that were believed to perform manual labor for them in the afterlife.() Rituals in which the deceased was magically re-animated accompanied burials. After burial, living relatives were expected to occasionally bring food to the tomb and recite prayers on behalf of the deceased.(James (2005) p. 124) Military File:Egyptian-Chariot.png|thumb|right|An Egyptian chariot.The ancient Egyptian military was responsible for defending Egypt against foreign invasion, and for maintaining Egypts domination in the Near East. The military protected mining expeditions to the Sinai during the Old Kingdom and fought civil wars during the First and Second Intermediate Periods. The military was responsible for maintaining fortifications along important trade routes, such as those found at the city of Buhen on the way to Nubia. Forts also were constructed to serve as military bases, such as the fortress at Sile, which was a base of operations for expeditions to the Levant. In the New Kingdom, a series of pharaohs used the standing Egyptian army to attack and conquer Kush and parts of the Levant.(Shaw (2002) p. 245)Typical military equipment included bows and arrows, spears, and round-topped shields made by stretching animal skin over a wooden frame. In the New Kingdom, the military began using chariots that had earlier been introduced by the Hyksos invaders. Weapons and armor continued to improve after the adoption of bronze: shields were now made from solid wood with a bronze buckle, spears were tipped with a bronze point, and the Khopesh was adopted from Asiatic soldiers.(Manuelian (1998) pp. 36667) The pharaoh was usually depicted in art and literature riding at the head of the army, it has been suggested that at least a few pharaohs, such as Tao II and his sons, did do so.(Clayton (1994) p. 96) although it has also been argued that kings of this period did not personally act as frontline war leaders, fighting alongside their troops.() Soldiers were recruited from the general population, but during, and especially after, the New Kingdom, mercenaries from Nubia, Kush, and Libya were hired to fight for Egypt.(Shaw (2002) p. 400)Technology, medicine, and mathematicsTechnologyIn technology, medicine and mathematics, ancient Egypt achieved a relatively high standard of productivity and sophistication. Traditional empiricism, as evidenced by the Edwin Smith and Ebers papyri (c. 1600 BC), is first credited to Egypt, and the roots of the scientific method can also be traced back to the ancient Egyptians. The Egyptians created their own alphabet and decimal system.Faience and glassEven before the Old Kingdom, the ancient Egyptians had developed a glassy material known as faience, which they treated as a type of artificial semi-precious stone. Faience is a non-clay ceramic made of silica, small amounts of lime and soda, and a colorant, typically copper.(Nicholson (2000) p. 177) The material was used to make beads, tiles, figurines, and small wares. Several methods can be used to create faience, but typically production involved application of the powdered materials in the form of a paste over a clay core, which was then fired. By a related technique, the ancient Egyptians produced a pigment known as Egyptian Blue, also called blue frit, which is produced by fusing (or sintering) silica, copper, lime, and an alkali such as natron. The product can be ground up and used as a pigment.(Nicholson (2000) p. 109)The ancient Egyptians could fabricate a wide variety of objects from glass with great skill, but it is not clear whether they developed the process independently.(Nicholson (2000) p. 195) It is also unclear whether they made their own raw glass or merely imported pre-made ingots, which they melted and finished. However, they did have technical expertise in making objects, as well as adding trace elements to control the color of the finished glass. A range of colors could be produced, including yellow, red, green, blue, purple, and white, and the glass could be made either transparent or opaque.(Nicholson (2000) p. 215)MedicineThe medical problems of the ancient Egyptians stemmed directly from their environment. Living and working close to the Nile brought hazards from malaria and debilitating schistosomiasis parasites, which caused liver and intestinal damage. Dangerous wildlife such as crocodiles and hippos were also a common threat. The life-long labors of farming and building put stress on the spine and joints, and traumatic injuries from construction and warfare all took a significant toll on the body. The grit and sand from stone-ground flour abraded teeth, leaving them susceptible to abscesses (though caries were rare).(Filer (1995) p. 94)The diets of the wealthy were rich in sugars, which promoted periodontal disease.(Filer (1995) pp. 7880) Despite the flattering physiques portrayed on tomb walls, the overweight mummies of many of the upper class show the effects of a life of overindulgence.(Filer (1995) p. 21) Adult expectancy was about 35 for men and 30 for women, but reaching adulthood was difficult as about one-third of the population died in infancy.(Figures are given for adult life expectancy and do not reflect life expectancy at birth. Filer (1995) p. 25)Ancient Egyptian physicians were renowned in the ancient Near East for their healing skills, and some, like Imhotep, remained famous long after their deaths.(Filer (1995) p. 39) Herodotus remarked that there was a high degree of specialization among Egyptian physicians, with some treating only the head or the stomach, while others were eye-doctors and dentists.(Strouhal (1989) p. 243) Training of physicians took place at the Per Ankh or House of Life institution, most notably those headquartered in Per-Bastet during the New Kingdom and at Abydos and Sas in the Late period. papyri show empirical knowledge of anatomy, injuries, and practical treatments.(Stroual (1989) pp. 24446)Wounds were treated by bandaging with raw meat, white linen, sutures, nets, pads and swabs soaked with honey to prevent infection,(Stroual (1989) p. 250) while opium was used to relieve pain. Garlic and onions were used regularly to promote good health and were thought to relieve asthma symptoms. Ancient Egyptian surgeons stitched wounds, set broken bones, and amputated diseased limbs, but they recognized that some injuries were so serious that they could only make the patient comfortable until he died.(Filer (1995) p. 38)ShipbuildingEarly Egyptians knew how to assemble planks of wood into a ship hull as early as 3000 BC. The Institute of America reports(Ward, Cheryl. Worlds Oldest Planked Boats, in Archaeology (Volume 54, Number 3, May/June 2001). Archaeological Institute of America.) that some of the oldest ships yet unearthed are known as the Abydos boats. These are a group of 14 discovered ships in Abydos that were constructed of wooden planks sewn together. Discovered by Egyptologist David OConnor of York University,(Schuster, Angela M.H. This Old Boat, 11 December 2000. Archaeological Institute of America.) woven straps were found to have been used to lash the planks together,( and reeds or grass stuffed between the planks helped to seal the seams.( Because the ships are all buried together and near a mortuary belonging to Pharaoh Khasekhemwy,( originally they were all thought to have belonged to him, but one of the 14 ships dates to 3000 BC,( and the associated pottery jars buried with the vessels also suggest earlier dating.( The ship dating to 3000 BC was  long( and is now thought to perhaps have belonged to an earlier pharaoh.( According to professor OConnor, the 5,000-year-old ship may have even belonged to Pharaoh Aha.(Early Egyptians also knew how to assemble planks of wood with treenails to fasten them together, using pitch for caulking the seams. The ship, a 43.6-meter vessel sealed into a pit in the pyramid complex at the foot of the Pyramid of Giza in the Fourth Dynasty around 2500 BC, is a full-size surviving example that may have filled the symbolic function of a barque. Early Egyptians also knew how to fasten the planks of this ship together with and tenon joints.( Despite the ancient Egyptians ability to construct very large boats to sail along the easily navigable Nile, they were not known as good sailors and did not engage in widespread sailing or shipping in the Mediterranean or Red Seas. Mathematics The earliest attested examples of mathematical calculations date to the predynastic Naqada period, and show a fully developed system.(Understanding of Egyptian mathematics is incomplete due to paucity of available material and lack of exhaustive study of the texts that have been uncovered. Imhausen et al. (2007) p. 13) The importance of mathematics to an educated Egyptian is suggested by a New Kingdom fictional letter in which the writer proposes a scholarly competition between himself and another scribe regarding everyday calculation tasks such as accounting of land, labor and grain.(Imhausen et al. (2007) p. 11) Texts such as the Mathematical Papyrus and the Mathematical Papyrus show that the ancient Egyptians could perform the four basic mathematical operationsaddition, subtraction, multiplication, and divisionuse fractions, compute the volumes of boxes and pyramids, and calculate the surface areas of rectangles, triangles, circles and even spheres. They understood basic concepts of algebra and geometry, and could solve simple sets of equations.(Clarke (1990) p. 222) eradefaultnotation was decimal, and based on hieroglyphic signs for each power of ten up to one million. Each of these could be written as many times as necessary to add up to the desired number; so to write the number eighty or eight hundred, the symbol for ten or one hundred was written eight times respectively.(Clarke (1990) p. 217) Because their methods of calculation could not handle most fractions with a numerator greater than one, they had to write fractions as the sum of several fractions. For example, they resolved the fraction two-fifths into the sum of one-third + one-fifteenth. Standard tables of values facilitated this.(Clarke (1990) p. 218) Some common fractions, however, were written with a special glyph&mdash;the equivalent of the modern two-thirds is shown on the right.(Gardiner (1957) p. 197)Ancient Egyptian mathematicians had a grasp of the principles underlying the theorem, knowing, for example, that a triangle had a right angle opposite the hypotenuse when its sides were in a 345 ratio.(Strouhal (1989) p. 241) They were able to estimate the area of a circle by subtracting one-ninth from its diameter and squaring the result::Area  ()D2  ()r 2  3.16r 2,a reasonable approximation of the formula r 2.((Imhausen et al. (2007) p. 31)The ratio seems to be reflected in many Egyptian constructions, including the pyramids, but its use may have been an unintended consequence of the ancient Egyptian practice of combining the use of knotted ropes with an intuitive sense of proportion and harmony.(Kemp (1989) p. 138) Legacy The culture and monuments of ancient Egypt have left a lasting legacy on the world. The cult of the goddess Isis, for example, became popular in the Empire, as obelisks and other relics were transported back to Rome.(Siliotti (1998) p. 8) The Romans also imported materials from Egypt to erect Egyptian style structures. Early historians such as Herodotus, Strabo, and Siculus studied and wrote about the land, which Romans came to view as a place of mystery.(Siliotti (1998) p. 10) During the Ages and the Renaissance, Egyptian pagan culture was in decline after the rise of Christianity and later Islam, but interest in Egyptian antiquity continued in the writings of medieval scholars such as al-Misri and al-Maqrizi.(El-Daly (2005) p. 112) In the 17th and 18th centuries, European travelers and tourists brought back antiquities and wrote stories of their journeys, leading to a wave of Egyptomania across Europe. This renewed interest sent collectors to Egypt, who took, purchased, or were given many important antiquities.(Siliotti (1998) p. 13) Although the European colonial occupation of Egypt destroyed a significant portion of the countrys historical legacy, some foreigners had more positive results. Napoleon, for example, arranged the first studies in Egyptology when he brought some 150 scientists and artists to study and document Egypts history, which was published in the Description de lgypte.(Siliotti (1998) p. 100) In the 20th century, the Egyptian Government and archaeologists alike recognized the importance of cultural respect and integrity in excavations. The Council of Antiquities now approves and oversees all excavations, which are aimed at finding information rather than treasure. The council also supervises museums and monument reconstruction programs designed to preserve the historical legacy of Egypt.See also* of ancient Egypt* of Ancient Egypt artifacts* of ancient Egypt-related articlesNotesReferences* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * Further reading* * * * ** External links* BBC History: Egyptiansprovides a reliable general overview and further links* Ancient Egypt Online - detailed articles on the history, religion, language and culture of the ancient Egyptians* Ancient History Encyclopedia on Egypt* Ancient Egyptian Science: A Source Book Door Marshall Clagett, 1989* Ancient Egyptian Metallurgy A site that shows the history of Egyptian metalworking* Napoleon on the Nile: Soldiers, Artists, and the Rediscovery of Egypt, Art History.* Ancient Egyptmaintained by the Museum, this site provides a useful introduction to Ancient Egypt for older children and young adolescents* Digital Egypt for Universities. Outstanding scholarly treatment with broad coverage and cross references (internal and external). Artifacts used extensively to illustrate topics.* Priests of Ancient Egypt In-depth-information about Ancient Egypts priests, religious services and temples. Much picture material and bibliography. In English and German.* Ancient Egypt* UCLA Encyclopedia of EgyptologyEgiptegyptenEchiptoExiptuMisirAi-kipEgipatbr:HenegiptEgipteEhiptoEgyptHen Aifftgamle Egyptengyptenet:Vana-EgiptusantgEgiptoEgiptioEgituEgiptoEgyptantiqueEgypteEgjitga:Sean-igiptShenn EajipteeExiptogan:EgipatKunoancianhi fornaEgittoKunaya KaleAntiquaipteEgiptasEgyiptom Purbai-gkEigitomy:EgypteEgypteja:EgittEgypti oldtidaanticagyptenEgiptEgitoAnticIhiptuMalo o Aikupitoi lashtanticuEgyptEgiptEgipatEgyptiEgyptenEhiptoth:MsrMsrAigibEgitoCp c ifiu-vro:Vana-Egptszh-classical:EhiptoAyijunzh-yue:AntikEgptszh:
898
Antimony
Antimony ( ;(In the UK, the variable vowel  is usually pronounced as a schwa ; in the US, it is generally a full .) ) is a toxic element with the symbol Sb and an number of 51.  A lustrous grey metalloid, it is found in nature mainly as the mineral stibnite (Sb2S3).  Although the use of antimony is limited by its toxicity, its compounds have been of fundamental value in chemistry  a prominent example being the development of superacids derived from pentafluoride.(  Antimony compounds are prominent retardants found in many commercial and domestic products.  Certain alloys are valuable for use in solders and bearings.  An emerging application is the use of antimony in microelectronics.HistoryFile:antimony-symbol.svg|left|70px|thumb|altAn unshaded circle surmounted by a cross.|One of the symbols for antimonyAntimonys sulfide compound, sulfide, Sb2S3 was recognized in antiquity, at least as early as 3000 BC.An artefact, said to be part of a vase, made of antimony dating to about 3000 BC was found at Tello, Chaldea (part of present-day Iraq), and a copper object plated with antimony dating between 2500 BC and 2200 BC has been found in Egypt.( One contemporary (Austen, at a lecture by Herbert Gladstone, published in 1892) was reported() to comment that we only know of antimony at the present day as a highly brittle and crystalline metal, which could hardly be fashioned into a useful vase, and therefore this remarkable find must represent the lost art of rendering antimony malleable.(  However, Moorey was unconvinced that the artefact was indeed a vase, mentioning that Selimkhanov, after his analysis of the Telloh object (published in 1975), attempted to relate the metal to Transcaucasian natural antimony (i.e. native metal) and that the antimony objects from Transcaucasia are all small personal ornaments.(  This weakens the evidence for a lost art of rendering antimony malleable.The first European description of a procedure for isolating antimony is in the book la pirotechnia of 1540 by Biringuccio. This book predates the more famous 1556 book by Agricola, re metallica, even though Agricola has been often incorrectly credited with the discovery of metallic antimony.  A text describing the preparation of metallic antimony that was published in Germany in 1604 purported to date from the early fifteenth century, and if authentic it would predate Biringuccio. The book, written in Latin, was called Currus Triumphalis Antimonii (The Triumphal Chariot of Antimony), and its putative author was a certain Benedictine monk, writing under the name Valentinus.(Already in 1710 Wilhelm Gottlob Freiherr von Leibniz, after careful inquiry, concluded that the work was spurious, that there was no monk named Basilius Valentinus, and the books author was its ostensible editor, Johann Thlde (ca. 1565-ca. 1624). There is now agreement among professional historians that the Currus Triumphalis... was written after the middle of the sixteenth century and that Thlde was likely its author.)(s.v. Basilius Valentinus. Harold Jantz was perhaps the only modern scholar to deny Thldes authorship, but he too agrees that the work dates from after 1550: see his catalogue of German Baroque literature.) An English translation of the Triumphalis appeared in English in 1660, under the title Triumphant Chariot of Antimony. The work remains of great interest, chiefly because it documents how followers of the renegade German physician, Philippus Theophrastus Paracelsus von Hohenheim (of whom Thlde was one), came to associate the practice of alchemy with the preparation of chemical medicines.Pure antimony was well known to ibn Hayyn, sometimes called the Father of Chemistry, in the 8th century. Here there is still an open controversy: Berthelot, who translated a number of Jbirs books, stated that antimony is never mentioned in them, but other authors() claim that Berthelot translated only some of the less important books, while the more interesting ones (some of which might describe antimony) are not yet translated, and their content is completely unknown.The first natural occurrence of pure antimony (native antimony) in the crust was described by the Swedish scientist and local mine district engineer von Swab in 1783. The type-sample was collected from the Silver Mine in the Bergslagen mining district of Sala, Vstmanland, Sweden.()EtymologyThe ancient words for antimony mostly have, as their chief meaning, kohl, the sulfide of antimony. the Elder, however, distinguishes between male and female forms of antimony; his male form is probably the sulfide, while the female form, which is superior, heavier, and less friable, is probably native metallic antimony.(Pliny, Natural history, 33.33; W.H.S. Jones, the Classical Library translator, supplies a note suggesting the identifications.)The Egyptians called antimony mdmt; in hieroglyphs, the vowels are uncertain, but there is an Arabic tradition that the word is  mesdemet.()( quotes Meyerhof, the translator of the book he is reviewing.) The Greek word,  stimmi, is probably a word from Arabic or Egyptian sdm O34:D46-G17-F21:D4, and is used by the Attic tragic poets of the 5th century BC; later Greeks also used  stibi, as did Celsus and Pliny, writing in Latin, in the first century AD. Pliny also gives the names stimi sic, larbaris, alabaster, and the very common platyophthalmos, wide-eye (from the effect of the cosmetic). Later Latin authors adapted the word to Latin as stibium. The Arabic word for the substance, as opposed to the cosmetic, can appear as     ithmid, athmoud, othmod, or uthmod. Littr suggests the first form, which is the earliest, derives from stimmida, (one) accusative for stimmi.(LSJ, s.v., vocalisation, spelling, and declension vary; Endlich, p.28; Celsus, 6.6.6 ff; Pliny Natural History 33.33; Lewis and Short: Latin Dictionary. OED, s. antimony.)The use of Sb as the standard chemical symbol for antimony is due to the 18th century chemical pioneer, Jakob Berzelius, who used this abbreviation of the name stibium.(In his long article on chemical reactions and nomenclature -- Jns Jacob Berzelius, Essay on the cause of chemical proportions, and on some circumstances relating to them:  together with a short and easy method of expressing them, Annals of Philosophy, vol. 2, pages 443-454 (1813) and vol. 3, pages 51-62, 93-106, 244-255, 353-364 (1814) -- on page 52, Berzelius lists the symbol for antimony as St ; however, starting on page 248, Berzelius subsequently uses the symbol Sb for antimony.) The medieval Latin form, from which the modern languages and late Greek, take their names, is antimonium. The origin of this is uncertain; all suggestions have some difficulty either of form or interpretation. The popular etymology, from  anti-monachos or French antimoine, still has adherents; this would mean monk-killer, and is explained by many early alchemists being monks, and antimony being poisonous.(The use of a symbol resembling an upside down female symbol for antimony could also hint at a satirical pun in this origin) So does the hypothetical Greek word  antimonos, against one, explained as not found as metal, or not found unalloyed.(Kirk-Othmer Encyclopedia of Chemical Technology, 5th ed. 2004. Entry for antimony.)( Fernando even derives it from the story of how Basil Valentine and his fellow monastic alchemists poisoned themselves by working with antimony; antimonium is found two centuries before his time. Popular etymology from OED; as for antimonos, the pure negative would be more naturally expressed by a- not.)Lippmann conjectured a Greek word,  anthemonion, which would mean floret, and he cites several examples of related Greek words (but not that one) which describe chemical or biological efflorescence.(Lippman, pp. 6435)The early uses of antimonium include the translations, in 10501100, by the African of Arabic medical treatises.(Lippman, p. 642, writing in 1919, says zuerst.) Several authorities believe that antimonium is a scribal corruption of some Arabic form; Meyerhof derives it from ithmid;(Meyerhof as quoted in Sarton, asserts that ithmid or athmoud became corrupted in the medieval traductions barbaro-latines.; the OED asserts that some Arabic form is the origin, andif ithmid is the root, posits athimodium, atimodium, atimonium, as intermediate forms.) other possibilities include Athimar, the Arabic name of the metal, and a hypothetical as-stimmi, derived from or parallel to the Greek.(Endlich, p.28; one of the advantages of as-stimmi would be that it has a whole syllable in common with antimonium.)CharacteristicsPropertiesmassive.jpg|thumb|altAn irregular piece of silvery stone with spots of variation in lustre and shade.|Native antimony with oxidation productsAntimony is in the group (group 15) and has an electronegativity of 2.05. As expected by periodic trends, it is more electronegative than tin or bismuth, and less electronegative than tellurium or arsenic.Antimony is stable in air at room temperature but reacts with oxygen if heated to form trioxide, Sb2O3.Antimony is a silvery, lustrous gray metal that has a scale hardness of 3. Therefore, antimony by itself is never used to make hard objects: a coin made of antimony, issued in Chinas Guizhou province in 1931, was unpopular because they would wear out fast. After the first issue no others were produced.() It is resistant to attack by acids.Four allotropes of antimony are known: a stable metallic form, and three meta-stable forms: explosive, black and yellow. Metallic antimony is a brittle, silver-white shiny metal. When molten antimony is slowly cooled, metallic antimony crystallizes in an hexagonal cell, isomorphic with that of the black allotrope of arsenic. A rare explosive form of antimony can be formed from the electrolysis of antimony(III) trichloride. When scratched with a sharp implement, an exothermic reaction occurs and white fumes given off as metallic antimony is formed; alternatively, when rubbed with a pestle in a mortar, a strong detonation occurs. Black antimony is formed when gaseous metallic antimony is rapidly cooled. It oxidizes in air and is sometimes spontaneously combustible. At 100 C, it gradually transforms into the stable form. The yellow allotrope of antimony is the most unstable. It has only been generated by oxidation of stibine (SbH3) at 90 C. Above this temperature and in ambient light, this meta stable allotrope transforms into the more stable black allotrope.()IsotopesAntimony exists as two stable isotopes, 121Sb with a natural abundance of 57.36% and 123Sb with a natural abundance of 42.64%. It also has 35 radioisotopes, of which the longest-lived is 125Sb with a half-life of 2.75 years. In addition, 29 metastable states have been characterised.OccurrenceThe abundance of antimony in the Earths crust is estimated at 0.2 to 0.5 parts per million, comparable to thallium at 0.5 parts per million and silver at 0.07 ppm.() Even though this element is not abundant, it is found in over 100 mineral species. Antimony is sometimes found native, but more frequently it is found in the sulfide stibnite (Sb2S3) which is the predominant ore mineral. Commercial forms of antimony are generally ingots, broken pieces, granules, and cast cake. Other forms are powder, shot, and crystals.In 2005, the Peoples Republic of China was the top producer of antimony with about 84% world share followed at a distance by South Africa, Bolivia and Tajikistan, reports the Geological Survey. The mine with the largest deposits in China is Mine in Hunan province with a estimated deposit of 2.1 million metric tons.()ProductionThe extraction of antimony from ores depends on the quality of the ore, which is usually a sulfide.  The sulfide is converted to an oxide and advantage is often taken of the volatility of antimony(III) oxide, which is recovered from roasting.(  This material is often used directly for the main applications, impurities being arsenic and sulfide.  Antimony can be isolated from its ore by a reduction with scrap iron:: + 3Fe  2Sb + 3FeSIsolating antimony from its oxide is performed by a carbothermal reduction:():2  +  3 C      4 Sb  +  3 Chiffres de 2003, mtal contenue dans les minerais et concentrs, source: Ltat du monde 2005 CompoundsAntimony compounds are often classified into those of Sb(III) and Sb(V).(  Relative to its neighboring element As, the 5+ oxidaton state is more stable.Oxides and hydroxidestrioxide () is formed when antimony is burnt in air.()In the gas phase, this compound exists as , but it polymerises upon condensing.(  pentoxide, () can only be formed by oxidation by concentrated acid.() Antimony also forms a mixed-valence oxide, tetroxide (), which features both Sb(III) and Sb(V).( Unlike phosphorus and arsenic, these various oxides are amphoteric and do not form well-defined oxoacids and react with acids to form antimony salts.Antimonous acid  is unknown but the conjugate base sodium antimonite () forms upon fusing oxide and .( Transition metal antimonites are also known.() Antimonic acid exists only as the hydrate , forming salts containing the antimonate anion . Dehydrating metal salts containing this anion yields mixed oxides.(Many antimony ores are sulfides, including stibnite (), pyrargyrite (), zinkenite, jamesonite, and boulangerite.( pentasulfide is non-stoichiometric and features antimony in the +3 state and S-S bonds.() Several thioantimonides are known such as  and .()HalidesAntimony forms two series of halides,  and . The trihalides , , , and  are all molecular compounds having pyramidal molecular geometry. The trifluoride  is prepared by the reaction of  with HF:(:  +  6 HF    2   +  3 It is acidic and readily accepts fluoride ions to form the complex anions  and . Molten  is a weak conductor.  The trichloride  is prepared by dissolving  in acid::  +  6 HCl    2   +  3 thumb|120px|left|Structure of gaseous SbF5The pentahalides  and  have bipyramidal molecular geometry in the gas phase, but in the liquid phase,  is polymeric, whereas  is monomeric.()  is a powerful Lewis acid used to make the superacid acid (HSbF6).Oxyhalides are more common for antimony than arsenic and phosphorus. Antimony trioxide dissolves in concentrated acid to form antimony oxo- (antimonyl) compounds such as SbOCl and .(Antimonides, hydrides, and organoantimony compoundsCompounds in this class generally are described as derivatives of Sb3-.  Antimony forms antimonides with metals, such as antimonide (InSb), and silver antimonide ().(  The alkali metal and zinc antimonides, e.g. Na3Sb and Zn3Sb2, are more reactive. Treating these antimonides with acid produces the unstable gas stibine, :(): + 3   Stibine can also be produced by treating  salts with hydride reagents such as borohydride. Stibine decomposes spontaneously at room temperature.  Because stibine is thermodynamically unstable (positive of formation), antimony does not react with hydrogen directly.(Greenwood, N. N.; & Earnshaw, A. (1997). Chemistry of the Elements (2nd Edn.), Oxford:Butterworth-Heinemann. ISBN 0-7506-3365-4.)Organoantimony compounds are typically prepared by alkylation of antimony halides with reagents.(Elschenbroich, C. Organometallics (2006) Wiley-VCH: Weinheim. ISBN 978-3-29390-6)  A large variety of compounds are known with both Sb(III) and Sb(V) centers including mixed chloro-organic derivatives, anions, and cations.  Examples include Sb(C6H5)3 (triphenylstibine), Sb2(C6H5)4 (with an Sb-Sb bond), and cyclic Sb(C6H5)n.  Pentacoordinated organoantimony compounds are common, examples being Sb(C6H5)5 and several related halides.ApplicationsFlame retardantsThe main use of antimony is in the form of trioxide is used in the making of flame-proofing compounds. Markets for these flame-retardant applications include childrens clothing, toys, aircraft and automobile seat covers. It is also used in the fiberglass composites industry as an additive to resins for such items as light aircraft engine covers. The resin will burn while a flame is held to it but will extinguish itself as soon as the flame is removed.  Fireproofing consumes about half of the annual production of antimony.(Sabina C. Grund, Kunibert Hanusch, Hans J. Breunig, Hans Uwe Wolf Antimony and Antimony Compounds in Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry 2006, Wiley-VCH, Weinheim. )AlloysAntimony forms a highly useful alloy with lead, increasing its hardness and mechanical strength.  The Sb-Pb alloy is used in lead-acid batteries.(() It is used in antifriction alloys, such as metal.() It is used as an alloy in bullets and shot,  cable sheathing, metal (e.g. for linotype printing machines()), solder  some lead-free solders contain 5% Sb,() in pewter,() and in hardening alloys with low tin content in the manufacturing of pipes.Other applicationsThe second main application is as a catalyst for the production of the polymer polyethyleneterephthalate.  It is an additive in some glasses.  In the latter application, antimony oxides serve as fining agents, aiding in the removal of microscopic bubbles.  This application is mainly used for TV screens.(Bernard H.W. S. De Jong, Ruud G. C. Beerkens, Peter A. van Nijnatten Glass in Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry 2005, Wiley-VCH, Weinheim. )Niche applicationsMicroelectronicsIn tiny amounts, antimony is increasingly being used in the semiconductor industry as a dopant for ultra-high conductivity n-type silicon wafers() in the production of diodes, infrared detectors, and Hall-effect devices.In the 1950s, tiny beads of a lead-antimony alloy were used to dope the emitters and collectors of NPN junction transistors with antimony.()MedicalFew biological or medical applications exist for antimony. Treatments principally containing antimony are known as antimonials and are used as emetics.Antimony compounds are used as antiprotozoan drugs. Antimony potassium tartrate, or tartar emetic, was once used as an anti-schistosomal drug, subsequently replaced by praziquantel.Antimony and its compounds are used in several veterinary preparations like anthiomaline or lithium antimony thiomalate, which is used as a skin conditioner in ruminants.Antimony has a nourishing or conditioning effect on keratinized tissues, at least in animals.Antimony-based drugs, such as antimoniate, are also considered the drugs of choice for treatment of leishmaniasis in animals. Unfortunately, as well as having low therapeutic indices, the drugs are poor at penetrating the marrow, where some of the Leishmania amastigotes reside, and so cure of the disease  especially the visceral form  is very difficult.Elemental antimony as an pill was once used as a medicine. It could be reused by others after ingestion.Other usesIn the heads of some safety matches () and in reactors together with beryllium as neutron sources.Antimony sulfides have been shown to help stabilize the friction coefficient in automotive brake pad materials.()The semiconductor nitride doped with antimony has been proposed on theoretical grounds as being able to catalyze the splitting of water into H2 and O2.()PrecautionsAntimony and many of its compounds are toxic, and the effects of antimony poisoning are similar to poisoning. Inhalation of antimony dust is harmful and in certain cases may be fatal; in small doses, antimony causes headaches, dizziness, and depression. Larger doses such as prolonged skin contact may cause dermatitis; otherwise it can damage the kidneys and the liver, causing violent and frequent vomiting, and will lead to death in a few days.Antimony is incompatible with strong oxidizing agents, strong acids, halogen acids, chlorine, or fluorine. It should be kept away from heat.(MSDS, Baker)Antimony leaches from terephthalate (PET) bottles into liquids.() While levels observed for water are below water guidelines,()() juice concentrates (for which no guidelines are established) produced in the UK were found to contain up to 44.7 g/L of antimony, well above the EU limits for water of 5 g/L.()()  The guidelines are:*Health Organization: 20 g/L*Japan: 15 g/L(Wakayama, Hiroshi, Revision of Drinking Water Standards in Japan, Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare (Japan), 2003; Table 2, p. 84)*States Environmental Protection Agency, Health Canada and the Ontario Ministry of Environment: 6 g/L*German Federal Ministry of Environment: 5 g/L(See also*Antimonial*pill*change memory*Historia*the ElderNotesReferencesBibliography**Oscar von Lippmann (1919) Entstehung und Ausbreitung der Alchemie, teil 1. Berlin: Julius Springer. In German.*Public Health Statement for AntimonyExternal links*National Pollutant Inventory  Antimony and compounds*WebElements.com  Antimony*Chemistry in its element podcast (MP3) from the Society of Chemistrys World: Antimonyaf:Antimoonar:an:Antimonioaz:Stibiumzh-min-nan:Antimon bs:Antimonbg:ca:Antimonicv:cs:Antimonco:Antimoniucy:Antimonida:Antimonde:Antimonet:Antimonel:es:Antimonioeo:Antimonoeu:Antimoniofa:hif:Antimonyfr:Antimoinefur:Antimoniga:Antamngv:Antimoangl:Antimonio()xal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Antimonio:Antimonioid:Antimonis:Antimonit:Antimoniohe:jv:Antimonpam:Antimonykv:ht:Antimwnku:Stbymla:Stibiumlv:Antimonslb:Antimonlt:Stibislij:Antimoniojbo:antimonihu:Antimonml:mr:ms:Antimonimdf:mrj:nl:Antimoonnew:ja:no:Antimonnn:Antimonoc:Antimniuz:Surmapnb:nds:Antimonpl:Antymonpt:Antimnioro:Stibiuqu:Antimunyuru:stq:Antimonsq:Antimoniscn:Antimoniusimple:Antimonysk:Antimnsl:Antimonsr:sh:Antimonfi:Antimonisv:Antimontl:Antimonyota:th:tg:tr:Antimonuk:ur:ug:vi:Antimonwar:Antimonyoyi:yo:Antimonyzh-yue:zh:
904
Aluminium
Aluminium or aluminum is a silvery white member of the group of elements. It has the symbol Al, and its number is 13. It is not soluble in water under normal circumstances.Aluminium is the third most abundant element (after oxygen and silicon), and the most abundant metal, in the Earths crust. It makes up about 8% by weight of the Earths solid surface. Aluminium metal is too reactive chemically to occur natively. Instead, it is found combined in over 270 different minerals.() The chief ore of aluminium is bauxite.Aluminium is remarkable for the metals low density and for its ability to resist corrosion due to the phenomenon of passivation. Structural components made from aluminium and its alloys are vital to the aerospace industry and are important in other areas of transportation and structural materials. The most useful compounds of aluminium, at least on a weight basis, are the oxides and sulfates.Despite its prevalence in the environment, aluminium salts are not known to be used by any form of life. In keeping with its pervasiveness, it is well tolerated by plants and animals.(  Because of its prevalence, potential biological roles, beneficial and otherwise, for aluminium compounds are of continuing interest. Characteristics  Physical Aluminium is a soft, durable, lightweight, ductile and malleable metal with appearance ranging from silvery to dull gray, depending on the surface roughness. Aluminium is nonmagnetic and does not easily ignite. A fresh film of aluminium film serves as a good reflector (approximately 92%) of light and an excellent reflector (as much as 98%) of medium and far infrared radiation. The yield strength of pure aluminium is 711 MPa, while alloys have yield strengths ranging from 200 MPa to 600 MPa.() Aluminium has about one-third the density and stiffness of steel. It is easily machined, cast, drawn and extruded.Corrosion resistance can be excellent due to a thin surface layer of oxide that forms when the metal is exposed to air, effectively preventing further oxidation. The strongest aluminium alloys are less corrosion resistant due to galvanic reactions with alloyed copper.( This corrosion resistance is also often greatly reduced when many aqueous salts are present, particularly in the presence of dissimilar metals.Aluminium atoms are arranged in a face-centered cubic (fcc) structure. Aluminium has a energy of approximately 200 mJ/m2.()Aluminium is one of the few metals that retain full silvery reflectance in finely powdered form, making it an important component of silver-colored paints. Aluminium mirror finish has the highest reflectance of any metal in the 200400 nm (UV) and the 3,00010,000 nm (far IR) regions; in the 400700 nm visible range it is slightly outperformed by tin and silver and in the 7003000 (near IR) by silver, gold, and copper.()Aluminium is a good thermal and conductor, having 59% the conductivity of copper, both thermal and electrical. Aluminium is capable of being a superconductor, with a superconducting critical temperature of 1.2 Kelvin and a critical magnetic field of about 100 gauss (10 milliteslas).() Creation Stable aluminium is created when hydrogen fuses with magnesium either in large stars or in supernovae.() Isotopes Aluminium has many known isotopes, whose mass numbers range from 21 to 42; however, only 27Al (isotope) and 26Al (radioactive isotope, t1/2  7.2105 y) occur naturally. 27Al has a natural abundance above 99.9%. 26Al is produced from argon in the atmosphere by spallation caused by cosmic-ray protons. Aluminium isotopes have found practical application in dating marine sediments, manganese nodules, glacial ice, quartz in rock exposures, and meteorites. The ratio of 26Al to 10Be has been used to study the role of transport, deposition, sediment storage, burial times, and erosion on 105 to 106 year time scales.() Cosmogenic 26Al was first applied in studies of the Moon and meteorites. Meteoroid fragments, after departure from their parent bodies, are exposed to intense cosmic-ray bombardment during their travel through space, causing substantial 26Al production. After falling to Earth, atmospheric shielding drastically reduces 26Al production, and its decay can then be used to determine the meteorites terrestrial age. Meteorite research has also shown that 26Al was relatively abundant at the time of formation of our planetary system. Most meteorite scientists believe that the energy released by the decay of 26Al was responsible for the melting and differentiation of some asteroids after their formation 4.55 billion years ago.() Natural occurrence In the crust, aluminium is the most abundant (8.3% by weight) metallic element and the third most abundant of all elements (after oxygen and silicon).(, p. 217) Because of its strong affinity to oxygen, it is almost never found in the elemental state; instead it is found in oxides or silicates. Feldspars, the most common group of minerals in the Earths crust, are aluminosilicates. Native aluminium metal can be found as a minor phase in low oxygen fugacity environments, such as the interiors of certain volcanoes.() Native aluminium has been reported in seeps in the northeastern slope of the China Sea and Chen et al. (2011)( have proposed a theory of its origin as resulting by reduction from tetrahydroxoaluminate Al(OH)4- to metallic aluminium by bacteria.(Chen Z., Huang C.-Y., Zhao M., Yan W., Chien C.-W., Chen M., Yang H., Machiyama H. & Lin S. (2011). Characteristics and possible origin of native aluminum in cold seep sediments from the northeastern South China Sea. of Asian Earth Sciences 40(1): 363-370. doi:doi:10.1016/j.jseaes.2010.06.006.)It also occurs in the minerals beryl, cryolite, garnet, spinel and turquoise. Impurities in Al2O3, such as chromium or iron yield the gemstones ruby and sapphire, respectively.Although aluminium is an extremely common and widespread element, the common aluminium minerals are not economic sources of the metal. Almost all metallic aluminium is produced from the ore bauxite (AlOx(OH)3-2x). Bauxite occurs as a weathering product of low iron and silica bedrock in tropical climatic conditions.() Large deposits of bauxite occur in Australia, Brazil, Guinea and Jamaica and the primary mining areas for the ore are in Australia, Brazil, China, India, Guinea,  Indonesia, Jamaica, Russia and Surinam.  Production and refinement Although aluminium is the most abundant metallic element in the Earths crust, it is never found in free, metallic form (with above mentioned exceptions).Aluminium forms strong bonds with oxygen. Compared to most other metals, it is difficult to extract from ore, such as bauxite, due to the energy required to reduce aluminium oxide (Al2O3). For example, direct reduction with carbon, as is used to produce iron, is not chemically possible, since aluminium is a stronger reducing agent than carbon. There is an indirect carbothermic reduction possible by using carbon and Al2O3, which forms an intermediate Al4C3 and this can further yield aluminium metal at a temperature of 19002000C. This process is still under development. This process costs less energy and yields less CO2 than the process, the major industrial process for aluminium extraction.() Aluminium oxide has a melting point of about . Therefore, it must be extracted by electrolysis. In this process, the aluminium oxide is dissolved in molten cryolite with calcium fluoride and then reduced to the pure metal. The operational temperature of the reduction cells is around . Cryolite is found as a mineral in Greenland, but in industrial use it has been replaced by a synthetic substance. Cryolite is a chemical compound of aluminium and sodium fluorides: (Na3AlF6). The aluminium oxide (a white powder) is obtained by refining bauxite in the process of Bayer. (Previously, the process was the predominant refining technology.)The electrolytic process replaced the process, which involved the reduction of anhydrous aluminium chloride with potassium. Both of the electrodes used in the electrolysis of aluminium oxide are carbon. Once the refined alumina is dissolved in the electrolyte, its ions are free to move around. The reaction at the cathode is:: Al3+ + 3 e  AlHere the aluminium ion is being reduced. The aluminium metal then sinks to the bottom and is tapped off, usually cast into large blocks called aluminium billets for further processing.At the anode, oxygen is formed:: 2 O2  O2 + 4 eTo some extent, the carbon anode is degraded by the oxygen. The anodes in a reduction cell must therefore be replaced regularly, since they are consumed in the process. The cathodes do erode, mainly due to electrochemical processes and metal movement. After five to ten years, depending on the current used in the electrolysis, a cell has to be rebuilt because of cathode wear.Aluminium electrolysis with the Hall-Hroult process consumes a lot of energy, but alternative processes were always found to be less viable economically and/or ecologically. The worldwide average specific energy consumption is approximately 150.5 kilowatt-hours per kilogram of aluminium produced (52 to 56 MJ/kg). The most modern smelters achieve approximately 12.8 kWh/kg (46.1 MJ/kg). (Compare this to the of reaction, 31 MJ/kg, and the free energy of reaction, 29 MJ/kg.) Reduction line currents for older technologies are typically 100 to 200 kiloamperes; state-of-the-art smelters operate at about 350 kA. Trials have been reported with 500 kA cells.The Hall-Heroult process produces aluminium with a purity of above 99%. Further purification can be done by the process. The process involves the electrolysis of molten aluminium with a sodium, barium and aluminium fluoride electrolyte. The resulting aluminium has a purity of 99.99%.(William B. Frank, Warren E. Haupin, Robert K. Dawless, Douglas A. Granger, Maurice W. Wei, Kenneth J. Calhoun, Thomas B. BonneyAluminum in Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry, 2009, Wiley-VCH, Weinheim. )()Electric power represents about 20% to 40% of the cost of producing aluminium, depending on the location of the smelter. Aluminium production consumes roughly 5% of electricity generated in the U.S.( Smelters tend to be situated where electric power is both plentiful and inexpensive, such as the Arab Emirates with excess natural gas supplies and Iceland and Norway with energy generated from renewable sources. The worlds largest smelters of alumina are Peoples Republic of China, Russia, and Quebec and Columbia in Canada.()()()In 2005, the Peoples Republic of China was the top producer of aluminium with almost a one-fifth world share, followed by Russia, Canada, and the USA, reports the Geological Survey.Over the last 50 years, Australia has become a major producer of bauxite ore and a major producer and exporter of alumina (before being overtaken by China in 2007).(() Australia produced 62 million tonnes of bauxite in 2005. The Australian deposits have some refining problems, some being high in silica, but have the advantage of being shallow and relatively easy to mine.() Recycling File:41 ALU Recycling Code.svg|150px|thumb|Aluminium codeAluminium is theoretically 100% recyclable without any loss of its natural qualities. According to the Resource Panels Stocks in Society report, the global per capita stock of aluminium in use in society (i.e. in cars, buildings, electronics etc.) is 80kg. Much of this is in more-developed countries (350500kg per capita) rather than less-developed countries (35kg per capita). Knowing the per capita stocks and their approximate lifespans is important for planning recycling.Recovery of the metal via recycling has become an important facet of the aluminium industry. Recycling was a low-profile activity until the late 1960s, when the growing use of aluminium cans brought it to the public awareness.Recycling involves melting the scrap, a process that requires only 5% of the energy used to produce aluminium from ore, though a significant part (up to 15% of the input material) is lost as dross (ash-like oxide).() The dross can undergo a further process to extract aluminium.In Europe aluminium experiences high rates of recycling, ranging from 42% of beverage cans, 85% of construction materials and 95% of transport vehicles.()Recycled aluminium is known as secondary aluminium, but maintains the same physical properties as primary aluminium. Secondary aluminium is produced in a wide range of formats and is employed in 80% of alloy injections. Another important use is for extrusion.White dross from primary aluminium production and from secondary recycling operations still contains useful quantities of aluminium that can be extracted industrially.() The process produces aluminium billets, together with a highly complex waste material. This waste is difficult to manage. It reacts with water, releasing a mixture of gases (including, among others, hydrogen, acetylene, and ammonia), which spontaneously ignites on contact with air;() contact with damp air results in the release of copious quantities of ammonia gas. Despite these difficulties, the waste has found use as a filler in asphalt and concrete.(Dunster, A.M., Moulinier, F., Abbott, B., Conroy, A., Adams, K., Widyatmoko, D.(2005). Added value of using new industrial waste streams as secondary aggregates in both concrete and asphalt. DTI/WRAP Aggregates Research Programme STBF 13/15C. The Waste and Resources Action Programme.) Compounds  Oxidation state +3 The vast majority of compounds, including all Al-containing minerals and all commercially significant aluminium compounds, feature aluminium in the oxidation state 3+. The coordination number of such compounds varies, but generally Al3+ is six-coordinate or tetracoordinate. Almost all compounds of aluminium(III) are colorless.( Halides All four trihalides are well known. Unlike the structures of the three heavier trihalides, fluoride (AlF3) features six-coordinate Al. The octahedral coordination environment for AlF3 is related to the compactness of fluoride ion, six of which can fit around the small Al3+ centre. AlF3 sublimes (with cracking) at . With heavier halides, the coordination numbers are lower. The other trihalides are dimeric or polymeric with tetrahedral Al centers. These materials are prepared by treating aluminium metal with the halogen, although other methods exist. Acidification of the oxides or hydroxides affords hydrates. In aqueous solution, the halides often form mixtures, generally containing six-coordinate Al centres, which are feature both halide and aquo ligands. When aluminium and fluoride are together in aqueous solution, they readily form complex ions such as , , and . In the case of chloride, polyaluminium clusters are formed such as Al13O4(OH)24(H2O)127+. Oxide and hydroxides Aluminium forms one stable oxide, known by its mineral name corundum.  Sapphire and ruby are impure corundum contaminated with trace amounts of other metals. The two oxide-hydroxides (AlO(OH) are boehmite and diaspore. There are three trihydroxides: bayerite, gibbsite, and nordstrandite, which differ in their crystalline structure (polymorphs). Most are produced from ores by a variety of wet processes using acid and base. Heating the hydroxides leads to formation of corundrum. These materials are of central importance to the production of aluminium and are themselves extremely useful. Carbide, nitride, and related materials carbide (Al4C3) is made by heating a mixture of the elements above . The pale yellow crystals consist of tetrahedral aluminium centres. It reacts with water or dilute acids to give methane. The acetylide, Al2(C2)3, is made by passing acetylene over heated aluminium.nitride (AlN) is the only nitride known for aluminium. Unlike the oxides it features tetrahedral Al centres. It can be made from the elements at . It is air-stable material with a usefully high conductivity. phosphide (AlP) is made similarly, and hydrolyses to give phosphine:: AlP  +  3 H2O      Al(OH)3  +  PH3 Organoaluminium compounds and related hydrides image:Trimethylaluminium-3D-balls.png|thumb|left|220px|Structure of trimethylaluminium, a compound that features five-coordinate carbon.A variety of compounds of empirical formula AlR3 and AlR1.5Cl1.5 exist.(Elschenbroich, C. Organometallics (2006) Wiley-VCH: Weinheim. ISBN 978-3-29390-6) These species usually feature tetrahedral Al centres, e.g. trimethylaluminium has the formula Al2(CH3)6 (see figure). With large organic groups, triorganoaluminium exist as three-coordinate monomers, such as triisobutylaluminium. Such compounds are widely used in industrial chemistry, despite the fact that they are often highly pyrophoric. Few analogues exist between organoaluminium and organoboron compounds except for large organic groups.The important aluminium hydride is aluminium hydride (LiAlH4), which is used in as a reducing agent in chemistry. It can be produced from hydride and aluminium trichloride:: 4 LiH  +  AlCl3      LiAlH4  +  3 LiClSeveral useful derivatives of LiAlH4 are known, e.g. Sodium bis(2-methoxyethoxy)dihydridoaluminate. The simplest hydride, hydride or alane, remains a laboratory curiosity. It is a polymer with the formula (AlH3)n, in contrast to the corresponding boron hydride with the formula (BH3)2. Oxidation states +1 and 2+ Although the great majority of aluminium compounds feature Al3+ centres, compounds with lower oxidation states are known and sometime of significance as precursors to the Al3+ species. Aluminium(I) AlF, AlCl and AlBr exist in the gaseous phase when the tri-halide is heated with aluminium. The composition AlI is unstable at room temperature with respect to the triiodide:(: 3 AlI   AlI3  +  2 AlA stable derivative of aluminium monoiodide is the cyclic adduct formed with triethylamine, Al4I4(NEt3)4. Also of theoretical interest but only of fleeting existence are Al2O and Al2S is made by heating the normal oxide, Al2O3, with silicon at  in a vacuum.() Such materials quickly disproportionates to the starting materials. Aluminium(II) Very simple Al(II) compounds are invoked or observed in the reactions of Al metal with oxidants. For example, monoxide, AlO, has been detected in the gas phase after explosion() and in stellar absorption spectra.()  More thoroughly investigated are compounds of the formula R4Al2 where R is a large organic ligand.(Werner Uhl, Organoelement Compounds Possessing Al---Al, Ga---Ga, In---In, and Tl---Tl Single Bonds Advances in Organometallic Chemistry Volume 51, 2004, Pages 53-108. ) Analysis The presence of aluminium can be detected in qualitative analysis using aluminon. Applications  General use Aluminium is the most widely used non-ferrous metal.() Global production of aluminium in 2005 was 31.9 million tonnes. It exceeded that of any other metal except iron (837.5 million tonnes).() Forecast for 2012 is 4245 million tons, driven by rising Chinese output.(Rising Chinese Costs to Support Aluminum Prices Bloomberg News, November 23, 2009) Aluminium is almost always alloyed, which markedly improves its mechanical properties, especially when tempered. For example, the common foils and beverage cans are alloys of 92% to 99% aluminium.() The main alloying agents are copper, zinc, magnesium, manganese, and silicon (e.g., duralumin) and the levels of these other metals are in the range of a few percent by weight.(J. Paul Lyle, Douglas A. Granger, Robert E. Sanders, Aluminum Alloys Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry, 2005, Wiley-VCH, Weinheim. )File:aluminumfoil.jpg|thumb|Household foilA40 Roadster ca 1951.jpg|thumb|Aluminium-bodied Austin A40 Sports (circa 1951)Some of the many uses for aluminium metal are in:* Transportation (automobiles, aircraft, trucks, cars, marine vessels, bicycles, etc.) as sheet, tube, castings, etc.* Packaging (cans, foil, etc.)* Construction (windows, doors, siding, building wire, etc.)* A wide range of household items, from utensils to bats, watches.()* Street lighting poles, sailing ship masts, poles, etc.* Outer shells of consumer electronics, also cases for equipment e.g. photographic equipment.* transmission lines for power distribution* steel and Alnico magnets* Super purity aluminium (SPA, 99.980% to 99.999% Al), used in electronics and CDs.* sinks for electronic appliances such as transistors and CPUs.* Substrate material of copper clad laminates used in high brightness lighting.* Powdered aluminium is used in paint, and in pyrotechnics such as rocket fuels and thermite.* Aluminium can be reacted with hydrochloric acid or with hydroxide to produce hydrogen gas.* A variety of countries, including France, Italy, Poland, Finland, Romania, Israel, and the former Yugoslavia, have issued coins struck in aluminium or aluminium-copper alloys.(Worlds coinage uses 24 chemical elements, 2 part series, World Coin News (February 17, 1992 and March 2, 1992))* Some guitar models sports aluminium diamond plates on the surface of the instruments, usually either chrome or black. Guitars and Bean are both known for having produced guitars with necks made of aluminium, which gives the instrument a very distinct sound.* Sustainability of Aluminium in BuildingsRelatively pure aluminium is rarely encountered -  only when corrosion resistance and/or workability is more important than strength or hardness. A thin layer of aluminium can be deposited onto a flat surface by vapour deposition or (very infrequently) vapour deposition or other chemical means to form coatings and mirrors. Aluminium compounds Because aluminium is abundant and most of its derivative exhibit low toxicity, the compounds of aluminium enjoy wide and sometimes large-scale applications. Alumina oxide (Al2O3) and the associated oxy-hydroxides and trihydroxides are produced or extracted from minerals on a large scale. The great majority of this material is converted to metallic aluminium. About 10% of the production capacity is used for other applications. A major use is as an absorbent, for example alumina will remove water from hydrocarbons, to enable subsequent processes that are poisoned by moisture. Aluminium oxides are common catalysts for industrial processes, e.g. the process for converting sulfide to sulfur in refineries and for the alkylation of amines. Many industrial catalysts are supported, meaning generally that an expensive catalyst (e.g., platinum) is dispersed over a high surface area material such as alumina. Being a very hard material (hardness 9), alumina is widely used as an abrasive and the production of applications that exploit its inertness, e.g., in pressure sodium lamps. Sulfates Several sulfates of aluminium find applications.  sulfate (Al2(SO4)3(H2O)18) is produced on the annual scale of several billions of kilograms. About half of the production is consumed in treatment. The next major application is in the manufacture of paper. It is also used as a mordant, in extinguisher, as a food additive, in fireproofing, and in leather tanning. Aluminium ammonium sulfate (Al(NH4)(SO4)2)(H2O)12, also called alum, is used as a mordant and in leather tanning.(Otto Helmboldt, L. Keith Hudson, Chanakya Misra, Karl Wefers, Wolfgang Heck, Hans Stark, Max Danner, Norbert Rsch Aluminum Compounds, Inorganic in Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry, 2007, Wiley-VCH, Weinheim. )  Aluminium potassium sulfate (Al(K)(SO4)2)(H2O)12 is used similarly. The consumption of both alums is declining. Chlorides chloride (AlCl3) is used in petroleum refining and in the production of synthetic rubber and polymers.Although it has a similar name, chlorohydrate has fewer and very different applications, e.g. as an hardening agent and an antiperspirant. It is an intermediate in the production of aluminium metal. Niche compounds Given the scale of aluminium compounds, a small scale application could still involve thousands of tons. One of the many compounds used at this intermediate level include acetate, a salt used in solution as an astringent.  borate (Al2O3 B2O3) is used in the production of glass and ceramics.  fluorosilicate (Al2(SiF6)3) is used in the production of synthetic gemstones, glass and ceramic. phosphate (AlPO4) is used in the manufacture: of glass and ceramic, pulp and paper products, cosmetics, paints and varnishes and in making dental cement.  hydroxide (Al(OH)3) is used as an antacid, as a mordant, in water purification, in the manufacture of glass and ceramic and in the waterproofing of fabrics. aluminium hydride is a powerful reducing agent used in chemistry. Organoaluminiums are used as acids and cocatalysts. For example, methylaluminoxane is a cocatalyst for Ziegler-Natta olefin polymerization to produce polymers such as polyethene. Aluminium alloys in structural applications File:Aluminium foam.jpg|thumb|foamAluminium alloys with a wide range of properties are used in engineering structures. Alloy systems are classified by a number system (ANSI) or by names indicating their main alloying constituents (DIN and ISO).The strength and durability of aluminium alloys vary widely, not only as a result of the components of the specific alloy, but also as a result of heat treatments and manufacturing processes. A lack of knowledge of these aspects has from time to time led to improperly designed structures and gained aluminium a bad reputation.One important structural limitation of aluminium alloys is their fatigue strength. Unlike steels, aluminium alloys have no well-defined limit, meaning that fatigue failure eventually occurs, under even very small cyclic loadings. This implies that engineers must assess these loads and design for a fixed life rather than an infinite life.Another important property of aluminium alloys is their sensitivity to heat.Workshop procedures involving heating are complicated by the fact that aluminium, unlike steel, melts without first glowing red. Forming operations where a torch is used therefore require some expertise, since no visual signs reveal how close the material is to melting. Aluminium alloys, like all structural alloys, also are subject to internal stresses following heating operations such as welding and casting. The problem with aluminium alloys in this regard is their low point, which make them more susceptible to distortions from thermally induced stress relief. Controlled stress relief can be done during manufacturing by heat-treating the parts in an oven, followed by gradual coolingin effect annealing the stresses.The low melting point of aluminium alloys has not precluded their use in rocketry; even for use in constructing combustion chambers where gases can reach 3500 K. The Agena upper stage engine used a regeneratively cooled aluminium design for some parts of the nozzle, including the thermally critical throat region.Another alloy of some value is bronze (CuAl5). History File:Eros-piccadilly-circus.jpg|thumb|right|The statue of the Anteros (commonly mistaken for either The Angel of Christian Charity or Eros) in Circus, London, was made in 1893 and is one of the first statues to be cast in aluminium.Ancient Greeks and Romans used aluminium salts as dyeing mordants and as astringents for dressing wounds; alum is still used as a styptic. In 1761, de Morveau suggested calling the base alum alumine. In 1808, Davy identified the existence of a metal base of alum, which he at first termed alumium and later aluminum (see etymology section, below).The metal was first produced in 1825 (in an impure form) by Danish physicist and chemist Christian rsted. He reacted anhydrous chloride with potassium amalgam and yielded a lump of metal looking similar to tin.()Whler was aware of these experiments and cited them, but after redoing the experiments of rsted he concluded that this metal was pure potassium. He conducted a similar experiment in 1827 by mixing anhydrous aluminium chloride with potassium and yielded aluminium.( Whler is generally credited with isolating aluminium (Latin alumen, alum), but also rsted can be listed as its discoverer.() Further, Berthier discovered aluminium in bauxite ore and successfully extracted it.() Frenchman Etienne Sainte-Claire Deville improved Whlers method in 1846, and described his improvements in a book in 1859, chief among these being the substitution of sodium for the considerably more expensive potassium.(Etienne Sainte-Claire Deville De laluminium, ses proprits, sa fabrication (Paris, 1859)) Deville likely also conceived the idea of the electrolysis of aluminium oxide dissolved in cryolite; Martin Hall and Paul Hroult might have developed the more practical process after Deville.Before the process was developed in the late 1880s, aluminium was exceedingly difficult to extract from its various ores. This made pure aluminium more valuable than gold.() Bars of aluminium were exhibited at the Exposition Universelle of 1855.() Napoleon III, Emperor of France, is reputed to have given a banquet where the most honoured guests were given aluminium utensils, while the others made do with gold.()(ChemMatters October 1990 p. 14.)Aluminium was selected as the material to be used for the 100 ounce (2.8 kg) capstone of the Monument in 1884, a time when one ounce (30 grams) cost the daily wage of a common worker on the project;() The capstone, which was set in place on December 6, 1884, in an elaborate dedication ceremony, was the largest single piece of aluminium cast at the time, when aluminium was as expensive as silver.()The Cowles companies supplied aluminium alloy in quantity in the States and England using smelters like the furnace of Wilhelm Siemens by 1886.( and  and ) Martin Hall of Ohio in the U.S. and Hroult of France independently developed the Hall-Hroult electrolytic process that made extracting aluminium from minerals cheaper and is now the principal method used worldwide. Halls process,() in 1888 with the financial backing of E. Hunt, started the Pittsburgh Reduction Company today known as Alcoa. Hroults process was in production by 1889 in Switzerland at Aluminium Industrie, now Alcan, and at Aluminium, now Group and Alcoa, by 1896 in Scotland.()By 1895, the metal was being used as a building material as far away as Sydney, Australia in the dome of the Chief Secretarys Building.Many navies have used an aluminium superstructure for their vessels; the 1975 fire aboard USS Belknap that gutted her aluminium superstructure, as well as observation of battle damage to British ships during the War, led to many navies switching to all steel superstructures. The Arleigh Burke class was the first such U.S. ship, being constructed entirely of steel.wire was once widely used for domestic electrical wiring. Owing to corrosion-induced failures, a number of fires resulted. This discontinuation thus illustrates one failed application of the otherwise highly useful metal.In 2008, the price of aluminium peaked at $1.45/lb in July but dropped to $0.70/lb by December.(Aluminum prices.) Etymology Two variants of the metals name are in current use, aluminium and aluminum (besides the obsolete alumium).The Union of Pure and Applied Chemistry (IUPAC) adopted aluminium as the standard international name for the element in 1990 but, three years later, recognized aluminum as an acceptable variant. Hence their periodic table includes both.(IUPAC Periodic Table of the Elements.) IUPAC prefers the use of aluminium in its internal publications, although nearly as many IUPAC publications use the spelling aluminum.(IUPAC Web site publication search for aluminum.)Most countries use the spelling aluminium. In the United States, the spelling aluminum predominates.((Bremner, John Words on Words: A Dictionary for Writers and Others Who Care about Words, pp. 2223. ISBN 0-231-04493-3.) The Oxford Dictionary prefers aluminum, whereas the Australian Dictionary prefers aluminium. In 1926, the Chemical Society officially decided to use aluminum in its publications; American dictionaries typically label the spelling aluminium as a British variant.The name aluminium derives from its status as a base of alum. It is borrowed from French; its ultimate source, alumen, in turn is a Latin word that literally means bitter salt.()The earliest citation given in the English Dictionary for any word used as a name for this element is alumium, which British chemist and inventor Davy employed in 1808 for the metal he was trying to isolate electrolytically from the mineral alumina. The citation is from the journal Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society of London: Had I been so fortunate as to have obtained more certain evidences on this subject, and to have procured the metallic substances I was in search of, I should have proposed for them the names of silicium, alumium, zirconium, and glucium.(alumium, Oxford English Dictionary. Ed. J.A. Simpson and E.S.C. Weiner, second edition Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1989. OED Online Oxford University Press. Accessed 29 October 2006. Citation is listed as 1808 SIR H. DAVY in Phil. Trans. XCVIII. 353. The ellipsis in the quotation is as it appears in the OED citation.)()Davy settled on aluminum by the time he published his 1812 book Chemical Philosophy: This substance appears to contain a peculiar metal, but as yet Aluminum has not been obtained in a perfectly free state, though alloys of it with other metalline substances have been procured sufficiently distinct to indicate the probable nature of alumina.() But the same year, an anonymous contributor to the Review, a British political-literary journal, in a review of Davys book, objected to aluminum and proposed the name aluminium, for so we shall take the liberty of writing the word, in preference to aluminum, which has a less classical sound.()The -ium suffix conformed to the precedent set in other newly discovered elements of the time: potassium, sodium, magnesium, calcium, and strontium (all of which Davy isolated himself). Nevertheless, -um spellings for elements were not unknown at the time, as for example platinum, known to Europeans since the century, molybdenum, discovered in 1778, and tantalum, discovered in 1802. The -um suffix is consistent with the universal spelling alumina for the oxide, as lanthana is the oxide of lanthanum, and magnesia, ceria, and thoria are the oxides of magnesium, cerium, and thorium respectively.The spelling used throughout the 19th century by most U.S. chemists was aluminium, but common usage is less clear.(, In the USA, the position was more complicated. Noah Websters Dictionary of 1828 has only aluminum, though the standard spelling among US chemists throughout most of the nineteenth century was aluminium; it was the preferred version in The Century Dictionary of 1889 and is the only spelling given in the Webster Unabridged Dictionary of 1913.) The aluminum spelling is used in the Dictionary of 1828. In his advertising handbill for his new electrolytic method of producing the metal 1892, Charles Martin Hall used the -um spelling, despite his constant use of the -ium spelling in all the patents( he filed between 1886 and 1903.() It has consequently been suggested that the spelling reflects an easier to pronounce word with one fewer syllable, or that the spelling on the flier was a mistake. Halls domination of production of the metal ensured that the spelling aluminum became the standard in North America; the Webster Unabridged Dictionary of 1913, though, continued to use the -ium version. Health concerns Despite its natural abundance, aluminium has no known function in biology. It is remarkably nontoxic, aluminium sulfate having an LD50 of 6207 mg/kg (oral, mouse), which corresponds to 500 grams for a 80 kg person.( Despite the extremely low acute toxicity, the health effects of aluminium are of interest in view of the widespread occurrence of the element in the environment and in commerce. Some toxicity can be traced to deposition in bone and the central nervous system, which is particularly increased in patients with reduced renal function. Because aluminium competes with calcium for absorption, increased amounts of dietary aluminium may contribute to the reduced skeletal mineralization (osteopenia) observed in preterm infants and infants with growth retardation. In very high doses, aluminium can cause neurotoxicity, and is associated with altered function of the barrier.() A small percentage of people are allergic to aluminium and experience dermatitis, digestive disorders, vomiting or other symptoms upon contact or ingestion of products containing aluminium, such as deodorants or antacids. In those without allergies, aluminium is not as toxic as metals, but there is evidence of some toxicity if it is consumed in excessive amounts.() Although the use of aluminium cookware has not been shown to lead to aluminium toxicity in general, excessive consumption of antacids containing aluminium compounds and excessive use of aluminium-containing antiperspirants provide more significant exposure levels. Studies have shown that consumption of acidic foods or liquids with aluminium significantly increases aluminium absorption,() and maltol has been shown to increase the accumulation of aluminium in nervous and osseus tissue.() Furthermore, aluminium increases estrogen-related expression in human cancer cells cultured in the laboratory.() The estrogen-like effects of these salts have led to their classification as a metalloestrogen.The effects of aluminium in antiperspirants has been examined over the course of decades with little evidence of skin irritation.( Nonetheless, its occurrence in antiperspirants, dyes (such as aluminium lake), and food additives is controversial in some quarters. Although there is little evidence that normal exposure to aluminium presents a risk to healthy adults,(Gitelman, H. J. Physiology of Aluminum in Man, in Aluminum and Health, CRC Press, 1988, ISBN 0824780264, p. 90) some studies point to risks associated with increased exposure to the metal.() Aluminium in food may be absorbed more than aluminium from water.() Some researchers have expressed concerns that the aluminium in antiperspirants may increase the risk of breast cancer,() and aluminium has controversially been implicated as a factor in disease.() The water pollution incident involved a number of people consuming sulfate. Investigations of the long-term health effects are still ongoing, but elevated brain aluminium concentrations have been found in post-mortem examinations of victims, and further research to determine if there is a link with amyloid angiopathy has been commissioned.()According to Alzheimers Society, the overwhelming medical and scientific opinion is that studies have not convincingly demonstrated a causal relationship between aluminium and Alzheimers disease.(Aluminium and Alzheimers disease, The Alzheimers Society. Retrieved 30 January 2009.) Nevertheless, some studies, such as those on the cohort,() cite aluminium exposure as a risk factor for disease. Some brain plaques have been found to contain increased levels of the metal.() Research in this area has been inconclusive; aluminium accumulation may be a consequence of the disease rather than a causal agent. In any event, if there is any toxicity of aluminium, it must be via a very specific mechanism, since total human exposure to the element in the form of naturally occurring clay in soil and dust is enormously large over a lifetime.()() Scientific consensus does not yet exist about whether aluminium exposure could directly increase the risk of Alzheimers disease.( Effect on plants Aluminium is primary among the factors that reduce plant growth on acid soils. Although it is generally harmless to plant growth in pH-neutral soils, the concentration in acid soils of toxic Al3+ cations increases and disturbs root growth and function.()()()()Most acid soils are saturated with aluminium rather than ions. The acidity of the soil is therefore a result of hydrolysis of aluminium compounds.() This concept of corrected lime potential() to define the degree of base saturation in soils became the basis for procedures now used in testing laboratories to determine the lime requirement() of soils.(Applying lime to soils reduces the Aluminum toxicity to plants. )Wheats adaptation to allow aluminium tolerance is such that the aluminium induces a release of compounds that bind to the harmful aluminium cations. Sorghum is believed to have the same tolerance mechanism. The first gene for aluminium tolerance has been identified in wheat. It was shown that sorghums aluminium tolerance is controlled by a single gene, as for wheat.() This is not the case in all plants. See also * The Thirteenth Element* alloy* Aluminum Association* battery* foil* can* edge staining* for the History of Aluminium (IHA)* of countries by aluminium production* industry in Russia* hydroxide References  External links * WebElements.com  Aluminium* Electrolytic production* World production of primary aluminium, by country* Price history of aluminum, according to the IMF* History of Aluminium (from the website of the International Aluminium Institute)* Emedicine  Aluminiumaf:Aluminiumam:ar:an:Aluminioast:Aluminiuaz:Alminiumbn:zh-min-nan:A-l-mihbe:be-x-old:bs:Aluminijbr:Aluminiombg:ca:Aluminicv:cs:Hlinkco:Alluminiucy:Alwminiwmda:Aluminiumde:Aluminiumszlet:Alumiiniumel:myv:es:Aluminioeo:Aluminioeu:Aluminiofa:hif:Aluminiumfr:Aluminiumfy:Aluminiumfur:Aluminiga:Almanamgv:Ollymingd:Almaingl:Aluminio()xal:ko:haw:Aluminumahy:hi:hr:Aluminijio:Aluminioid:Aluminiumia:Aluminiumos:is:lit:Alluminiohe:jv:Alumuniumkn:pam:Aluminiuka:kk:rw:Aluminiyumusw:Aluminikv:ht:Aliminymku:Bafnmrj:la:Aluminiumlv:Alumnijslb:Aluminiumlt:Aliuminislij:Alluminiojbo:jinmrmalumelmo:Almniohu:Alumniummk:mg:Viratyml:mr:ms:Aluminiummy:nl:Aluminiumne:new:ja:frr:Aluminiumno:Aluminiumnn:Aluminiumnov:Aluminieoc:Aluminiuz:Aluminiypnb:ps:nds:Aluminiumpl:Glinpt:Alumnioksh:Alluro:Aluminiuqillayru:sah:stq:Aluminiumsq:Aluminiscn:Alluminiusimple:Aluminiumsk:Hlinksl:Aluminijsr:sh:Aluminijumfi:Alumiinisv:Aluminiumtl:Aluminyota:te:th:tg:tr:Alminyumuk:ur:Aluminiumug:vi:Nhmfiu-vro:Alumiiniumwar:Aluminyoyi:yo:Alumnmzh-yue:bat-smg:Aliomniszh:
1081
Economy_of_Azerbaijan
spelling Azerbaijan is an economy that has completed its post-Soviet transition into a major oil based economy (with the completion of the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan Pipeline), from one where the state played the major role. Azeri GDP grew 41.7% in the first quarter of 2007, possibly the highest of any nation worldwide.()Such rates cannot be sustained, but despite reaching 26.4% in 2005 (second highest GDP growth in the world in 2005 only to Guinea), and 2006 over 34.6% (world highest), in 2008 dropped to 10.8%, and dropped further to 9.3% in 2009 (Today.az GDP growth makes 3.4% in Azerbaijan in 2009).  The real GDP growth rate for 2011 is expected at 3.7%(Indexmundi Azerbaijan GDP - real growth rate).Large oil reserves are a major contributor to the economy. The national currency, the manat, was stable in 2000, depreciating 3.8% against the dollar. The budget deficit equaled 1.3% of GDP in 2000.Progress on economic reform has generally lagged behind macroeconomic stabilization. The government has undertaken regulatory reforms in some areas, including substantial opening of trade policy, but inefficient public administration in which commercial and regulatory interests are co-mingled limit the impact of these reforms. The government has largely completed privatization of agricultural lands and small and medium-sized enterprises. In August 2000, the government launched a second-stage privatization program, in which many large state enterprises will be privatized. Since 2001, the economic activity in the country is regulated by the Ministry of Economic Development of Azerbaijan Republic.Macro-economic trendThe following is a chart of trend of gross domestic product of Azerbaijan at market prices(estimated by the International Monetary Fund) with figures in millions of Manats.For purchasing power parity comparisons, the US dollar was exchanged at 1,565.88 Manats only. Currently, the new Manat is in use, with an exchange rate of about 1 manat  $1.10. Mean graduate pay was $5.76 per manhour in 2010.For more than a century the backbone of the Azerbaijani economy has been petroleum, which represented 10 percent of Azerbaijans GDP in 2005, and is projected to double to almost 20 percent of GDP in 2007.(Azerbaijan: Energy profile (Enerpub, 13 December 2007)) Now that Western oil companies are able to tap deepwater oilfields untouched by the Soviets because of poor technology, Azerbaijan is considered one of the most important areas in the world for oil exploration and development. Proven reserves in the Caspian Basin, which Azerbaijan shares with Russia, Kazakhstan, Iran, and Turkmenistan, are comparable in size to the North Sea, although exploration is still in the early stages.External tradethumb|right|200px|Azerbaijani exports in 2006Azerbaijan has concluded 21 production-sharing agreements with various oil companies. An export pipeline that transports Caspian oil to the Mediterranean from Baku through Tbilisi, Georgia to Ceyhan, Turkey (the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan Pipeline) became operational in 2006. The pipeline is expected to generate as much as $160 billion in revenues for the country over the next 30 years. The recent high price of oil is highly beneficial to Azerbaijans economy as the nation is in the midst of an oil boom. Eastern Caspian producers in cara was here Kazakhstan also have expressed interest in accessing this pipeline to transport a portion of their production. In March 2001, Azerbaijan concluded a gas agreement with Turkey, providing a future export market for Azerbaijan.In 2002 the Azerbaijani marine had 54 ships.()Overviewright|200px|thumb|Downtown Baku.right|200px|thumb|The National Bank.Through the Soviet period, Azerbaijan had always been more developed industrially than Armenia and Georgia, two neighboring Transcaucasia countries - but also less diversified, as a result of slow investment in non-oil sector. With a history of industrial development of more than 100 years, Azerbaijan proved to be a leading nation in Southern Caucasus throughout the turmoil of Soviet Union collapse in early 1990s until nowadays.Oil remains the most prominent product of Azerbaijans economy with cotton, natural gas and agriculture products contributing to its economic growth over the last five years. More than $60 billion was invested into Azerbaijans oil by major international oil companies in AIOC consortium operated by BP. Oil production under the first of these PSAs, with the Azerbaijan International Operating Company, began in November 1997 and now is about 500,000 b/d. People visit petroleum spas (or oil spas) to bathe in the local crude in Naftalan(Azerbaijani answer to oil glut: Bathe in it - Asia - Pacific - International Herald Tribune) A leading caviar producer and exporter in the past, Azerbaijans industry today is concentrated on the dwindling stocks of sturgeon and beluga in the Sea.Azerbaijan shares all the problems of the former Soviet republics in making the transition from a command to a economy, but its energy resources brighten its long-term prospects. Azerbaijan has begun making progress on economic reform, and old economic ties and structures are slowly being replaced. An obstacle to economic progress, including stepped up foreign investment, is the continuing conflict with Armenia over the Nagorno-Karabakh region. Trade with Russia and the other former Soviet republics is declining in importance while trade is building up with Turkey, Iran, UAE, and the countries of EU. Azerbaijan is also a member of the Cooperation Organization (ECO). Long-term prospects will depend on world oil prices and the location of new pipelines in the region.In 2010, Azerbaijan entered into top eight biggest oil suppliers to EU countries with  9.46 billion.(http://today.az/news/business/82397.html)Environmental issuesAzerbaijan faces serious environmental challenges. Soil throughout the region was contaminated by DDT and toxic defoliants used in cotton production during the Soviet era. Caspian petroleum and petrochemicals industries also have contributed to present air and water pollution problems. Several environmental organizations exist in Azerbaijan, yet few funds have been allocated to begin the necessary cleanup and prevention programs. Over-fishing by poachers is threatening the survival of Caspian sturgeon stocks, the source of most of the worlds supply of caviar. The on International Trade in Endangered Species (CITES) has listed as threatened all sturgeon species, including all commercial Caspian varieties. In 2007 the Blacksmith Institute listed Sumgayit as one of the ten most polluted cities in the world.(Walsh, Bryan (2007) The Worlds Most Polluted Places Time Magazine, accessed 21 June 2010)(Staff (14 September 2007) Ten most polluted places named BBC News)  According to Mercer Human Resource Consulting 2007 Worldwide Quality of Living Survey, the capital of Azerbaijan, Baku, was the worlds lowest-ranking city for health and sanitation;(Go Figure: Mercer issues 2007 Worldwide Quality of Living Survey Mercer Human Resource Consulting) however, by 2010 Baku had pulled itself up 4 index points and its place was taken by Port-au-Prince in Haiti.(Pesquisa Mercer 2010: classificao mundial de Qualidade de Vida nas cidades Mercer Human Resource Consulting, in Portuguese, accessed 21 June 2010)DiversificationImage:Baku pipelines.svg|thumb|right|200px|The pipeline (green) is one of several pipelines running from Baku.In 2007, mining and hydrocarbon industries accounted for well over 95 per cent of the Azerbaijani economy. Diversification of the economy into manufacturing industries remain a long-term issue.Business environmentIn 2008, Azerbaijan was cited as the top reformer by the Banks Business report:()Other statistics:Data from CIA World Factbook(Azerbaijan economy) unless noted otherwise;Investment (gross fixed)21% of GDP (2008 est.);Household income or consumption by percentage share* lowest 10%: 3.1%* highest 10%: 29.5% (2001);Inflation rate (consumer prices)21.6% (2008 est.);Agriculture* utilized agricultural land:  (2007)()* total wood resources: 136 million cubic metres* crops: cotton, grain, rice, grapes, fruit, vegetables, tea, tobacco* livestock products: beef, mutton, poultry, milk, eggs;Industrial production growth rate12% (2008 est.);Electricity* production: 23,80 billion kWh (2007)* consumption: 27,50 billion kWh (2007)* exports: 800 million kWh (2007)* imports: 500 million kWh (2007);Current account balance* $19,36 billion (2008 est.);Exports - commodities* petroleum and natural gas, products, oilfield equipment; steel, ore, cement; chemicals, petrochemicals, textiles, machinery, cotton, foodstuffs.;Reserves of foreign exchange and gold* $30 billion (2010 est.);Debt - external* $2.73 billion (2008 est.);Economic aid - recipient* ODA, $223.4 million (2005 est.);Currency* 1 Manat  100 gepik;Exchange rates* Azerbaijani manat per US dollar - 0.7893 (as of 2011(http://abc.az/eng/news_10_02_2011_51496.html Azerbaijan Business Center website, accessed 10 Feb, 2011)* Azerbaijani manat per Euro - 1.24 (as of 2008);Fiscal year* Calendar yearSee also* of companies of Azerbaijan* manat* of Azerbaijani companies* pipeline* Oil Company of Azerbaijan* industry in Azerbaijan* in Azerbaijan* in Azerbaijan* Azerbaijan* Baku* of AzerbaijanReferencesExternal links* Azerbaijan Economy** http://www.defensenews.com/story.php?F940090&Casiapac* Energy Potential Of Azerbaijan: Can It Be Used As Alternative For Russia?de Azerbaiyn de lAzerbadjandi Azerbaijando Azerbaijoe Azerbajxhanitt Azerbaijanzh:
1087
Foreign_relations_of_Azerbaijan
Azerbaijan is a member of the Nations, the for Security and Cooperation in Europe, NATOs for Peace, Euro-Atlantic Partnership; Health Organization, the Bank for Reconstruction and Development; the of Europe, CFE Treaty, the of Democracies; the Monetary Fund; and the Bank.Azerbaijan has formal involvement with senior ex-US government officials including Baker and Kissinger as they serve on the Honorary Council of Advisors(USACC. Honorary Council of Advisors) of the USAzerbaijan Chamber of Commerce (USACC). USACC is co-chaired by Tim Cejka, President of Mobil Corporation and Reza Vaziri, President of Investment Group and Chairman of the Asian Mining Plc (LSE Ticker: AAZ).()International organization participationAsDB, BSEC, CE, CIS, EAPC, EBRD, ECE, ECO, ESCAP, FAO, GUAM, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, ICRM, IDA, IDB, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, Interpol, IOC, IOM, ISO (correspondent), ITU, ITUC, OAS (observer), OIC, OPCW, OSCE, PFP, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WCO, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WToO, WTrO (observer)CountriesAzerbaijan currently has diplomatic relations with 160 countries:()() Afghanistan, Bahrain, Belarus, Belgium, Bulgaria, Canada, the Republic of China, Denmark, Egypt, France, Georgia, Germany, Hungary, Greece, Iran, Iraq, Ireland, Israel, Italy, Japan, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Kuwait, Libya, Luxembourg, Mexico, Moldova, Mongolia, Netherlands, Norway, Oman, Pakistan, Poland, Qatar, of India, Romania, Russia, Arabia, Serbia, Korea, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Tajikistan, Togo, Turkey, Turkmenistan, Ukraine, Arab Emirates, Kingdom, States, Uzbekistan and Vietnam.(National Holiday of Uzbekistan marked in Baku, AzerTAj)Azerbaijan is one of the few countries with predominantly Muslim populations that shares a strategic alliance with Israel. Today, Israel is a major arms supplier to the country. (See relations).Azerbaijan also maintains good relations with the Union, in the framework of its Eastern Neighbourhood Policy (See and the European Union).Information on some of the countries with which Azerbaijan maintains formal relationsEuropeAsiaAfricaNorth and South AmericaOceaniaNo relationsright|350px|Diplomatic relations of AzerbaijanAzerbaijan maintains diplomatic relations with 166 states (including Palestine and the City) and the Union. Azerbaijan has not yet established diplomatic with:(Azerbaijan MFA - diplomatic relations)* Bahamas, Dominica, Barbados, and Tobago* Monaco, Cyprus, Armenia* Togo, Nigeria, African Republic, Congo, Congo, Tanzania, Zimbabwe, Botswana, Namibia, Lesotho, Tome and Principe* Bhutan* Palau, Micronesia, Federated States of, Kiribati, Niue, Islands, Vanuatu, Islands, Tonga, Samoa, New Guinea* Military Order of Malta* the rest of states with limited recognitionDisputes50th Anniversary UN High Commissioner for Refugees..jpg|right|350px|thumb|50th Anniversary UN High Commissioner for Refugees. The refugees under the Armenia aggression. and the tent small town are pictured on the souvenir sheet..Nagorno-Karabakh/ArmeniaArmenia supports ethnic Armenians in the Nagorno-Karabakh region of Azerbaijan in the longstanding and very bitter separatist conflict against the Azerbaijani Government;Nagorno-Karabakh is a region within Azerbaijan. The current conflict over Nagorno-Karabakh (NK) began in 1988 when Armenian demonstrations against Azerbaijani rule broke out in both Nagorno-Karabakh and Armenia and the Nagorno-Karabakh Soviet voted to secede from Azerbaijan and join Armenia. Soon, violence broke out against ethnic Azeris in Armenia and ethnic Armenians in Azerbaijan. In 1990, after violent episodes in Armenia, Nagorno-Karabakh, Baku and Sumgait, Moscow declared a state of emergency in Karabakh, sent troops to the region, and forcibly occupied Baku, killing over a hundred civilians. In April 1991, Azerbaijani militia and Soviet forces targeted Armenian paramilitaries operating in Karabakh. Moscow also deployed troops to Yerevan. Following the collapse of the Union, conflict escalated into a full-scale war between Armenia and Azerbaijan. Military action was heavily influenced by the Russian military, which inspired and manipulated the rivalry between the two neighbouring nations in order to keep both under control.More than 30,000 people were killed in the fighting from 1992 to 1994. In May 1992, Armenian forces seized Shusha and Lachin (thereby linking Nagorno-Karabakh to Armenia). By October 1993, Armenian forces succeeded in occupying almost all of former NKAO, Lachin and large areas in southwestern Azerbaijan. In 1993, the Security Council adopted four resolutions calling for the cessation of hostilities, unimpeded access for international humanitarian relief efforts, and the eventual deployment of a peacekeeping force in the region. Fighting continued, however, until May 1994 when Russia brokered a cease-fire.Negotiations to resolve the conflict peacefully have been ongoing since 1992 under the aegis of the Minsk Group of the OSCE. The Minsk Group is currently co-chaired by Russia, France, and the States and has representation from Turkey, the U.S., several European nations, Armenia, and Azerbaijan. Despite the 1994 cease-fire, sporadic violations, sniper-fire, and landmine incidents continue to claim over 100 lives each year.Since 1997, the Minsk Group Co-Chairs have presented three proposals to serve as a framework for resolving the conflict. One side or the other rejected each of those proposals. Beginning in 1999, the Presidents of Azerbaijan and Armenia initiated a direct dialogue through a series of face-to-face meetings, often facilitated by the Minsk Group Co-Chairs. Most recently the OSCE sponsored a round of negotiations between the Presidents in West, Florida. U.S. Secretary of State Powell launched the talks on April 3, 2001, and the negotiations continued with mediation by the U.S., Russia, and France until April 6, 2001. The Co-Chairs are continuing to work with the two Presidents in the hope of finding a lasting peace.The two countries are still technically at war.Caspian SeaCaspian Sea boundaries are not yet determined with Iran and Turkmenistan. Issues with Russia and Kazakhstan were settled in 2003.See also*and the European Union*of diplomatic missions in Azerbaijan*of diplomatic missions of Azerbaijan*requirements for Azerbaijani citizensReferences*World Factbook 2000 and the 2003 U.S. Department of State website External links * U.S. Embassy in Azerbaijan in Baku* Embassy of the Republic of Azerbaijan in Washington* Tajikistan & Kyrgyzstan relationsAserbaidschans 
1094
Economy_of_Armenia
spelling Armenia is the second most densely populated of the former Soviet republics. It is situated between the Sea and the Sea, bordered on the north and east by Georgia and Azerbaijan and on the south and west by Iran and Turkey.According to Forbes magazine Armenia had the second second worst economy in the world in 2011.()()() Until independence, Armenias economy was based largely on industrychemicals, electronic products, machinery, food, rubber and textiles; it was highly dependent on outside resources. Agriculture accounted for only 20% of net material product and 10% of employment before the breakup of the Soviet Union in 1991. Armenian mines produce copper, zinc, gold and lead. The vast majority of energy is produced with imported fuel, including gas and nuclear fuel (for its one nuclear power plant) from Russia; the main domestic energy source is hydroelectric. Small amounts of coal, gas and petroleum have not yet been developed.Like other former States, Armenias economy suffers from the legacy of a centrally planned economy and the breakdown of former Soviet trading patterns. Soviet investment in and support of Armenian industry has virtually disappeared, so that few major enterprises are still able to function. In addition, the effects of the 1988 earthquake, which killed more than 25,000 people and made 500,000 homeless, are still being felt. Although a cease-fire has held since 1994, the conflict with Azerbaijan over Nagorno-Karabakh has not been resolved. The consequent blockade along both the Azerbaijani and Turkish borders has devastated the economy, because of Armenias dependence on outside supplies of energy and most raw materials. Land routes through Azerbaijan and Turkey are closed; routes through Georgia and Iran are inadequate or unreliable. In 1992-93, GDP fell nearly 60% from its 1989 level. The national currency, the dram, suffered hyperinflation for the first few years after its introduction in 1993.Nevertheless, the of Armenia, helped by the cease-fire that has been in effect in Nagorno-Karabakh since 1994, has been able to carry out wideranging economic reforms which paid off in dramatically lower inflation and steady growth. Armenia has registered strong economic growth since 1995, building on the turnaround that began the previous year, and inflation has been negligible for the past several years. New sectors, such as precious stone processing and jewelry making, information and communication technology, and even tourism are beginning to supplement more traditional sectors such as agriculture in the economy.This steady economic progress has earned Armenia increasing support from international institutions. The IMF, Bank, EBRD, as well as other IFIs and foreign countries are extending considerable grants and loans. Total loans extended to Armenia since 1993 exceed $800 million. These loans are targeted at reducing the budget deficit, stabilizing the local currency; developing private businesses; energy; the agriculture, food processing, transportation, and health and education sectors; and ongoing rehabilitation work in the zone.Continued progress will depend on the ability of the government to strengthen its macroeconomic management, including increasing revenue collection, improve the investment climate, and accelerate the privatization process. A liberal foreign investment law was approved in June 1994, and a Law on Privatization was adopted in 1997, as well as a program on state property privatization. The government has made major strides toward joining the World Trade Organization. By 1994, however, the Armenian Government had launched an ambitious IMF-sponsored economic liberalization program that resulted in positive growth rates in 1995-2005. Armenia joined the WTO in January 2003. Armenia also has managed to slash inflation, stabilize its currency, and privatize most small- and medium-sized enterprises. Armenias unemployment rate, however, remains high, despite strong economic growth. The chronic energy shortages Armenia suffered in the early and mid-1990s have been offset by the energy supplied by one of its nuclear power plants at Metsamor. Armenia is now a net energy exporter, although it does not have sufficient generating capacity to replace Metsamor, which is under international pressure to close. The electricity distribution system was privatized in 2002. Armenias severe trade imbalance has been offset somewhat by international aid, remittances from Armenians working abroad, and foreign direct investment. Economic ties with Russia remain close, especially in the energy sector. The government made some improvements in tax and customs administration in 2005, but anti-corruption measures have been more difficult to implement. Investment in the construction and industrial sectors is expected to continue in 2006 and will help to ensure annual average real GDP growth of about 13.9%.OverviewUnder the old Soviet central planning system, Armenia had developed a modern industrial sector, supplying machine tools, textiles, and other manufactured goods to sister republics in exchange for raw materials and energy. Since the implosion of the USSR in December 1991, Armenia has switched to small-scale agriculture away from the large agroindustrial complexes of the Soviet era. The agricultural sector has long-term needs for more investment and updated technology. The privatization of industry has been at a slower pace, but has been given renewed emphasis by the current administration. Armenia is a food importer, and its mineral deposits (gold, bauxite) are small. The ongoing conflict with Azerbaijan over the ethnic Armenian-dominated region of Nagorno-Karabakh (which was part of Soviet Azerbaijan) and the breakup of the centrally directed system of the former Soviet Union contributed to a severe economic decline in the early 1990s. By 1994, however, the Armenian Government had launched an ambitious IMF-sponsored economic program that has resulted in positive growth rates in 1995-99. Armenia also managed to slash inflation and to privatize most small- and medium-sized enterprises. The chronic energy shortages Armenia suffered in recent years have been largely offset by the energy supplied by one of its nuclear power plants at Metsamor. Continued Russian financial difficulties have hurt the trade sector especially, but have been offset by international aid, domestic restructuring and foreign direct investment.History of the modern Armenian economyArmenia emerged from the umbra of the former Union in 1991 and migrated from a planned economy (Communist system) to a economy (capitalist system). Both the nation and the economy are nascent. Regional conflict retards growth. In addition, the border with Turkey is closed, making access to sea ports difficult and transportation logistics challenging to a country largely dependent upon imports. In 2003, Armenia became a member of the WTO (Trade Organization). The nation is making substantial progress in privatizing ownership of what used to be State Owned industries under the former Soviet system. Despite marked progress, Armenia still suffers from a large trade imballance and is still largely dependent upon foreign aid and remittances from Armenian nationals working abroad, and members of the diaspora donating aid through NGOs (non-governmental organizations) such as the church. There are some foreign capital inflows, but no robust foreign investment. Despite progress since the Soviet era, the unemployment rate still hovers near 30% and there remains a huge gulf between actual and potential Domestic Product.Global competitivenessThe Armenian economys competitiveness is low and stagnating according to the Competitiveness Index, in which Armenias ranking slipped from 80th out of 132 countries in 2006-2007 index to 93rd out of 131 countries in the 2007-2008 index (just below Libya, Namibia, Georgia, Serbia and Pakistan).(2007-2008 Global Competitiveness Index rankings and 20062007 comparisons, World Economic Forum.)Domestic business environmentthumb|The notoriously corrupt Armenian State Revenue Committee (housing both the Armenian Customs Service and the Armenian Tax Service) helps maintain import monopolies as well as aid tax evasion.Armenias economy is highly anticompetitive with government-connected individuals enjoying de facto monopolies over the import and distribution of basic commodities and foodstuffs, and under-reporting revenue to avoid paying taxes.Despite pronouncements at the highest levels of government on the importance of free competition, Armenia is next to last in the effectiveness of its anti-monopoly policy according to the 2010 results of the World Economic Forum Global Competitiveness Report.()According to Nercissiantz, President Sarkisians chief economic adviser, Businessmen holding state positions have turned into oligarchs who have avoided paying sufficient taxes by abusing their state positions, distorted markets with unequal conditions, breached the rules of competition, impeded or prevented small and medium-sized business entry into manufacturing and thereby sharply deepened social polarization in the republic.(Press Review, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), February 26, 2009.)Following the advice of economic advisors who cautioned Armenias leadership against the consolidation of economic power in the hands of a few, in January 2001, the Government of Armenia established the State Commission for the Protection of Economic Competition. Its members cannot be dismissed by the government.(Competitive Edge: The pitfalls of monopolies, and the challenges of a business-influenced parliament, ArmeniaNow.com, January 4, 2008.)MonopoliesAccording to one analyst, Armenias economic system is anticompetitive due to the structure of the economy being a type of monopoly or oligopoly. The result is the prices with us do not drop even if they do on international market, or they do quite belated and not to the size of the international market.(Price Predictions: With present inflation at nearly triple expectation, economists challenge 2009 forecast, ArmeniaNow.com, November 14, 2008.)According to the estimate of a former prime minister, Bagratian, 55 percent of Armenias GDP is controlled by 44 families.(In early 2008, the State Commission for the Protection of Economic Competition named 60 companies having dominant positions in Armenia.(In October 2009, when visiting Yerevan, the World Banks managing director, Okonjo-Iweala, warned that Armenia will not reach a higher level of development unless its leadership changes the oligopolistic structure of the national economy, bolsters the rule of law and shows zero tolerance towards corruption.(Armenia Warned To End Oligopoly, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL)October 10, 2009.) I think you can only go so far with this economic model, Ngozi Okonjo-Iweala told a news conference in Yerevan. Armenia is a lower middle-income country. If it wants to become a high-income or upper middle-income country, it can not do so with this kind of economic structure. That is clear. She also called for a sweeping reform of tax and customs administration, the creation of a strong and independent judicial system as well as a tough fight against government corruption.( The warning was echoed by the Monetary Fund.(Armenia Learning From Crisis, Says World Bank , Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), November 27, 2009.)Major monopolies in Armenia include:# gas import and distribution, held by ArmRosGazprom (ARG) (controlled by Russian monopoly Gazprom)(New Russian Gas Price For Armenia Unveiled, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), September 23, 2008.)# Armenias railway, held by the Russian-owned Caucasus Railway (SCR) (formerly Russias state-run rail company, RZD)(Armenian Railway Under Anti-Trust Investigation, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), November 5, 2008.)# Oil import and distribution (claimed by Armenian opposition parties to belonging to a handful of government-linked individuals,(Armenian Premier Downplays Impact Of Georgia War, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), August 28, 2008.) one of which - Mika Limited - is owned by Baghdasarian,(Armenian Cement Plant Sold To Russian Firm, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), August 15, 2008.) while the other - Flash - is owned by Beglarian, a prominent representative of the clan(Press Review (quoting Zhamanak Yerevan), Armenia Liberty, March 19, 2007.))## Aviation kerosene (supplying to Zvartnots airport), held by Mika Limited(Armenia Airport Hamstrung By Mysterious Fuel Shortage, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), November 7, 2005.)# Various basic foodstuffs such as rice, sugar, wheat, oil and butter(Armenian Central Bank Approves Another Rate Rise, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), June 3, 2008.)(Government Vows To Curb Rising Inflation, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), May 29, 2008.) (the Salex Group enjoys a de facto monopoly on imports of wheat, sugar, flour, butter and cooking oil. Its owner is parliament deputy Aleksanian (a.k.a. Lfik Samo) a figure close to the countrys leadership.(Mining Giant Remains Armenias Top Taxpayer, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), January 29, 2008.)(Armenia Hit By Sugar Shortage, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), October 23, 2007.))# Newspaper distribution, held by Haymamul (some newspaper editors believe that Haymamul deliberately refuses to print more newspaper copies in order to minimize the impact of unfavorable press coverage of the government)(Editors Concerned About Sale Of Newspaper Distribution Firm, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), September 13, 2007.)# Civil aviation, held by Armavia airline (owned by Baghdasarov, who is thought to be close to President Serge Sarkisian)(World Bank Urges Second Generation Reforms In Armenia, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), March 20, 2007.)Former major monopolies in Armenia include:# Wireless (mobile) telephony, held by Armentel until 2004(French Mobile Giant Set To Win Armenia Tender, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), October 6, 2008.)# Internet access, held by Armentel until September 2006(Armenian Telecom Operator Fined $1 Mln, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), July 30, 2008.)# Fixed-line telephony, held by Armentel until August 2007(Armenian Telecom Sector Further Liberalized, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), August 24, 2007.)GDPThe Domestic Product of Armenia stood at 8.8 billion dollars in 2010; with a population of 3.2 million, this amounts to a per capita of $2,676 (power parity $5,178).(  GDP growth for 2010 was at 2.9 percent, and inflation was at 8 percent.(GDP growth is expected to be around 3 percent in 2011, with inflation returning to 4-5 percent.(In comparison, in 2006, the GDP was estimated to be 6.6 billion USD  per calendar year and the GDP per capita  (purchasing power parity) was estimated at $5,400 US. The growth rate was high at 13.4%, but the relatively low base must be considered. Low inflation was maintained around 2.6% annually.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/am.html)GrowthAfter a decade of double-digit growth, Armenias economy declined by 14.4 percent in 2009.(  The year-to-date growth as of October 2010 was 2.8 percent.( In 2010, the main macro deficiencies of the Armenian economy  namely, unsustainable growth drivers, a narrow and resource-dominated export base, and overdependence on private transfers  were still prevalent.( According to official figures, Armenias economy grew by 13.8 percent in 2007.(ARMENIA: GAS PRICE HIKE POSES CHALLENGE FOR GOVERNMENT, EurasiaNet, April 24, 2008.) According to research funded by the USAID CAPS project, Armenias exceptionally high rate of economic growth during the last decade has been largely dependent on external factors (e.g. remittances, assistance from international financial and donor organization). Furthermore, the study concluded that despite its record growth on most macro-economic metrics, Armenia is low and lagging in competitiveness.(2008 National Competitiveness Report of Armenia, Economy and Values Research Center, 2008.)According to the Statistical Service, the booming construction and service sectors remain the driving forces of the high growth rate of GDP.(Armenian Growth Still In Double Digits, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), September 20, 2007.)Cash remittancesCash remittances sent back home from Armenians working abroadmostly in Russia and the United Statesare growing and contribute significantly to Armenias Gross Domestic Product (between 15 to 30 percent). They help Armenia sustain double-digit economic growth and finance its massive trade deficit.According to the Bank of Armenia, during the first half of 2008, cash remittances sent back to Armenia by Armenians working abroad rose by 57.5 percent and totaled $668.6 million USD, equivalent to 15 percent of the countrys first-half Gross Domestic Product.(Cash Transfers To Armenia Jump To New High, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), August 5, 2008.) However, the latter figures only represent cash remittances processed through Armenian commercial banks. According to RFE/RL, comparable sums are believed to be transferred through non-bank systems, implying that cash remittances make up approximately 30 percent of Armenias GDP in the first half of 2008.(In 2007, cash remittances through bank transfers rose by 37 percent to a record-high level of $1.32 billion USD.( According to the Central Bank of Armenia, in 2005, cash remittances from Armenians working abroad reached a record-high level of $1 billion, which is worth more than one fifth of the countrys 2005 Gross Domestic Product.(Survey Highlights Armenias Lingering Unemployment, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), February 9, 2006.)Net private transfers decreased in 2009, but saw a continuous increase during the first six months of 2010. Since private transfers from the Diaspora tend to be mostly injected into consumption of imports and not in high value-added sectors, the transfers have not resulted in sizeable increases in productivity.(Construction sectorArmenia experienced a construction boom during the latter part of the 2000s.  According to the National Statistical Service, Armenias booming construction sector generated about 20 percent of Armenias GDP during the first eight months of 2007.( According to a World Bank official, 30 percent of Armenias economy in 2009 came from the construction sector.(However, during the January to September 2010 period, the sector experienced a 5.2 percent year-on-year decrease, which according to the Foundation is an indication of the unsustainability of a sector based on an elite market, with few products for the median or low budgets.( This decrease comes despite the fact that an important component of the government stimulus package was to support the completion of ongoing construction projects.(Retail tradeIn 2010, retail trade turnover was largely unaltered compared to 2009.(  The existing monopolies throughout the retail sector have made the sector non-responsive to the crisis and resulted in near zero growth. The aftermath of the crisis has started to shift the structure in the retail sector in favor of food products.(Services sectorIn the 2000s, along with the construction sector, the sector was the driving force behind Armenias recent high economic growth rate.(  In 2010, the volume of services increased as much as 7.4 percent from January to September, over the same period in 2009.(TourismAccording to official data, in 2007, a record-high 500,000 tourists visited Armenia  most of them ethnic Armenians from Europe, Russia and the United States.(Armenia To Cut Visa Fees In Bid To Boost Tourism, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), October 17, 2008.) 2010 saw a noticeable increase in the number of Iranian tourists visiting Armenia  estimated to be 80,000.(However, according to private tour operators and other individuals familiar with the countrys tourism industry, government claims that hundreds of thousands of foreign tourists visit Armenia each year are wide of the mark.()  Official statistics show that as many 575,000 tourists visited Armenia from abroad in 2009; the government stated earlier in 2010 that the figure will surpass 620,000 in 2010.(  However, data from the National Statistical Service shows that there were only 65,000  foreigners staying in Armenian hotels in 2009.  Ara Vartanian, the chairman of the Armenian Trade and Industry Chamber, thinks that this measure is a far more objective indicator of the tourist influx into the country.(Industrial sectorIndustrial output was relatively positive throughout 2010, with year-on-year average growth of 10.9 percent in the period January to September 2010, due largely to the mining sector where higher global demand for commodities led to higher prices.( According to the National Statistical Service, during the JanuaryAugust 2007 period, Armenias sector was the single largest contributor to the countrys GDP, but remained largely stagnant with industrial output increasing only by 1.7 percent per year.( In 2005, Armenias industrial output (including electricity) made up about 30 percent of GDP.(Government Downplays Economic Cost Of Russian Gas Price Hike, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), February 10, 2006.)Mining40 percent of Armenias exports in 2009 were mining exports.(Agricultural sectorAs of 2010, the agricultural production comprises on average 25 percent of Armenias GDP.( In 2006, the agricultural sector accounted for about 20 percent of Armenias GDP.(Kocharian Orders Tax Exemption For Armenian Farmers, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), August 8, 2006.)    Armenias agricultural output dropped by 17.9 percent in the period of JanuarySeptember 2010.  This was owing to bad weather, a lack of a government stimulus package, and the continuing effects of decreased agricultural subsidies by the Armenian government (per WTO requirements).(Foreign aidUnited StatesThe government receives aid from the government of the States through the States Agency for International Development and the Challenge Corporation.On March 27, 2006, the Challenge Corporation signed a five-year, $235.65 million compact with the Government of Armenia. The single stated goal of the Armenian Compact is the reduction of rural poverty through a sustainable increase in the economic performance of the agricultural sector. The Compact includes a $67 million to rehabilitate up to 943 kilometers of rural roads, more than a third of Armenias proposed Lifeline road network. The Compact also includes a $146 million project to increase the productivity of approximately 250,000 farm households through improved water supply, higher yields, higher-value crops, and a more competitive agricultural sector.(Armenia and Millennium Challenge Corporation: Building a Dynamic Partnership for Poverty Reduction through Economic Growth, Millennium Challenge Corporation, March 27, 2006.)In 2010, the volume of US assistance to Armenia remained near 2009 levels; however, longer-term decline continued. The original Millennium Challenge Account commitment for $235 million had been reduced to about $175 million due to Armenias poor governance record. Thus, the MCC would not complete road construction. Instead, the irrigated agriculture project was headed for completion with apparently no prospects for extension beyond 2011.(European UnionWith curtailment of the MCC funding, the European Union may replace the US as Armenias chief source of foreign aid for the first time since independence. From 2011 to 2013, the European Union is expected to advance at least 157.3 million ($208 million) in aid to Armenia.(External tradeExportsIn 2010, Armenias exports remained resource-dependent, largely because the non-resource-intensive sectors were significantly less competitive. Armenia has not succeeded in increasing and diversifying exports beyond raw materials thus leaving room for a greater vulnerability to external shocks.( There was a 43.9 percent increase in overall exports during the January to September period. The main three export destinations were Bulgaria with 15.2 percent of total exports, followed by Germany with 14.2 percent and Russia with 13.9 percent. Raw minerals were the main export sent to Bulgaria and Germany.(ImportsThe global economic crisis has had less impact on imports because the sector is more diversified than exports. In the first nine months of 2010, imports grew about 19 percent, just about equal to the decline of the same sector in 2009.(DeficitDuring the first half of 2008, Armenias widening current-account deficit grew by 66 percent to $1.39 billion USD, with a 40 percent rise in imports. Furthermore, Armenian exports fell by about one percent to $520 million USD.(According to the National Statistical Service, Armenias trade deficit in 2006 was $1.2 billion with growth in exports being largely flat.(Armenia Keeps Up Robust Growth, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), March 30, 2007.) During the first 11 months of 2006, net imports grew by 21 percent to $1.95 billion, while exports stood at $895 million, up 0.3 percent from the same period in 2005.(Armenia Posts Record-High Trade Deficit, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), January 8, 2007.)PartnersEuropean UnionIn 2010, EU countries accounted for 32.1 percent of Armenias foreign trade.( Germany is Armenias largest trading partner among EU member states, accounting for 7.2 percent of trade; this is due largely to mining exports. Armenian exports to EU countries have skyrocketed by 65.9 percent, making up more than half of all 2010 January to September exports. Imports from EU countries increased by 17.1 percent, constituting 22.5 percent of all imports.(During JanuaryFebruary 2007, Armenias trade with the Union totaled $200 million.( During the first 11 months of 2006, the European Union remained Armenias largest trading partner, accounting for 34.4 percent of its $2.85 billion commercial exchange during the 11-month period.(Russia and former Soviet republicsBilateral trade with Russia stood at more than $700 million for the first nine months of 2010  on track to rebound to $1 billion mark first reached in 2008 prior to the global economic crisis.(During JanuaryFebruary 2007, Armenias trade with Russia and other Soviet republics was $205.6 million (double the amount from the same period the previous year), making them the countrys number one trading partner.( During the first 11 months of 2006, the volume of Armenias trade with Russia was $376.8 million or 13.2 percent of the total commercial exchange.(ChinaAs of early 2011, trade with China is dominated by imports of Chinese goods and accounts for about 10 percent of Armenias foreign trade.(Chinese FM Visits Armenia, Urges Closer Ties, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), February 17, 2011.) The volume of Chinese-Armenian trade soared by 55 percent to $390 million in JanuaryNovember 2010. Armenian exports to China, though still modest in absolute terms, nearly doubled in that period.(IranIn 2010, the volume of bilateral trade with Iran was $200 million - which is approximately equal to the trade between Armenia and Turkey.(  The number of Iranian tourists has risen in recent years, with an estimated 80,000 Iranian tourists in 2010.(TurkeyIn 2010, the volume of bilateral trade with Turkey was about $200 million, with trade taking place without open borders, across Georgian territory.(  This figure is not expected to increase significantly so long as the land border between the Armenia and Turkey remains closed.(United StatesFrom JanuarySeptember 2010, bilateral trade with the United States measured approximately $150 million, on track for about a 30 percent increase over 2009.( An increase in Armenias exports to the US in 2009 and 2010 has been due to shipments of aluminum foil.(During the first 11 months of 2006, U.S.-Armenian trade totaled $152.6 million.(GeorgiaThe volume of Georgian-Armenian trade remains modest in both relative and absolute terms. According to official Armenian statistics, it rose by 11 percent to $91.6 million in JanuaryNovember 2010. The figure was equivalent to just over 2 percent of Armenias overall foreign trade.(Armenia, Georgia Agree On Joint Border Control, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), February 16, 2011.)Foreign debtArmenias national debt has increased significantly since 2008 when public external debt consisted of only 13.5 percent of GDP.(   By the end of 2010, Armenias external debt is projected to form about 42 percent of GDP, and 50 percent in 2012.(As of late November 2009, the Armenian governments debt was around $3 billion USD, having doubled in size over the course of the previous year.( With the Armenian government needing more anti-crisis loans from the World Bank and other foreign donors, the ratio is expected to exceed 40 percent in 2010.( According to a World Bank official, a country that has around 12 percent rate of growth or even lower, at the range of 7 to 8 percent, can afford a level of debt of up to 50 percent. The official warned that the debt servicing payments of the Armenian government will surge by 2013 and absorb quite significant part of tax revenues.(According to another estimate, the ratio between the countrys Gross Domestic Product (GDP) and the states foreign debt has reached 46 percent.(Change Needed in Distribution of Foreign Credits: Union chair says economic indexes disturbing, ArmeniaNow.com, November 27, 2009.) Economists generally agree that a country is insolvent, if its foreign debt surpasses 50 percent of its GDP.( Critics of the government say that the $500 million credit from Russia should have gone to develop industry, instead of going to the construction sector.(Transportation routes and Energy linesInternalSince early 2008, Armenias entire rail network is managed by the Russian state railway.(Armenia Pressing Ahead With Iran Rail Link, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL, October 14, 2008.)(Armenia Scrambles To Restore Vital Supplies Via Georgia, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), August 18, 2008.)Through GeorgiaRussian natural gas reaches Armenia via a pipeline through Georgia.The only operational rail link into Armenia is from Georgia. During Soviet times, Armenias rail network connected to Russias via Georgia through Abkhazia along the Sea. However, the rail link between Abkhazia and Georgia proper has been closed for a number of years, forcing Armenia to receive rail cars laden with cargo only through the relatively expensive rail-ferry services operating between Georgian and other Black Sea ports.(The Georgian Black Sea ports of Batumi and Poti process more than 90 percent of freight shipped to and from landlocked Armenia. The Georgian railway, which runs through the town of Gori in central Georgia, is the main transport link between Armenia and the aforementioned Georgian seaports. Fuel, wheat and other basic commodities are transported to Armenia by rail.(Armenias main rail and road border-crossing with Georgia (at ) is along the river near the Armenian town of Bagratashen and the Georgian town of Sadakhlo.The Upper Lars border crossing (at Gorge) between Georgia and Russia across the Mountains served as Armenias sole overland route to the former Soviet Union and Europe.(Russia, Georgia Agree To Reopen Border Gate, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), December 24, 2009.) It was controversially shut down by the Russian authorities in June 2006, at the height of a Russian-Georgian spy scandal.( Upper Lars is the only land border crossing that does not go through Georgias Russian-backed breakaway regions of Ossetia and Abkhazia. The other two roads linking Georgia and Russia run through South Ossetia and Abkhazia, effectively barring them to international traffic.( This crossing is expected to reopen starting on March 1, 2010.(Through Turkey and AzerbaijanAn economic blockade with Turkey and Azerbaijan has cut Armenias rail link between Gyumri and Kars to Turkey; the rail link with Iran through the Azeri exclave of Nakhichevan; and a natural gas and oil pipeline line with Azerbaijan. Also non-functioning are roads with Turkey and Azerbaijan. Despite the economic blockade of Turkey on Armenia, every day dozens of Turkish trucks laden with goods enter Armenia through Georgia.In 2010, it was confirmed that Turkey will keep the border closed for the foreseeable future after the Turkey-Armenia normalization process collapsed.(Through IranA new gas pipeline to Iran has been completed, and a road to Iran through the southern city of Meghri allows trade with that country.  An oil pipeline to pump Iranian oil products is also in the planning stages.As of October 2008, the Armenian government is considering implementing an ambitious project to build a railway to Iran.( The 400 kilometer railway would pass through Armenias mountainous southern province of Syunik which borders Iran. Economic analysts say that the project would cost at least $1 billion (equivalent to about 40 percent of Armenias 2008 state budget).(  As of 2010, the project has been continuously delayed, with the rail link estimated to cost as much as $4 billion and stretch .(  In June 2010, Transport Minister Manuk Vartanian revealed that Yerevan is seeking as much as $1 billion in loans from China to finance the railways construction.(LaborMonthly wagesAccording to the state-owned Armenpress news agency, the average monthly wage in Armenia for the first half of 2007 was 70,700 drams (about $210 USD).(Average Wage In Armenia Rises To $210, ARMENPRESS, August 3, 2007.)As of April 24, 2008, the average monthly salary is 75,000 drams (about $242 US dollars).( According to the ROA National Statistical Service, the average monthly salary during January - June 2008 is 86,850 drams (about $287 at the time). About 62% of officially registered wage earners earn at least the average monthly wage, while only 19.6% receive a monthly salary of over 100,000 drams (about $330 at the time).(Mortgage Loans Beyond the Reach of the Middle Class, Hetq Online, July 28, 2008.)UnemploymentAccording to research commissioned by the Yerevan office of the for Security and Cooperation in Europe, at least one in three working-age Armenians was unemployed as of February 2005 despite several consecutive years of double-digit economic growth. The finding sharply contrasts with governments official unemployment rate of about 10 percent.( A 2003 household survey conducted by the National Statistical Survey found that the real unemployment rate is about 33 percent.(Migrant workersSince gaining independence in 1991, hundreds of thousands of Armenias residents have gone abroad, mainly to Russia, in search of work. Unemployment has been the major cause of this massive labor emigration. OSCE experts estimate that between 116,000 and 147,000 people left Armenia for economic reasons between 2002 and 2004, with two-thirds of them returning home by February 2005. According to estimates by the National Statistical Survey, the rate of labor emigration was twice as higher in 2001 and 2002.(According to an OSCE survey, a typical Armenian worker is a married man aged between 41 and 50 years who began looking for work abroad at the age of 32-33.(Appreciation and depreciation of the dramImageSize  width:600 height:240PlotArea  width:500 height:150 left:50 bottom:40AlignBars  lateDateFormat  yyyyPeriod  from:0 till:600TimeAxis  orientation:verticalScaleMajor  unit:year increment:100 start:0BarData bar:1 text:1993 bar:2 text:1994 bar:3 text:1995 bar:4 text:1996 bar:5 text:1997 bar:6 text:1998 bar:7 text:1999 bar:8 text:2000 bar:9 text:2001 bar:10 text:2002 bar:11 text:2003 bar:12 text:2004 bar:13 text:2005 bar:14 text:2006 bar:15 text:2007 bar:16 text:2008 bar:17 text:2009 bar:18 text:2010Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.7) id:darkgrey value:gray(0.1)TextData  pos:(10,220) textcolor:black fontsize:S text:AMD/USD pos:(290,25) textcolor:black fontsize:S text:Year pos:(180,220) textcolor:black fontsize:M text:Armenian dram exchange rate per USDPlotData width:18 bar:1 color:lightgrey from:0 till:9 bar:2 color:lightgrey from:0 till:289 bar:3 color:lightgrey from:0 till:406 bar:4 color:lightgrey from:0 till:414 bar:5 color:lightgrey from:0 till:491 bar:6 color:lightgrey from:0 till:505 bar:7 color:lightgrey from:0 till:535 bar:8 color:lightgrey from:0 till:540 bar:9 color:lightgrey from:0 till:555 bar:10 color:lightgrey from:0 till:573 bar:11 color:lightgrey from:0 till:579 bar:12 color:lightgrey from:0 till:533 bar:13 color:lightgrey from:0 till:458 bar:14 color:lightgrey from:0 till:415 bar:15 color:lightgrey from:0 till:344 bar:16 color:lightgrey from:0 till:304 bar:17 color:lightgrey from:0 till:385 bar:18 color:lightgrey from:0 till:360In 2010, the value of the Armenian Dram (AMD) was artificially kept high during the height of the global economic crisis. Had the AMD been allowed to depreciate to its market level, exports would have become more competitive and the purchasing power of the majority of the population who are dependent on remittances from abroad would have increased. Instead, the value of the AMD was kept high, out of a fear of inflation and concern about alienating the powerful government-connected importers of oil, sugar, flour, cigarettes and beverages.(The AMD/USD exchange rate depreciated by 6.1 percent in the first three quarters of 2010 compared to the same period in 2009, before it began to show the expected end-of-the-year appreciation. In comparison between the January to October periods of 2010 and 2009, depreciation stands at 4.7 percent.(Government revenue and taxationThe Armenian government collected 383.5 billion drams ($1.26 billion) in various taxes in the first nine months of 2008 (a 33.2 percent increase from the same period last year).(Government Keeps Up Strong Growth In Tax Revenues, Armenia Liberty (RFE/RL), October 14, 2008.)     Many large companies have a privileged status when it comes to taxation.  Big business is not taxed in proportion to its capacity and output, and the disproportionate burden falls on small and medium size businesses.(New VAT taxOver half of the tax revenues in the JanuaryAugust 2008 time period were generated from value-added taxes (tax). By comparison, corporate profit tax generated less than 16 percent of the revenues.( This suggests that tax collection in Armenia is improving at the expense of ordinary citizens, rather than wealthy citizens (who have been the main beneficiaries of Armenias double-digit economic growth in recent years).(Tax evasionMany Armenian companies, especially those owned by government-connected tycoons, have long reported suspiciously low earnings, thereby avoiding paying larger taxes.(Environmental issuesArmenia is trying to address its environmental problems. It has established a Ministry of Environment and has introduced a pollution fee system by which taxes are levied on air and water emissions and solid waste disposal, with the resulting revenues used for environmental protection activities. Armenia is interested in cooperating with other members of the Commonwealth of Independent States (a group of 12 former Soviet republics) and with members of the international community on environmental issues. The Armenian Government is working toward closing the Armenian Nuclear Power Plant as soon as alternate energy sources can be identified.EnergyBankingArmenias financial system is not integrated into the global network. According to the head of the Armenian Central Banks (CBA) department for financial system policies and analyses (Vahe Vardanyan) Armenian banks have no large asset concentrations in foreign markets, particularly in capital markets. They nearly have no purchased securities (so-called securitized packages). For this reason, Armenia was virtually unaffected by the crisis of September 2008.(Untouched and Out of Touch: Armenia not affected by US crisis due to relative insignificance, ArmeniaNow, October 3, 2008.)Armenian banking assets are very low and make up only 25 percent of the Gross Domestic Product (GDP).(Takeover of Armenian industrial property by the Russian state and Russian companiesIn implementing its strategy to regain political dominance over post-Soviet countries by taking over their economic infrastructure, the Russian state, since 2000, has acquired several key assets in the energy sector and Soviet-era industrial plants. Property-for-debt or equity-for-debt swaps (acquiring ownership by simply writing off the Armenian governments debts to Russia) are usually the method of acquiring assets. The failure of market reforms, clan-based economics, and official in Armenia have allowed the success of this process.(Socor, Vladimir. Armenias Energy Sector, Other Industrial Assets Passing Under Russias Control, IASPS Policy Briefings: Oil in Geostrategic Perspective, November 13, 2002.)In August 2002, the Armenian government sold an 80 percent stake in the Electricity Network (AEN) to Midland Resources, a British offshore-registered firm which is said to have close Russian connections.(In September 2002, the Armenian government handed over Armenias largest cement factory to the Russian ITERA gas exporter in payment for its $10 million debt for past gas deliveries.(Danielyan, Emil. RUSSIA TIGHTENS GRIP ON ARMENIA WITH DEBT AGREEMENTS, Eurasianet, May 7, 2003)On November 5, 2002, Armenia transferred control of 5 state enterprises to Russia in an assets-for-debts transaction which settled $100 million of Armenian state debts to Russia. The document was signed for Russia by Prime Minister Kasyanov and Industry Minister Klebanov, while Prime Minister Markarian and defense and security strongman Sarkisian signed for Armenia.( The five enterprises which passed to 100 percent Russian state ownership are:* Armenias largest thermal power plant which is in the town of Hrazdan and is gas-burning* the Mars electronics and robotics plant in Yerevan, a Soviet-era flagship for both civilian and military production* three research-and-production enterprisesfor mathematical machines, for the study of materials, and for automated control equipmentthese being Soviet-era military-industrial plantsIn January 2003, the Armenian government and Company RUSAL signed an investment cooperation agreement, under which United Company RUSAL (which already owned a 76% stake) acquired the Armenian governments remaining 26% share of ARMENAL aluminum foil mill, giving RUSAL 100% ownership of RUSAL ARMENAL.((RUSAL ARMENAL)On November 1, 2006, the Armenian government handed de facto control of the Iran-Armenia gas pipeline to Russian company Gazprom and increased Gazproms stake in the Russian-Armenian company ArmRosGazprom from 45% to 58% by approving an additional issue of shares worth $119 million.(Socor, Vladimir. RUSSIA CEMENTS CONTROL OF ARMENIAS ENERGY SYSTEM, Eurasia Daily Monitor, November 3, 2006.) This left the Armenian government with a 32% stake in ArmRosGazprom. The transaction will also help finance ArmRosGazproms acquisition of the electricity generating plants fifth power bloc (Hrazdan-5), the leading unit in the country.(In October 2008 the Russian bank Gazprombank, the banking arm of Gazprom, acquired 100 percent of Armenian bank Areximbank after previously buying 80 percent of said bank in November 2007 and 94.15 percent in July of the same year.( Gazprombank acquiert entirement la banque armnienne Areximbank)Controversy over non-transparent dealsCritics of the Kocharian government say that the Armenian administration never considered alternative ways of settling the Russian debts. According to economist Eduard Aghajanov, Armenia could have repaid them with low-interest loans from other, presumably Western sources, or with some of its hard currency reserves which then totaled about $450 million. Furthermore, Aghajanov points to the Armenian governments failure to eliminate widespread corruption and mismanagement in the energy sector  abuses that cost Armenia at least $50 million in losses each year, according to one estimate.(Political observers say that Armenias economic cooperation with Russia has been one of the least transparent areas of the Armenian governments work. The debt arrangements have been personally negotiated by (then) Defense Minister (and now President) Sarkisian, Kocharians closest political associate. Other top government officials, including Prime Minister Markarian, had little say on the issue. Furthermore, all of the controversial agreements have been announced after Sarkisians frequent trips to Moscow, without prior public discussion.(Finally, while Armenia is not the only ex-Soviet state that has incurred multimillion-dollar debts to Russia over the past decade, it is the only state to have so far given up such a large share of its economic infrastructure to Russia. For example, pro-Western Ukraine and Georgia (both of which owe Russia more than Armenia) have managed to reschedule repayment of their debts.(StatisticsBackgroundGDP(pp.): $18.92 billion (2008):country comparison to the world: 125GDP $: $12.07 billion (2008)GDP - real growth rate: 7.6% (2008):country comparison to the world: 22GDP(per capita): $6,400 (2008)GDP by sectorAgriculture: 17.2%Industry: 36.4%Services: 46.4%Unemployment: 7.1% (2007):country comparison to the world: 88Labour Force: 1.2 million (2007):country comparison to the world: 88Labour Force - by occupation:: agriculture: 46.2%: industry: 15.6%: services: 38.2% (2006)Population below poverty line::26.5% (2006 est.)Inflation: 4.4%Household income or consumption by percentage share:lowest 10%: 1.6%highest 10%: 41.3% (2004)Distribution of family income - index::37 (2006)Investment (gross fixed)::34.1% of GDP (2008):country comparison to the world: 13Central bank discount rate::7.25% (2008):country comparison to the world: 55Stock of money::$1.507 billion (2007):country comparison to the world: 106ProductionIndustrial production growth rate::3% (2008 est.):country comparison to the world: 105Industries: Diamond processing, metal-cutting machine tools, forge-pressing machines, electric motors, tires, knitted wear, hosiery, shoes, silk fabric, chemicals, trucks, instruments, microelectronics, jewellery manufacturing, software development, food processing, brandy.Agriculture - products:Fruit (especially grapes and apricots), vegetables, livestock, wheat, wine, brandyValue of stock exchange: $42.8 million (2005)TradeExports - commodities:Pig iron, unwrought copper, nonferrous metals, cut diamonds, mineral products, foodstuffs, energyImports - commodities:gas, petroleum, tobacco products, foodstuffs, uncut diamondsExports: $1.225 billion f.o.b. (2008)country comparison to the world: 147Imports: $3.546 billion f.o.b. (2008)country comparison to the world: 132Current account balance:$-877 million (2007)country comparison to the world: 117Export partners: Russia 17.5%, Netherlands 14.9%, Germany 14.7%, Ireland 11.1%, Belgium 8.7%, Georgia 7.6%, US 6.6%, Switzerland 4.3%, Bulgaria 4.1%, Ukraine 4% (2007)Import partners: Russia 17.5%,  Netherlands 14.9%, Germany 14.7%, Ireland 11.1%, Belgium 8.7%, Georgia 7.6%, US 6.6%, Switzerland 4.3%, Bulgaria 4.1%, Ukraine 4% (2007)Reserves of foreign exchange and gold:$1.657 billion (2007)Debt - external:$1.372 billion (2007)Currency:dram (AMD)Currency code:AMDExchange rates:dram per US dollar - 310.00 (2008), 457.69 (2005), 533.45 (2004), 578.76 (2003), 573.35 (2002), 555.08 (2001), 539.53 (2000)EnergyElectricity - production:5.544 GWh (2007)country comparison to the world: 108Electricity - consumption:4.539 GWh (2006)country comparison to the world: 109Electricity - exports:322.6 GWh; note - exports an unknown quantity to Georgia; includes exports to Nagorno-Karabakh (2007)Electricity - imports:400.6 GWh; note - imports an unknown quantity from Iran (2007)Oil - production: (2005 est.)country comparison to the world: 208Oil - consumption: (2006 est.)country comparison to the world: 100Oil - exports: (2005)country comparison to the world: 207Oil - imports: (2005)country comparison to the world: 90Natural gas - production:0 m (2007 est.)country comparison to the world: 207Natural gas - consumption:2.05 billion m (2007 est.)country comparison to the world: 81Natural gas - exports:0 m (2007 est.)country comparison to the world: 201Natural gas - imports:2.05 billion m (2007 est.)country comparison to the world: 44See also* of companies of ArmeniaReferences* CIA World FactbookFootnotesExternal links* State Commission for the Protection of Economic Competition of RA* Armenian Economy*dArmniade Armeniade Armeniode lArmniede Armeniadi ArmeniadArmeniada ArmniaArmenieit Armeniazh:
